




SAY CHEESE AND DIE—AGAIN! 
Goosebumps - 44 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“Greg Banks!” 

A shiver ran down the back of my neck as Mr. Saur called my name. I had been 

slumping low in my seat in the last row of the classroom. I tried to hide behind 
Brian 

Webb, the big gorilla of a kid who sits in front of me. 

And I folded my hands and prayed that Mr. Saur wouldn’t call on me to give my 
report next. 

“Greg Banks!” he called. 

I felt another cold shiver. Then my legs started to shake as I climbed to my feet. 
Then my throat tightened until I could barely breathe. 

I hate giving reports in front of the whole class. 

Especially when I haven’t had much time to practice. Especially when we’re not 

allowed to have notes. Especially when half of our grade in English depends on 
how 

we do on this report. 

I cleared my throat and made my way up to the front of the classroom. I was 
halfway there when Donny Greene stuck his big white sneaker into the aisle and 
tripped me. 

I stumbled—but didn’t fall. The whole class exploded in laughter, anyway. 

Mr. Saur frowned at Donny. “Donny, do you have to trip every person who walks 



by you?” he demanded. 

“Yes,” Donny replied with a straight face. 

And once again, the whole class burst out laughing. 

Everyone thinks Donny is a riot. Everyone but Mr. Saur. 

Mr. Saur doesn’t think anyone is funny. That’s why we call him Sourball Saur. 

He probably wouldn’t think that was funny, either! 

Mr. Saur is tall and thin and nearly bald. He never kids around. He never smiles. 
His mouth is always puckered, as if he’s just bitten into a lemon. 

Sourball Saur. 

He’s sort of a legend at Pitts Landing Middle School. Everyone tries not to get 

him. My best friends—Michael, Bird, and Shari—were lucky. They’re in Miss 

Folsom’s class. I was the only one who got stuck with the Sourball. 

I stepped up beside his desk and cleared my throat again. I wondered if everyone 

could see my knees shaking. My face felt burning hot. My hands were cold as 
ice. 

Does everyone get this nervous when they stand in front of the class? 

Mr. Saur folded his pale, skinny hands on his desk and cracked his knuckles. 
“Okay, Greg, let’s hear your true story,” he said. 

I cleared my throat for the thousandth time. I took a deep breath. Then I started 
to 

tell the story of what happened to my friends and me last summer.... 



2 


“I was hanging out with my friends. Bird, Michael, and Shari. We had nothing to 

do, and we were kind of bored. So we dared each other to do something exciting. 
We 

dared each other to sneak into the Coffman house.” 

Mr. Saur raised a hand to interrupt me. He frowned his sour frown. “What’s the 
Coffman house?” 

“It’s a haunted house!” Donny Greene called out. 

“It’s where Donny lives!” Brian Webb mumbled, loud enough for everyone to 
hear. It got a big laugh. 

Mr. Saur raised both hands for quiet and gave everyone his lemon expression. 

“It’s a deserted, old house in my neighborhood,” I told him. “We went inside. 

Down to the basement. And we found an old camera. And that’s what my true 
story 

is about. Because the camera had evil powers.” 

Mr. Saur groaned and rolled his eyes. Some kids laughed. But I took another 
deep 

breath and continued my story. 

“It was an instant camera. The picture popped right out. But it was never the 
picture we snapped. It always showed something terrible happening. 

“I took the old camera home. I snapped a photo of my dad’s new station wagon. 
The photo slid out. In the photo, the station wagon was totaled. Completely 



wrecked. 


And then, a few days later, my dad was in a terrible accident. The photo came 
true.” 

I glanced around the room to see how my story was going over. A few kids were 
laughing. Others were staring at me hard. Trying to decide if I was for real. 

Brian Webb tried to make me lose it. He stuck his two pointer fingers into his 
nostrils and twirled them around. He thinks he’s funny, but he’s just gross. 

“I took a snapshot of my friend Bird Arthur,” I continued. “At his Little League 
game. Bird smiled and posed for the camera. But the photo showed him lying 
unconscious on the ground. 

“Then, a few minutes later, a kid hit a line drive. It smacked Bird in the head. 

And Bird fell unconscious on the ground. Just like in the photo.” 

I heard some nervous giggles from the back of the room. I glanced up to see 

puzzled expressions on a lot of faces. Brian still had his fingers in his nose. I 
turned 

away. No way was I going to laugh at that. 

Mr. Saur had his elbows on the desk and his round, bald head buried in his 
hands. 

His face was hidden. So I couldn’t tell if he liked my report or not. 

“Then something even more scary happened,” I continued. “I brought the 
camera 

to Shari Walker’s birthday party. I snapped Shari’s picture, standing next to a 
tree. 



“When the photo popped out, it showed the tree—but no Shari. It was like she 
was invisible or something. And then, a few minutes later, Shari disappeared.” 

A few kids gasped. Some others laughed. Mr. Saur still had his face buried in his 
hands. 

“A couple of days later, Shari came back,” I told them. “But now we were too 

frightened to keep the camera. So we took it back to the Coffman house. And we 
met 

this strange guy, dressed all in black. He was the inventor of the camera. He told 
us 

that the camera had a curse on it, and—” 

To my surprise, Mr. Saur jumped to his feet. “That will be enough,” he snapped. 
“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I heard him correctly. 

3 

The room went silent. 

Mr. Saur shook his head. Then he narrowed his watery brown eyes at me. 
“Greg,” 

he said, “I have some very bad news for you.” 


4 



2 


The lunch bell rang. 

“We’ll hear more reports tomorrow,” Mr. Saur announced. “Class dismissed.” 
Chairs scraped the floor as everyone stood up. I watched the other kids gather up 
their books and backpacks and head for the door. Freedom. 

I had an urge to run after them. But Mr. Saur kept his eyes locked on me, holding 
me in place with those cold eyes. 

I waited until the classroom had emptied out. Then I turned to the lemon-faced 
teacher. “What’s the bad news?” I gritted my teeth. 

“I’m giving you an F,” Sourball said. 

“Huh?” 

“I’m failing you on that report, Greg.” 

I felt my knees give. I had to grab the chalk tray to keep myself from collapsing 
in a quivering heap on the floor. “B—but—but— why?” I choked out. 

He crossed his bony arms over the front of his yellow alligator-shirt. I wished the 
alligator would reach up and bite him. 

“You didn’t do the assignment,” he said. 

“But—but—but—” I still gripped the chalk tray. My legs were shaking too hard 
to stand up. 

“Greg, you were supposed to share a true story,” Mr. Saur scolded. “Instead, you 



came in here with that wild tale. It was completely silly. I don’t know what you 
were 

thinking!” 

“But it’s true!” I wailed. “The camera—” 

He waved a hand in my face. “Silly,” he repeated. “You came in here with a 
wild, 

silly story. Something you probably read in a comic book.” 

“Mr. Saur—!” I started. I let go of the chalk tray and balled my hands into tight 

fists. “You have to believe me. The camera is real. I didn’t make up the story.” 

I took a deep breath. Then I struggled to keep my voice low and calm. “You can 

ask my friends,” I told him. “They’re in Miss Folsom’s class. They’ll tell you it 
really 

happened.” 

“I’m sure they will.” He smirked at me. “I’m sure your friends will tell me 
whatever you want them to tell me.” 

“No. Really—!” I protested. 

Mr. Saur shook his head. “You didn’t take the assignment seriously, Greg. You 
treated it like a big joke. So I have to give you an F.” 

I raised my fists and let out a loud groan. 

Greg, get control, I warned myself. Get control. 

5 

But how could I get control? The grade was so unfair. And it meant so much to 



me. 


It was a matter of life or death! 

“Mr. Saur—you can’t give me an F!” I wailed. I felt like dropping to my knees 
and begging for mercy. “You will ruin my life!” 

He stared coldly at me. He didn’t say a word. 

“If I don’t get better grades, I can’t visit my cousins this summer,” I explained. 

“You see, my cousins live near Yosemite. In California. And my parents said that 
if I 

get a better grade in your English class, I can spend the summer with them.” 

He didn’t move. His cold frown didn’t budge. His eyes didn’t blink. 

“If you give me an F, I’ll be stuck all summer in Pitts Landing!” I cried. 

Finally, Mr. Saur moved. An unpleasant smile spread over his face. His wet 

brown eyes flashed. “Then you’ll have plenty of time to make up more crazy 
stories,” 

he said. 

He turned away from me and started scribbling notes in his black grade book. 
“Mr. Saur—please!” I begged. “You’ve got to believe me. My story is true. I 
didn’t make it up. Please—” 

He raised his eyes from the grade book. “Okay. Prove it.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“Bring in the camera,” he said. “Bring it in and prove that it’s evil. Prove that 



your story is true—or else I have to fail you.” 

I stared at him, studying his face. Was he serious? 

He stared back for a moment, daring me with his eyes. Then he shooed me away 

with both hands. “Go to lunch, Greg. Maybe next time you’ll take my 
assignment 

seriously.” 

I gathered up my backpack and slung it over my shoulder. Then I slumped out of 
the room, thinking hard. 

Could I go back to that creepy old house and dig out that camera? 

No. No way. 

The camera was too dangerous. Too frightening. Too evil. 

But I needed a good grade. I needed it desperately. 

What should I do? 


6 



3 


I found my friends at our usual table in the corner of the lunchroom. I dropped 
my 

tray down with a sigh, and spilled half my drink. 

“Greg—what’s your problem?” Bird looked up from his sandwich. He had egg 
salad all over his chin and cheeks. 

“Are you eating that sandwich or wearing it?” Shari asked him. 

“Excuse me?” Bird didn’t understand. 

Michael inflated his brown paper sandwich bag and popped it between his 
hands. 

Then he crushed his chocolate milk carton flat. He always gulps his milk down 
first, 

then crushes the carton. We’re not sure why. 

Michael is a little weird. 

I dropped into my chair. I didn’t start to eat. I didn’t even look at my food tray. I 
just stared at the wall until the tiles became a green blur. 

“What’s your problem?” Bird repeated. Now he had egg salad on his forehead, 
too! I don’t know how he does it. 

Bird’s real name is Doug Arthur. But he looks so much like a bird, everyone 
calls 

him Bird. Even his parents. 

He has small, birdlike brown eyes, close together over a long, beak-shaped nose. 



And he has a short tuft of feathery brown hair on top of his head. He’s tall and 
thin 

and sort of bobs up and down like a flamingo when he walks. 

Michael poked a finger through his sandwich. He always makes a hole in the 
center of his sandwich and eats it inside out. “Bad day, Greg?” 

“For sure,” I muttered. I sighed again. 

Shari wore a pale blue T-shirt over faded jeans. She tossed back her black hair. 

She was busy pulling the bright red pepperoni off her pizza slice. “Come on, 
Greg. 

Spill,” she urged without looking up. 

I took a deep breath. Then I told them what had happened to me in English class. 
Bird dropped his sandwich onto the table. “Sourball didn’t believe you?” he 
cried. He slapped his forehead. When he pulled his hand away, his fingers were 
smeared with egg salad. 

“Well, we could all go tell him it’s true,” Shari suggested. 

I shook my head. “He won’t believe you, either,” I moaned. 

“But we all saw it!” Michael protested. “We all know it’s true.” 

“Yeah. It’s four against one,” Bird added. He was wiping egg salad off the front 
of his shirt. “He’ll have to believe us.” 

“He won’t,” I sighed. “You know Sourball. He said I have to bring in the camera 


and prove to him that it’s evil.” 



“But you can ’t!” Michael and Shari cried together. 

7 

I glanced over their shoulders. Brian and Donny were grinning at me from the 

next table. Brian and Donny are the two biggest guys at Pitts Landing Middle 
School. 

We call them Sumo One and Sumo Two—because they’re both shaped a little 
like 

sumo wrestlers. 

Of course, no one has ever called them Sumo One or Sumo Two to their faces. 

When Donny and Brian get angry, they sit on kids and squash them like bugs. 

And now, they had followed me from Mr. Saur’s class and were grinning at me 

from the next table. When they saw me watching, they formed little square 
cameras 

with their fingers and raised them in front of their eyes. 

“Click! Click!” Brian called. “I’ve got an evil camera here!” 

“Say cheese!” Donny shouted. “Say cheese—and die! Ha-ha-ha!” 

“Click. Click. Click.” They clicked their air cameras. 

“Watch the birdie!” Donny cried. 

“Watch the birdbrain!” Brian yelled. 

They both tossed back their heads and laughed like lunatics, slapping each other 
high fives. 

“Funny, guys,” I said, rolling my eyes. “Real funny.” 



“You two should do stand-up,” Michael told them. “You should stand up in the 
corner!” 

No one laughed. No one ever laughs at Michael’s jokes. His jokes are never 
funny. In fact, they are embarrassing. 

Michael has short red hair, blue eyes, and a face full of freckles. He isn’t exactly 
fat—but no one would ever call him skinny. 

One of these days, he’s going to surprise us and make a joke that isn’t totally 
lame. 

But I was in no mood for jokes, anyway. My summer was about to be ruined. 
My 

three friends all had plans to go away. No way I wanted to be left all alone in 
Pitts 

Landing with nothing to do for three months! 

If I had to bring in that camera to prove to Mr. Saur that I was telling the truth... 
I’d do it! 

Shari must have read my thoughts. She reached across the table and grabbed my 
arm. “Greg—you can’t,” she said. “That camera is too dangerous.” 

Bird agreed. “I’m not going back to that weird house,” he said, shaking his head. 
“Never again.” 

“Hey—what about your brother?” Michael asked me. 

I turned to him, confused. “What about my brother?” 



“Isn’t he working in a camera store?” Michael demanded. 

I nodded. My older brother, Terry, was working at Kramer’s Photo Store after 
school. “Yeah. He’s at Kramer’s. He works in the developing lab. So what?” 
“Maybe Terry could borrow an old camera from the store,” Michael suggested. 
“You can bring it in and tell Mr. Saur it’s the evil camera.” 

“Just one problem,” I told Michael. “I have to prove the camera is evil. How do I 
do that?” 

Michael thought about it. And thought. 

8 

“It won’t work,” I sighed. “We have to go get the real camera.” I glanced around 
the table. “Who will go with me?” 

No one answered. Bird concentrated on getting the egg salad out from under his 

fingernails. Shari twisted a lock of black hair around one finger. Michael stared 
at the 

floor. 

“Don’t all volunteer at once,” I grumbled. 

They still didn’t move. 

“I just need the camera for one day,” I added. “Then we’ll return it and never 
take 

it out again.” 

No one replied. Bird raised his beady little eyes to the ceiling and started 



whistling to himself. 

I sneered at them. “Okay, wimps. I’ll go by myself.” 

“Don’t do it,” Shari warned again. “Not even for a day. Something horrible will 
happen. I know it will.” 

If only I had listened to her. 

9 



4 


The rest of the afternoon, I barely heard a word anyone said. I think I had a 
spelling 

quiz. I think we played volleyball in gym. I think someone slammed the ball 
onto my 

head. 

Did it hurt? Did I have to leave the game for a while? 

I really don’t remember. 

In music class, Miss Jakes caught me staring out the window, a dazed look on 
my 

face. She thought it was because of the volleyball accident. She wanted to send 
me to 

the nurse. 

But I explained that I was okay. I told her I wasn’t hurt—I was only 
daydreaming. 

I didn’t explain that I was thinking hard. Thinking about that evil camera hidden 
away in the Coffman house. 

Thinking about how I was going to sneak out after dinner. Ride my bike up the 
hill to the deserted old house. Creep down to the basement—and pull the camera 
from its hiding place in the wall. 

I’m going to prove the camera is evil, Sourball. I’m going to prove you’re wrong 
and unfair! I thought bitterly. 



I’m going to prove it to Brian and Donny and all the other kids who laughed at 
my story. 

I’m going to get an A for my report. Not an F. 

I thought about all that. And I thought about Shari, Michael, and Bird. 

I didn’t blame my friends for being scared. I was scared, too. I promised myself 
I’d be really careful. 

I’ll bring it to school. But I won’t take anyone’s picture with it, I decided. 

Then how would I prove to Mr. Saur that the camera is evil? 

I thought hard. I’ll take a snapshot of the empty classroom, I decided. Or maybe 
the lunchroom or the gym when no one is there. 

As soon as Mr. Saur changes my grade to an A, I’ll return the camera, I promised 
myself. I’ll shove it back into its hiding place. And I’ll never take it out again. 
After school, I searched for Shari. She lives next door, so we usually walk home 
together. But I didn’t see her anywhere. 

I crossed the street, kicking a bottle cap I found at the curb. Thinking about my 
plan. Thinking about the camera. 

I had walked about half a block when I heard voices behind me. “Greg! Hey— 
Greg!” 

Two hands grabbed my shoulders and spun me around hard. 


Brian Webb! 



10 


“Greg—Donny and I went to the Coffman house!” he exclaimed, grinning, 
holding me in place. “We found the evil camera!” 

“Say cheese!” Donny cried. 

He pointed the camera and flashed it in my face. 

11 



5 


I uttered a hoarse cry. 

And shut my eyes against the white flash. 

Something horrible is going to happen to me now, I realized. 

The picture is going to show me in pain. In agony. In terrible trouble. And then 
it’s going to come true! 

When I opened my eyes, Brian and Donny were laughing. They slapped each 
other a high five. 

I stared at the camera in Donny’s hand. 

A yellow cardboard camera. One of those cheap throwaway cameras. 

Not the evil camera. Not the old camera from the Coffman house. 

“Good joke, guys!” I said sarcastically. I blinked several times, trying to make 
the 

yellow dots disappear. “You guys are a riot.” 

“You’re the funny one!” Brian shot back. “That was such a funny story you told 
in class!” 

“Yeah. It had us all laughing,” Donny chimed in. 

I stared angrily at them. My heart thumped loudly. Sumo One and Sumo Two. 
They were so big, they nearly blocked out the sunlight! 

I knew they wanted to keep on teasing me. Have some more laughs at my 



expense. Maybe get into a fight. 

But I didn’t have time to fight with them. 

“Maybe you won’t be laughing tomorrow,” I murmured. Then I turned, jogged 
across the street, and headed for home. 

At dinner, I stared down at my plate. I was too nervous to eat. My stomach felt 
as if it 

were tied in a tight knot. 

“Pass the potatoes,” my brother, Terry, said with a mouth full of chicken. 

“It’s not potatoes. It’s turnips,” Mom corrected him. 

Terry shrugged. “Whatever.” He scooped a pile onto his plate and began 
spooning them quickly into his mouth. 

“Slow down, Terry,” Dad scolded. “You’re eating so fast, you don’t know what 
you’re eating!” 

“Sure, I do,” Terry protested. “I’m eating dinner!” 

Mom and Dad laughed. 

Terry looks a lot like me—blond hair, green eyes, kind of a goofy smile. We 
could almost be twins, except that he’s sixteen, four years older than me. 

“Why are you in such a hurry?” Mom asked him. 

12 

Terry burped. “Excuse me.” He licked chicken grease off his fingers. “I have to 
get back to work. A lot of special orders came in today. So I promised Mr. 



Kramer 


I’d put in a few extra hours in the developing lab.” 

“You’re learning a lot about photography—aren’t you?” Dad said. 

“Yeah. A lot.” 

Oh, please! I thought. Please don’t talk about photography! 

I knew that soon after dinner, I’d be sneaking out to that creepy old deserted 
house. I didn’t want to think about cameras or photography. 

Terry’s chair scraped the floor as he jumped to his feet. He tossed his greasy 
napkin onto the table. “Got to run. See you later.” He loped to the door. 

“Don’t you have any homework tonight?” Mom called after him. 

“No,” he shouted from the front hall. “They don’t give homework in high 
school!” The front door slammed behind him. 

“What a comedian,” Dad muttered, shaking his head. 

They both suddenly remembered that I was at the table, too. “Greg—you haven’t 
touched your chicken!” Mom said, staring at my full plate. 

“I ate too much junk after school,” I lied. “I’m not too hungry.” 

“Your mom and I are going over to Alana’s after dinner,” Dad told me. Alana is 
Mom’s sister. “Alana still isn’t feeling well. Do you want to come with us?” 
“Uh... no,” I replied, thinking hard. “I’ve got too much homework. I’m going to 


be studying all night.” 



I don’t like to lie to Mom and Dad—if I can help it. 

Tonight I couldn’t help it. 

“How are your grades this semester?” Mom asked. 

“Yes, how are they?” Dad repeated, leaning closer. “Pete and Alice out in 

Yosemite called me this afternoon. They asked if you are coming to visit them 
this 

summer. I told them we’d know as soon as your next report card arrives.” 

“Uh... I’m doing real well,” I told them, staring down at my chicken and turnips. 
I’ll be doing real well after tomorrow, I thought. My stomach knotted even 
tighter. 

Mom and Dad stood up to clear the table. “Pete and Alice said to be sure to bring 
a camera,” Dad said. “It’s such beautiful country out there.” 

“Maybe Terry can get you a good camera at the store,” Mom suggested. 

Please stop talking about cameras! I thought, gritting my teeth. “Maybe he can,” 
I said. 

I waited till Mom and Dad drove off for Alana’s house. Then I waited ten 
minutes 

more. Sometimes they forget something, turn around, and come back home. 

I peered out the window. Under the white moonlight, the bare trees were bending 
and shaking. A breezy night. Still cold even though spring was only a few weeks 


away. 



I pulled a long-sleeved flannel shirt over my T-shirt. Tucked a pocket flashlight 
into my jeans. And headed out to the garage to get my bike. 

The swirling wind felt heavy and wet. I glanced up at the sky, hoping it wasn’t 
getting ready to rain. A pale half-moon floated over the quivering trees. 

13 

The front tire on my bike was a little low. But I guessed I could make it up the 

hill to the Coffman house. I walked the bike out of the garage, then climbed on. 

I’d left all the lights on in the house. From the driveway, it looked so bright and 

warm and safe. For a moment, I was tempted to go back inside and forget about 
the 

evil camera. 

But my mind was made up. I desperately wanted to visit my cousins this 
summer. 

No way I could do that if I got an F from Mr. Saur on my report. 

I took a deep breath. Clicked on the bike headlight. And pedaled down to the 
street. 

It was lucky that Mom and Dad had to go away, I told myself. At least I didn’t 
have to sneak out of the house. 

“That’s it, Greg,” I said out loud, pedaling harder. “Look on the bright side.” 

The street seemed darker than usual. Glancing up, I saw that two streetlights 
were 


out. 



The wind swept toward me. On both sides, the trees appeared to be shivering. I 

swerved to miss a sheet of old newspaper fluttering across the street. 

I shifted gears as the street sloped uphill. I pictured the ramshackle old Coffman 

house. Hidden behind ancient oak trees at the top of a weed-choked lawn. 

I remembered that it stood three stories tall, gray shingle, with a wraparound 

screened porch, a sloping red roof, and tall chimneys on either end. 

Many years ago, it must have been a really fancy house. But no one had lived in 

it for dozens of years. And the house had crumbled and decayed until it looked 
like a 

wreck. 

I crossed a street, pedaling smoothly and steadily uphill. Familiar houses rolled 
past in the darkness. And then a small wooded area. 

I felt my throat tighten. And my hands grow cold. 

The house—the Coffman house—stood just beyond the woods. 

The tree branches swayed, glowing gray—the color of bone—under the cold 
moonlight. 

I squeezed the brake as I rolled past the woods. 

Past the sloping lawn. Past the ancient oak trees. 

Up to the old house—and gasped in shock. 


14 



6 


The house was gone. 

I jumped off my bike and let it fall to the sidewalk. I uttered a low cry of 
surprise. 

Then I blinked several times. Tried to make the big, old house appear where it 
belonged behind the oak trees. 

But no. 

The trees rose up over the lawn, silvery-gray in the moonlight. Now they 
protected only scattered piles of boards and shingles. 

The house had been torn down. 

Totaled. 

Dazed, I stood at the curb, staring up to where the house should be. Staring hard. 
Trying to force it to come back. 

A minute or two later, I felt a stab of pain—and slapped a mosquito on my 

forehead. It’s too early in the spring for mosquitoes, I thought. I felt wet blood 
on my 

forehead. 

Rubbing the bite, I turned to the gravel driveway. And saw a stenciled sign near 
the street: SOLD. 

So the Coffman house had been sold. 

And the new owner tore it down. 



I rubbed the mosquito bite, thinking hard. The house was gone. But what about 
the basement? 

What about the basement workshop? I remembered it so well. I remembered the 
worktable. And I remembered the hiding place in the wall above it. The small 
compartment where the camera lay hidden away. 

What about the basement? 

Before I even realized it, my feet were carrying me up the hill. My sneakers slid 
over the slick, tall grass. I inhaled the fresh dew. I kept my eyes locked on the 
trembling silver trees. 

I stepped around a pile of rusted nails and bolts. Jumped over a low stack of 

rotted shingles. Shingles that had been pulled off the house. 

Halfway up the lawn, I could see what else was left of the house. Wooden doors 

stacked in a high pile. Broken glass over the ground. Window frames leaning 
against 

a wall of rotting boards. Cracked shingles everywhere. A white sink on its side 
against a tree. An old washtub resting beside it. 

But what about the basement? 

I crept closer. My legs suddenly felt heavy. My whole body felt heavy—as if 
some invisible force were pushing me back, pushing me away. 

15 

A deep shadow ran along the ground behind the round, old oaks. At first glance, 



I 

thought I was staring at a pool of water. A small lake. 

But as I made my way closer, I saw that the deep shadow was a hole. A huge, 
square pit in the ground. 

The basement. 

Nothing but a hole now. 

I stopped at the edge, my body feeling even heavier. Heavy with disappointment. 
I stopped and stared down into the deep hole. 

The trees shut out most of the moonlight. With a trembling hand, I pulled out my 

pocket flashlight and clicked it on. I aimed the narrow beam of yellow light into 
the 

hole. 

Empty down there. The light slid over the dirt. On one side, thick tree roots 
poked 

into the open square. 

I ran the light over the pit walls. Tangles of roots spread over the smooth, black 
dirt. 

Nothing left. The basement had been completely cleared out. Even the concrete 
floor had been broken up and carted away. 

And where was the camera? 


Where? 



Had someone found it? Pulled it out and kept it? 

Or had it been crushed when the workers smashed the concrete? Crushed and 
destroyed forever? 

I moved the beam of light back and forth along the far wall. I’m not sure what I 
expected to see. 

Did I think I’d find the camera hidden in its square hole in the pit wall? Did I 
think I would see it in a corner of the muddy floor? 

The light swept over dirt and knots of tree roots. 

Nothing else. 

I clicked off the flashlight and shoved it into my pocket. 

I turned away from the hole, side-stepping a pile of broken shingles. 

A strong gust of wind made the old trees groan and creak. I barely noticed the 
eerie sounds. 

I’m going to get an F, I thought unhappily. 

The camera is gone forever, and I’m going to get an F. 

My summer is ruined. And the other kids in class will never believe me. They 
will laugh at me and click cameras at me forever. 

I let out a long, glum sigh. 

Angrily, I kicked a broken board out of my path and started down the lawn to my 


bike. 



I had taken four or five steps when a shrill voice yelled, “Caught you! You’re not 


going anywhere!” 
16 



7 


The high voice in the night air startled me. Without thinking, I started to run. 
Then 

stopped. 

I spun around, my heart heaving against my chest. 

And saw a boy. About my age. He had picked up a board from the ground and 
held it high, as if ready to swing it. 

He wore a black sweatshirt over faded jeans, holes in both knees. His dark hair 
was cut very short. He glared at me with dark, tense eyes. 

“Dad—I caught him!” he shouted. He had a high, shrill voice that made him 
sound like a little kid. 

“Whoa. What do you mean?” I cried. “Caught me?” 

“Don’t move,” he ordered me, raising the board higher. He took a step closer. 
Then another. His eyes burned hard into mine. 

“I wasn’t doing anything!” I told him. “I—I was just looking.” 

As he stepped up to me, I saw his expression change. The anger faded from his 
eyes. His mouth slid open. 

“You—you’re not him!” he stammered. 

“Huh? Who?” I cried. “I’m not who?” 

“Hey—I’m sorry,” he said, shaking his head. “I thought you were someone 
else.” 



“Well... I’m not someone else!” I replied. “I’m me.” 

“There’s a kid who lives down the block,” the boy explained, scratching his dark 

crew cut. “He’s been sneaking over here at night and stealing stuff from the 
yard.” 

My eyes wandered over the cluttered lawn. “What was he stealing? There isn’t 
much left.” 

The boy nodded. He tossed away the board he planned to use as a weapon. It 
clattered against a pile of boards beside me. “He was taking lumber and stuff. I 
thought you were him.” 

“Did your family buy the Coffman house?” I asked. Even though it was such a 

cool, windy night, my forehead was all sweaty. I reached up and mopped the 
sweat 

with the back of my hand. 

“Yeah. We bought it,” he replied. “But Dad said the house was too wrecked to 
fix 

up. So he had it torn down. We’re going to build a new house.” 

The wind made the trees creak again. I glanced down to the street and saw the 
back wheel of my bike spinning. 

“People told us the Coffman house was haunted,” the boy said. “So I’m glad 
Dad 

tore it down.” He kicked at a shingle on the ground. “My name is Jon. What’s 
yours?” 



“Greg. I—I live down at the bottom of the hill. A few blocks past the school.” 

17 

I gazed to where the house had stood. “My friends and I used to sneak into the 
old house,” I told him. “You know. Just for fun. For excitement. I think it was 
haunted. Really.” 

He narrowed his eyes at me, studying me. “What were you doing here?” he 
demanded. “Why did you come up here tonight?” 

I decided to tell him the truth. “I was looking for something,” I said. “A camera.” 
He scratched his short hair again. “An old camera?” 

“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “An old camera. It was hidden down in the basement. 
Did you see it?” 

“Yeah,” Jon replied. “The men dug it up when they pulled out the basement.” 
“Oh, wow!” I cried. I couldn’t hide my excitement. “Where is it, Jon? I mean— 
what did they do with it? Do you know where it is?” 

He pointed over my shoulder toward the street. “Probably over there,” he said. “I 
don’t think they emptied it yet.” 

I spun around and saw a big Dumpster on the other side of the driveway. “They 
threw it in there?” I demanded. 

I didn’t wait for him to answer. I started running full speed through the tall 
weeds 

to the street. I stopped in front of the big steel Dumpster. I could see all kinds of 



junk 

piled over the top. 

“Is it okay to look for it?” I called back to Jon. 

He came walking slowly down to me, hands shoved in his pockets. “Sure. Go 
ahead. Why do you want a stupid old camera, anyway?” 

I didn’t answer him. No time for answering questions. 

I lifted both hands to the top of the Dumpster. It was pretty high. It took me three 
tries to pull myself up and in. 

A street lamp across the street cast a glow of dim yellow light over the 
Dumpster. 

My eyes wandered quickly over the trash. All stuff from the basement, I 
realized. 

I saw rusted old tools from the workshop. Part of an ancient vacuum cleaner. The 
spin cylinder from a dryer. Old clothes. Torn suitcases. 

Is it here? I asked myself. Is the camera in here? 

I pulled away a broken suitcase and tossed it aside. I grabbed stacks of old 
magazines and shoved them out of the way. 

I’m going to search every inch of this Dumpster till I find it, I told myself. 

I pulled away a torn section of a garden hose. Then I pawed through a pile of old 
clothes. 


Where is it? Where? 



I dropped onto my hands and knees and dug deeper into the garbage. The stale 

odor of dust and decay floated up to me, swept over me. I held my breath and 
kept 

pawing away. 

I had to find it. I had to. 

I didn’t stop until I saw the two eyes staring up at me. 

Two eyes. Yellow in the pale light. 

Staring up at me from the trash. Staring up at me without blinking. 

I’m not alone in here! I realized. 

And then I opened my mouth in a shrill, terrified scream. 

18 


19 



8 


The eyes stared up at me without blinking. Yellow and cold. 

A chill tightened the back of my neck. 

I stared down at them, waiting for them to move. Waiting for something to jump 
up at me. 

“What’s wrong? Did you find the camera?” Jon called from the sidewalk. 

“No. I—uh—I—” 

I reached my hand down toward the glassy yellow eyes. And felt bristly fur. 

My heart pounding, I pushed some junk aside. 

And without thinking, I picked up the staring creature. 

Felt its body, stiff and hard beneath bristly brown and black fur. 

A dead raccoon. 

Its sour odor reached my nostrils. “Oooooh, yuck!” I let out a groan—and 
heaved 

the smelly creature out of the Dumpster. 

“Hey, Greg—” Jon called up to me. 

“I found a dead raccoon,” I told him, holding my nose. “It smelled so bad, I—” 

I stopped when I saw the camera. 

It had been hidden beneath the raccoon’s body. The glow from the street lamp 

spilled over it. The glass of the camera lens reflected the light like a single, 
shining 



eye. 


I grabbed it. Pulled it up from the trash. 

Then I climbed to my feet. Leaning over the Dumpster, I held it up to Jon. “I 
found it!” I cried happily. “Here it is. I can’t believe I found it!” 

Jon wrinkled his face up at me. “Great,” he said, without enthusiasm. 

I strapped the camera around my neck. Then, holding on to the top of the 
Dumpster, I lowered myself to the ground. 

My shirt and jeans were covered with dust and sticky grease. But I didn’t care. I 
had the camera in my hands. 

“What’s so great about it?” Jon demanded. He squinted down at it. Rubbed a 
hand over the top. “Does it work?” 

I didn’t want to tell him the story of the camera. I knew he wouldn’t believe it, 

anyway. I didn’t want to scare him. And mainly, I wanted to get home with it as 
fast 

as I could. 

“Yeah. It works,” I replied, dusting off the back with my hand. “It takes pretty 
good pictures.” 

“But why do you want it so much?” Jon asked, studying it as I worked to clean 
the dust off. 

20 

“Oh... well. I promised to show it to someone. In school,” I told him. “I kind of 



need it for a project.” 

Jon scratched his short, dark hair. “Maybe I should show the camera to my dad,” 
he said, motioning behind him. “He might not want you to take it.” 

“But you threw it in the trash!” I cried. I held the camera tightly in both hands, 
afraid he was going to try to grab it away. 

“But we didn’t know it works,” Jon replied in his high, shrill voice. “Is it 
valuable? Maybe it’s valuable. An antique or something.” 

“No way. It’s not valuable,” I insisted. “Please, Jon. I—” 

“We’d better show it to Dad,” Jon said. He reached for the camera. 

I pulled away. 

I grabbed the camera tighter. 

Heard a click. 

A white flash of light startled us both. 

“Oh, noooo!” I let out a cry, realizing I had pushed the shutter. 

And snapped a picture of Jon. 


21 



9 


“Hey—why did you do that?” Jon demanded. 

“It—it was an accident,” I stammered. I pulled the picture from the slot at the 
bottom of the camera. “I didn’t mean to. Really.” 

Jon and I both blinked several times, trying to get the flashing lights to fade from 

our eyes. “It’s an instant camera?” Jon demanded. “It looks too old to be an 
instant 

camera.” 

“Yeah. I know,” I replied. I held up the photo to watch it develop. Silently, I 

prayed that the photo wouldn’t show anything terrible. 

Please, please—let Jon be okay in the snapshot, I pleaded. 

With my free hand, I pulled the little flashlight from my pocket. I beamed it 
down 

on the photo as it slowly developed. 

As I stared at the small, square snapshot, I could see Jon’s face come into view. 
His eyes were closed. His mouth was open, twisted in a strange expression. 
Before I could really see what was going on, Jon grabbed the photo away from 
me. He raised it close to his face and studied it. 

“Hey—what’s with this camera?” he demanded. 

I stepped up behind him to see the snapshot. “Oh, nooooo,” I groaned. 

The photo came out very clear and bright. It showed Jon howling in pain. His 



eyes shut. His mouth open in a scream. 

His leg was raised. He was holding on to his sneaker with both hands. 

He was holding on to his sneaker because a huge nail was sticking up from the 

top. An enormous carpenter’s nail—nearly as big as a pencil—shoved up 
through the 

center of Jon’s foot! 

Jon laughed. He turned to me. “What is this? Some kind of joke camera?” 

I swallowed hard. I knew it wasn’t a joke. 

The horrifying photos always came true. 

How could I keep Jon from having a nail jammed in his foot? What could I do? 

I decided I had to warn him. I had to tell him the truth about the camera. 

“This is cool!” Jon exclaimed, studying the photo. “It really looks like me. I 
wonder how it works.” 

“It—it isn’t cool,” I stammered. “It’s really kind of scary, Jon. The camera is 
evil. 

It has a curse on it. The photos always come true.” 

He laughed. “For sure!” 

I knew he wouldn’t believe me. 

“Well, just be careful—okay?” I insisted. “The photo isn’t a joke.” 

He laughed again. 


22 



A gust of wind sent the tall weeds swaying. Snakes of black cloud slithered over 
the moon. Darkness swept over us. 

“I need to borrow the camera,” I told Jon. “Just for one day.” 

“It’s such a cool camera,” he replied. “I don’t know. Maybe I should take it 
home.” 

“I’ll bring it back tomorrow afternoon,” I promised. “I just have to take it to 
school.” 

He twisted his mouth, thinking hard. “I’d better ask my dad.” He pointed to a 

wall of lumber under the trees. “He’s back there with the architect, talking about 
the 

new house.” 

“No. Wait!” I cried. 

But Jon took off, running up the hill through the swaying weeds. 

I started after him—but stopped when I heard a shrill bleat. And then Jon’s 
horrifying roar of pain soared out over the lawn. 


23 



10 


My breath caught in my chest. I stumbled forward through the weeds. 

And saw Jon holding his sneaker, his face twisted in pain. 

Even in the dim moonlight, I could see the huge nail pushing up through his 
foot. 

“Jon!” I shouted. “I’ll get your dad!” 

I didn’t need to find him. Two men—one tall and thin, the other chubby and 

short—rushed out from behind the lumber pile. I guessed they were the architect 
and 

Jon’s dad. 

“Jon? What’s wrong?” the chubby one—Jon’s dad—called. 

Jon tossed back his head in another scream of pain. 

“He’s got a nail in his foot!” I shouted, running up to them, pointing frantically. 

Both men ran past me. “Oh, good heavens!” Jon’s dad moaned. 

They grabbed Jon under the arms. The tall man held Jon’s injured foot above the 

ground. “Into my car,” he urged. “I have a towel. We can wrap the foot. He’s 
losing a 

lot of blood.” 

“Should we pull out the nail?” Jon’s dad asked in a quivering voice. 

“No. Too dangerous,” the other man replied. 

“Don’t pull it out! Don’t!” Jon pleaded. “It’ll hurt too much!” 



“We can’t even take off the sneaker!” Jon’s dad cried. 


“The hospital is that way,” the architect said, pointing. “Only a few minutes 
away.” 

“Owwww. It hurts! It hurrrrts!” Jon wailed. 

The two men lifted him off the ground. And half-walking, half-running, they 

carried him down to a car parked across from the Dumpster. 

I watched from the weeds as they gently lowered Jon into the backseat. I saw 

them struggle with a long white towel. Finally, they had it tightly wrapped 
around the 

foot and sneaker. 

They closed Jon’s car door. Then they quickly slid into the front. A few seconds 
later, the car roared off into the darkness. 

I stood in the middle of the yard, feeling the swaying weeds brush against my 
jeans legs. I swallowed hard. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. 

“Poor Jon,” I murmured out loud. 

The camera was as evil as ever. Tonight it had found another victim. 

It’s all my fault, I thought sadly. It was an accident. I didn’t mean to press the 
shutter. But I pressed it. 

The two men hadn’t even looked at me. They were so upset about Jon, I don’t 
think they saw me. 


24 



I glanced down and realized that I still gripped the camera in my hands. I had a 

strong urge to heave it to the ground. To stomp on it again and again until I 
smashed 

it forever. 

My eye caught something fluttering in the tall grass. I bent and picked it up. The 
snapshot. 

I squinted once again at Jon, holding his foot, shrieking in pain. 

I tucked the snapshot into the pocket of my flannel shirt. I’ll bring it in to Mr. 
Saur, I decided. I’ll bring in the camera and the photo of Jon. I’ll tell him exactly 
what happened to Jon tonight. 

I won’t have to snap a picture in school. 

I have this picture as proof. 

So it won’t be dangerous. It won’t be dangerous at all. 


25 



11 


The next morning, I gulped down my breakfast. Then I pulled on my backpack, 
strapped the camera around my neck, and hurried out the door. 

I left the house fifteen minutes early. I didn’t want to run into Shari, or Michael, 
or Bird. 

I stepped out into a warm day. The air smelled fresh and sweet. I saw a row of 
tulips poking up through the ground along the side of the house. First flowers of 
spring. 

I loped down the driveway and turned at the sidewalk. The camera felt heavy 
against my chest. I reached up to adjust the strap—and heard a voice calling me. 
“Greg! Hey, Greg—wait up!” 

Shari. 

I spun the camera behind me and tried to hide it under my arm. 

Too late. She had already spotted it. 

“I don’t believe you!” Shari cried, running up beside me. “You’re unreal! You 

pulled that thing from the Coffman house?” She stared at the camera, shaking 
her 

head. 

“Well... not exactly,” I replied. “How come you’re so early, Shari?” 

“I was watching out the window for you,” she confessed. “I wanted to see if you 



were crazy enough to get that camera.” 

I frowned at her. “You were spying on me? Why?” 

“Because I’m not letting you take that evil thing to school.” She stepped in front 
of me, blocking my way. 

I snickered. “Who made you queen of the world?” I sneered. “It’s a free country, 
you know.” 

She crossed her arms over the front of her plaid vest. “I’m serious, Greg. You 
can’t take it. I won’t let you.” 

I faked to the left and tried to edge past her on the right. 

But she stayed in front of me. I bumped into her—then backed up a step. 

“I’m serious,” she repeated. “Take the camera home.” 

“Shari, you’re being a real jerk,” I muttered. “You can’t tell me what to do.” 

Her expression changed. She uncrossed her arms and tugged her black hair back 

over her shoulders. “Don’t you remember how dangerous that camera is? Don’t 
you 

remember all the horrible things it did to us?” 

I gripped the camera in both hands. It suddenly felt very heavy. The metal felt 
cold against the front of my T-shirt. 

26 

“Don’t you remember, Greg?” Shari pleaded. “I disappeared because of that 
camera. Disappeared into thin air! You don’t want that to happen to someone 



else— 


do you? Think how terrible you’d feel.” 

I swallowed hard, remembering the night before. 

The camera had already injured someone. 

“I’m not going to take any pictures,” I told her. “Really. I’m just going to show it 
to Mr. Saur so he’ll change my grade.” 

“Why will seeing an old camera make him change your grade?” Shari 
demanded. 

“Because I have a photo to show him, too,” I declared. I pulled the snapshot of 
Jon out of my pocket and flashed it in front of her face. 

“Oooh—gross!” she cried, shoving the photo away with both hands. “That is 
sick!” 

“I know,” I agreed, sliding the photo back in my pocket. “The poor kid. I took 
this picture. Then, a minute later, it really happened to him.” 

“So I’m right!” Shari declared, her eyes narrowed at the camera in my hands. 
“You just proved my point—didn’t you, Greg! I’m right!” 

A car rumbled past, filled with kids on their way to school. A small brown dog 
stuck its head out the back window and barked at us. 

I glanced at my watch. If we stayed here arguing another few minutes, Shari and 

I 


would be late for school. 



“We’ve got to go,” I told her. I started walking, taking long strides. But she 
hurried to block my way. 

“No, Greg. I can’t let you. I can’t.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Shari, give me a break.” 

“It’s too dangerous,” she insisted. “I know I’m right. I know it will get you into 
big trouble.” 

“Get out of my way, Shari.” 

“Give me the camera.” 

“No way!” I cried. 

She grabbed for it with both hands. And yanked it off my shoulder. 

I grabbed it back. 

And the camera flashed in Shari’s face. 


27 



12 


Shari blinked. Her hands shot away from the camera. She let out a startled cry. 
“Oh! Sorry!” I cried, backing away. “Sorry! Really! I’m sorry! I didn’t mean to 


The camera felt warm in my hands. I reached for the square photo that slid from 
the slot. 

“Give me that!” Shari demanded. She swiped the snapshot away from me. 
“What 

have you done to me?” 

“It was an accident!” I shouted. “You know I didn’t mean to snap it.” 

Shari stared down at the square as it started to develop. “What have you done? 

What have you done?” she repeated. Her voice trembled more each time she said 
it. I 

saw that her hand was shaking. 

“I told you not to bring out the camera,” Shari cried. “I begged you to leave it at 
home.” 

“Shari, I’m sorry,” I apologized again. “Maybe it won’t be so bad. Maybe—” 

She swallowed hard. “Maybe I’ll disappear again, Greg. Maybe I’ll disappear 
forever.” 


“No!” I cried. “Don’t say that. Please 



We both stared down at the photo. It developed so slowly. First, the yellow 
darkened over the white square. I began to see Shari’s face. 

Was she screaming? Was she howling in pain? 

I couldn’t tell. 

The blue tint filled in over the yellow. I could see Shari’s face outlined in green. 
“You look okay,” I told her. “I think you’re okay.” 

“Wait,” she said softly. She bit her lower lip. She didn’t blink. Her eyes squinted 
hard as the red and blue tints spread. 

The picture darkened. Darkened to black. 

I could see Shari’s face clearly now. She wasn’t smiling. She didn’t look happy. 
But she wasn’t screaming, either. 

Darker. 

“Hey!” Shari cried. “It’s a negative.” 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand. 

“It’s not a photo,” Shari replied, holding the square up to me. “It’s a negative. 

The photo didn’t come out. It’s all reversed.” 

I stared at it. She was right. Everything was reversed. 

“Maybe the camera is broken,” I said. I let out a long sigh of relief. “You’re 
okay, 

Shari. The camera doesn’t work.” 


28 



“Maybe,” she said. She handed me the negative. I slid it into my pocket. When I 
looked up, she had a strange smile on her face. 

An evil smile. 

“Shari—what’s your problem?” I asked. 

I should have known. I should have guessed what she planned to do. I should 
have moved faster. 

She grabbed the camera with both hands. Spun it around. Pointed it in my face. 
And flashed a picture. 

“Hey!” I tried to duck away from the lens. 

Too late. She caught me. 

“Shari—that’s not funny!” I cried. 

“It won’t hurt you,” she replied. “The camera is broken—remember?” 

I pulled the square from the slot in front of the camera. 

My throat suddenly felt dry. Is it broken? I wondered. Will this one be a 
negative, 

too? 

Or will it show me howling in pain with a nail through my foot—or something 
even worse? 

As I stared at the small square, my imagination ran wild. I pictured my body 

stretched out like a rubber band. I pictured myself tugging at an arrow through 
my 



chest. I pictured myself lying mashed under a huge steamroller. 

“Shari—how could you do this to me?” I groaned, watching the colors darken. 

Her dark eyes flashed. “You’re really scared,” she said. “Admit it, Greg. You’re 

really scared. Now maybe you get it. Maybe you see why I didn’t want you to 
bring 

the camera to school.” 

My hand trembled. I gripped the snapshot with both hands. 

The colors darkened. 

“It’s not a negative,” I said. 

Shari stepped up behind me and stared down at the photo. 

“Oh, noooo!” we both cried at the same time. 

Shari started to laugh. 

“I don’t believe this!” I wailed. 


29 



13 

“This is horrible !” I shrieked. 

I recognized my face. But I didn’t recognize my body. 

At first, I thought my head was resting on top of a giant balloon. Then I realized 
that the giant balloon was me. 

In the photo, I weighed about four hundred pounds! 

No joke. Four hundred pounds! 

I gaped at the photo, studying my round face and my even rounder body. I had 

about eight chins. My cheeks were puffed way out. The collar of my T-shirt was 

hidden under one of my flabby chins. The shirt was stretched tight over my chest 
and 

only came down to my belly, which bulged nearly to the ground. 

I looked like a really gross mountain of pudding! 

“Stop laughing!” I snapped at Shari. “It isn’t funny!” 

“It’s very funny,” she insisted. She grabbed the photo, raised it to her face, and 

started laughing all over again. “You’re bigger than Sumo One and Sumo Two!” 
she 

exclaimed. 

I grabbed the photo back. I stared at the folds of flab hanging down from my 
cheeks. My face was so huge and puffy, my eyes looked like tiny pig eyes. 

And my stomach! My stomach hung down over my fat knees! 



“Are you still going to bring the camera to school?” Shari asked. “You won’t 
change your mind?” 

“I have to show it to Mr. Saur,” I told her. “I’m just going to show him the 
camera. And the picture of Jon.” 

“And the picture of you?” she asked, grinning. 

“No way.” I shoved it into my jeans pocket. “I don’t want anyone to see it. 
Ever.” 

Shari glanced at her watch. “Come on,” she said. “We’d better hurry! We’re 
late.” 

She started to run down the sidewalk, and I followed her. 

All the way to school, I kept picturing my photo. Kept picturing my flabby face, 
my enormous four-hundred-pound body. 

Don’t worry about it, I told myself. 

The camera is broken. There’s nothing to worry about. 

Nothing to worry about. 

But guess what? I was worried. 

The halls were nearly empty when Shari and I arrived at school. The first bell 
had 

already rung. 

30 

I hid the camera under a bunch of stuff on the floor of my locker. I didn’t have 



Mr. Saur’s English class until just before lunch. And I didn’t want to take a 
chance of 

Brian or Donny or somebody else grabbing the camera and messing around with 
it. 

I slammed the locker shut and locked it. Then I waved to Bird and Michael, who 
were hurrying into their classroom. 

I wanted to tell them I had the camera. And I wanted to tell them about Jon and 
the nail in his foot. 

But I decided I’d better keep quiet. 

Michael and Bird agreed with Shari. They didn’t want me to take the camera out 
again. They were too afraid of it. 

And, they were probably right. 

I slid into class just as the final bell rang. I ducked low in my seat, trying not to 

be noticed. I had a long time to wait until Mr. Saur’s class. 

Today was the first day ever that I couldn’t wait for Sourball’s class to begin! 

Once again, I didn’t hear a word my other teachers said. In social studies, Mrs. 

Wackman was rattling on about bauxite production in South America. I wanted 
to 

raise my hand and ask her what bauxite is! I’ve always wondered about bauxite. 

I 

think it’s some kind of South American car. But I’m not sure. 

Her voice faded into the background. My mind was busy practicing my speech 
to 



Mr. Saur. 


“Mr. Saur,” I planned to say, “you made a terrible mistake yesterday. But I’m not 
going to hold it against you. I know you will be fair and change the grade on my 
report as soon as I show you this.” 

Whoa. 

That’s too stiff, I told myself. That doesn’t sound like me at all. I’ll never be able 
to get those words out. 

I tried a different approach. “Here’s the evil camera, Mr. Saur. And here’s a 

picture it took of a boy I met. A minute later, the picture came true. You asked 
me to 

bring in proof—and here it is.” 

That’s better, I decided. It’s straight to the point. 

Will he believe me? 

He’ll have to, I thought. Photos don’t lie. 

He’ll have to change my grade. 

I stared at the wall clock over the chalkboard. Why was it moving so slowly? 
Why? 

Finally, the bell rang. I jumped up, ran out the door, and dove for my locker. Bird 
called to me from down the hall. But I pretended I didn’t hear him. 

I pulled the camera from its hiding place and slammed the locker door shut. I 
tucked it carefully under my arm, protecting it. 



I saw Sumo One and Sumo Two across the hall. They were shoving a fifth 
grader 

up against a locker. Making him bounce back like a yo-yo. That’s their hobby. 
Making kids bounce. 

And guess who is one of their favorite bouncers? 

That’s right. Me. 

31 

I spun around and hurried the other way. I didn’t feel like bouncing today. And I 
didn’t want Brian and Donny to set their eyes on the camera. 

I took the long way around to Mr. Saur’s class, jogging the whole way. I held the 
camera snugly and practiced my speech. 

A group of kids were talking in front of the classroom, blocking the door. “Make 

way!” I cried, pushing through them. I wanted to see Mr. Saur before the bell 
rang. 

I stepped into the room. Blinked against the bright sunlight streaming through 
the 

windows. 

I turned and ran breathlessly toward Mr. Saur’s desk. 

But I stopped halfway there. 

My heart skipped a beat. And I let out a cry of dismay. 


32 



14 


“May I help you?” asked the young woman sitting behind Mr. Saur’s desk. “Are 
you 

okay?” 

I stared at her with my mouth hanging open to my knees. I didn’t answer her 
questions. I gripped the camera tightly in both hands, afraid I might drop it. 
“Where—where’s Mr. Saur?” I finally managed to choke out. 

“He’s not feeling well,” she replied, studying me. “I’m Ms. Rose. I’m 
substituting today.” 

“He—he’s not here?” I stammered in a high, shrill voice. 

She nodded. “I’ll be teaching the class today. Is there anything I can help you 
with?” 

I glanced down at the camera. “No,” I muttered unhappily. “No. You can’t help 
me.” 

The room was never this noisy when Mr. Saur sat behind the desk. Kids were 

shouting and laughing. Someone tossed a balled-up piece of paper at me. It 
bounced 

off my shoulder and onto Ms. Rose’s desk. I heard loud laughter from the back 
of the 

room. 

We always give substitutes a really hard time. 



When a teacher doesn’t show up, it’s always time to celebrate. But I didn’t feel 
like celebrating today. I was so disappointed. 

I started to my seat—then turned back to Ms. Rose. “Can I put this in my 
locker?” I asked, holding up the camera. “It will only take a second. My locker is 
right out there.” I pointed to the hall. 

The final bell rang. She held her hands over her ears. The bell was on the ceiling 
right over her desk. 

“Okay,” she said when the clanging stopped. “But hurry back. I’m going to be 
talking about the subjunctive tense today. And you don’t want to miss that.” 
Thrills and chills, huh? 

I thanked her and hurried to the door. The long hall stood empty. Everyone was 
in class. 

My sneakers thudded loudly on the hard floor. My mind was racing. Thinking 

about Mr. Saur. And about the camera. I’ll have to leave it in my locker until he 
gets 

back, I decided. 

I promised Jon I’d keep it only for one day. 

But what choice did I have? 

I turned the corner—and bumped into Brian and Donny. 

“Hey—” Brian grunted. 

“Hey—” Donny greeted. 



33 


They say “Hey” a lot. I think it’s their favorite word. 

“You guys are late,” I said, trying to hurry past them. 

But they blocked my way with their big, wide bodies. 

“Sourball isn’t here,” Donny said, grinning. “He’s sick or something. So we’ve 
got a substitute.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered. 

“So we’re in no hurry,” Brian said. “Why should we hurry for a substitute?” 

I tried to slip between them. But they were too quick for me. They squeezed 
together, and I bounced back off them. 

“We’re going to switch places.” Brian grinned. “I’m going to tell her I’m Donny. 
And Donny is going to say he’s me.” 

“Good joke,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “Very original. Now, can I get by?” 

“No way,” Donny said, puffing up his big chest and leaning over me menacingly. 
“You have to pay a toll if you want to pass,” Brian demanded. He stuck out his 
big paw for money. 

“How much is the toll?” I sighed. 

“How much have you got?” Brian shot back. 

They both guffawed and slapped high fives. They really think they’re funny. 
“I’ve got to get to my locker,” I insisted. 



I tried once again to push past them—and Brian grabbed the camera. 

“Hey!” I reached for it with both hands. But Brian raised it high over his head. 
“Look—Greg brought his magic camera to school,” he told Donny. 

“Oooh—I’m scared!” Donny replied sarcastically. He pretended to shiver and 
shake. 

“But the camera is bad!” Brian exclaimed, holding it out of my frantic reach. 
“It’s 

cursed, Donny! You remember Greg’s report.” 

Donny’s ugly grin grew wider. “You mean the report he got an F on?” 

They both had another good laugh. 

“Let’s check it out,” Brian declared. “Say cheese, Greg.” 

He lowered the camera to his eye and aimed it at me. 

“No—please!” I pleaded. I made another grab for the camera. 

But Donny grabbed me and pinned my arms behind my back. “Go ahead. Snap 
it,” he told Brian. “Let’s put a curse on Greg. Snap his picture.” 


34 



15 


“No—please!” I begged. 

Donny wrapped his huge paws tightly around me and pinned my arms against 
my 

back. 

“The camera really is cursed!” I protested. “You don’t know what you’re doing! 
Stop!” 

Brian ignored me, of course. He held the camera to his eye—and raised his 
finger 

over the shutter button. 

“Brian—please!” I wailed. 

I saw his finger lower over the button. 

Then a loud voice called, “What’s going on here, guys?” 

Brian cried out and nearly dropped the camera. Donny dropped my arms and 
stumbled back against the wall. 

“Mr. Grand!” I exclaimed. 

He’s the principal of Pitts Landing Middle School. Mr. Grand is young and has 

blond wavy hair and a really good tan. He looks more like a surfer than a 
principal. 

The girls in our school all have crushes on him. 

For once, I was glad to see him. 



“Where should you guys be right now?” he asked, glancing up at the clock on 
the 

wall. 

“Uh... we’re going to Mr. Saur’s class,” Donny replied, turning bright red. 

“We were just helping Greg with his camera,” Brian added. He handed the 
camera back to me. 

“That looks like a valuable old camera,” Mr. Grand said to me. “You should be 
careful with that, Greg.” 

“I’m trying,” I said. “I’m going to lock it in my locker right now.” 

I pushed past Sumo One and Sumo Two and hurried down the hall. As I reached 

my locker, I heard Mr. Grand scold them: “Get to class, guys. And don’t give 
your 

substitute a hard time—okay?” 

“Okay,” Brian promised. 

“No problem,” Donny agreed. 

I met Shari after school, and we walked home together. “What’s up?” I asked. 

“I got an A on my math test,” she announced. 

“Big surprise. You always get As in math,” I reminded her. 

“So? Maybe I like to brag.” 

I felt a little strange. Tired. Kind of weak. I stopped about half a block from my 
house and tugged off my backpack. 



35 


“What’s your problem?” Shari demanded. “Why do you keep fiddling with that 
backpack?” 

“I think someone messed with it,” I said, loosening the straps. “I had it just right. 
And now it’s too tight.” 

“Why would anyone mess with your backpack?” Shari demanded. She blew a 
bubble-gum bubble nearly as big as her head. 

I stuck out a finger and popped it. 

“Yuck!” she cried out as it stuck all over her face. “Are you impressed? That was 

my biggest one ever,” she declared. “Wish I had a picture of it.” 

“Don’t say picture,” I grumbled. “Don’t say the words picture or camera.” I had 

already told her at lunch about Mr. Saur not showing. 

“Where is the camera?” she asked, pulling gum from her hair. 

“Locked up safe in my locker,” I said. I turned and saw Michael and Bird 
mnning 

down the sidewalk toward us. 

“Did you tell Michael and Bird I have the camera?” I asked Shari. 

She shook her head. “No. They’d be too upset. After all the horrible things it did 

last summer, they never want to see that camera again. And neither do I,” she 
added, 


glaring at me. 



“Hey—what’s up?” Bird called. He slapped me on the back so hard, I stumbled 
off the curb. 

Michael laughed. “You guys doing anything?” 

“Not much,” I replied, straightening my backpack. I still couldn’t get it 
comfortable. 

“Get your bikes,” Michael urged. “Come on. It’s a great day to ride around.” 
“Sounds good,” I agreed. Anything to get my mind off Mr. Saur and that stupid 
camera. 

“Let’s meet at my house,” Shari suggested. “I have to ask my mom first.” 
Michael and Bird jogged toward their houses. Shari and I crossed the street and 
headed to our homes, which are side by side. 

Mom and Dad were at work. Terry wasn’t home from high school yet. I dropped 

the backpack in the front hall. Pulled a box of juice from the refrigerator and 
drank it 

in two long sips from the straw. 

I still felt weak. Kind of lifeless. I thought maybe a long bike ride would help get 
my energy back. 

My jeans felt uncomfortable. A little tight. I ran to my room and pulled on my 

pair of really baggy shorts. Mom and Dad always teased me about these shorts. 
They 

say there’s room enough for a friend inside them. 



But I like them. I think they’re cool. And they’re really comfortable. I usually 
don’t wear them when I ride my bike. They’re so long and baggy, sometimes the 
cuffs get caught in the chain. 

I hurried outside and found Shari, Michael, and Bird waiting for me on their 

bikes. “Let’s go, Greg,” Bird urged. “It’s starting to get cloudy.” 

I pulled open the garage door and stepped inside, careful to walk around the 
black 

oil stains on the concrete floor. I took my bike from against the wall and walked 
it 

out onto the driveway. 

36 

Then, I did my high-flying circus riding trick. It’s my favorite way of getting on 

my bike. I lean on the handlebars and heave myself up in the air. Then I come 
flying 

down on the seat. 

Up I went. Pushed my body into the air. 

Swung my legs in the air. Dropped onto the seat. 

And both tires popped. 

I heard the explosion and then a whoosh of air as the tires flattened against the 
drive. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I cried. 


37 



16 

“Whoa!” Shari cried. 

Michael and Bird burst out laughing. 

“Nice tires,” Michael said. 

“Maybe you should go on a diet!” Bird exclaimed. 

“Huh? A diet?” I repeated, swallowing hard. I knew that Bird was only joking. 
But his words sent a chill down my back. 

The snapshot flashed into my mind. The ugly snapshot from the evil camera. 

I saw myself all bloated and huge. Like an enormous saggy water balloon. 

I felt my face go hot and knew that I was blushing. I saw my friends staring at 
me. I climbed off my bike. “Guess I jumped too hard,” I murmured. 

“Maybe you need a tricycle,” Michael cracked. 

No one laughed. Michael’s jokes never make any sense. 

I squatted down and examined the tires. I ran my hands along the rubber—and 
found two big holes. Two blowouts. And they were new tires, too. 

I dragged the bike back into the garage. “I’ll take Terry’s old bike,” I told my 
friends. 

I actually like my brother’s bike better than mine. It’s a twelve-speed, and mine 
is 

only ten. He hardly ever rides it now that he’s got his driver’s license. But he 
doesn’t 



like me riding it. 

“Better not sit on it!” Bird suggested. “Maybe you should just walk it!” He and 

Michael laughed and slapped each other’s hands. 

“Ha-ha,” I said. “You guys are as funny as a flat tire.” 

“No. We’re as funny as two flat tires!” Michael joked. 

“Maybe you need a mountain bike,” Bird said. “Something sturdy.” 

“Maybe you need a sturdy punch in the face,” I threatened. 

“Just don’t sit on me!” Michael exclaimed, raising both hands in front of him as 
if 

to shield himself from me. 

“Are we going to ride or not?” Shari demanded, sighing. She glanced up at the 
graying sky. “If we don’t hurry, we’re going to get caught in the rain.” 

I eased myself carefully onto Terry’s bike. Then I followed them down the 
driveway and into the street. 

We rode aimlessly around town. When we reached the long, narrow park a few 
blocks from school, we bumped onto the grass and raced as fast as we could. 

Bird has the best bike and the longest legs. So he always wins our races. 

After about an hour, it started to drizzle, so we turned for home. I was glad. My 
legs felt heavy. My muscles ached. 

As we pedaled through the raindrops, I caught Shari watching me. Studying me. 


38 



Despite the sweat rolling down my forehead, I suddenly felt cold all over. Why 
is 

she staring at me like that? I wondered. 

Why? 

The next morning, I woke up with two words on my lips: Mr. Saur. 

Today is the day I show him the camera, I told myself, stretching and yawning. 
And today is the day I get my grade changed. 

I stood up, still yawning. Rubbed my eyes. And saw that my pillow had fallen to 
the floor during the night. 

When I bent over to pick it up, I felt a tug on the front of my pajama shirt. The 
buttons all popped off and scattered over the floor. 

“Huh?” I opened my mouth in surprise—and heard a long rrrrrrip. It took a few 
seconds to realize that my pajama bottoms had ripped right up the back. 

“Oh, nooooo.” I opened my mouth in a long, low moan. 

The collar of the pajama shirt dug tightly into my neck. I tried to loosen it—and 
both sleeves ripped at the shoulder! 

My heart pounding, I straightened up and crossed the room to the mirror. 

My whole body was trembling as I stepped up to the mirror. 

I shut my eyes. I couldn’t bear to look. 

But I had no choice. I had to see. I had to know. 

Slowly, slowly, I opened one eye, then the other. I took a deep breath and gazed 



at my reflection. 

Had the snapshot come true? Did I weigh four hundred pounds? 
39 



17 


I leaned into the mirror and stared at myself. 

No. Not four hundred pounds. 

I didn’t look too different. A little puffy. My cheeks were a little rounder. My 
shoulders were broader. 

I stepped back to check out the rest of my body—and Mom came walking into 
the room. “Greg, what are you doing? You’re going to be late for school.” 

I spun away from the mirror. “Mom—I grew last night!” I blurted out. “I—I 
ripped my pajamas.” 

She narrowed her eyes at the torn pajama top. “Greg, you didn’t grow 
overnight,” 

she said calmly. “Those pajamas always were a little small on you.” 

I turned back to the mirror. “They were?” 

Maybe Mom was right. Maybe I wasn’t growing huge. Maybe it was all in my 
imagination. 

I turned back to her. “How do I look?” 

She shrugged. “You look fine.” 

“I mean, do I look fatter to you?” 

She studied me for a moment. “Well, actually...” Her voice trailed off. 

“Actually what?” I demanded. 



“Maybe I’ll put skim milk on your cereal this morning,” she replied. 

“Hi, Greg. Putting on a little weight?” 

That’s how Mr. Saur greeted me when I hurried up to his desk before English 
class. 

His words sent a cold shiver down the back of my neck. But I ignored them. I 
held up the camera. “Mr. Saur, I want to show you something.” 

He lowered his eyes to the camera and frowned at it. “You want to take my 
picture? I already had my photo taken for the yearbook, Greg.” 

“No,” I replied. “This is the camera, Mr. Saur. This is the camera that—” 

He raised a hand to tell me to stop talking. “Not right now, Greg,” he said, 
climbing up from his desk chair. 

“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. 

He was gazing over my shoulder. I turned and saw Mr. Grand standing in the 
classroom doorway. Mr. Saur hurried over to talk to him. 

They talked until the bell rang. Then Mr. Saur returned to the front of the room 
to 

begin class. “I’m sorry I wasn’t here yesterday,” he announced. “I understand 
you 

had a wonderful time learning the subjunctive tense.” 

40 

I was still standing beside his desk, the camera in my hands. He stepped up to 
the 



chalkboard, turned, and saw me. 

“Greg, take your seat, please,” he said. “We have a lot to do today.” 

“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. I raised the camera. 

“Take your seat,” he insisted. 

I had no choice. I sighed and trudged to my chair near the back of the room. 

How can I prove that my report was true if he won’t even listen to me? I asked 
myself unhappily. 

“Today, we’re going to hear more of your reports about true things that happened 

to you,” Mr. Saur told the class. He turned to a girl in the front row. “Marci, I 
believe 

it is your turn. What is your report about?” 

Marci Ryder stood up. “It’s about my cat, Waffles. It’s about all the funny things 
Waffles does around the house.” 

I groaned. Bor-ring! I thought. A few other kids groaned, too. 

But Mr. Saur actually smiled. The first time ever! 

He practically purred! “I like cats,” he told Marci. “I have six of them myself.” 
Oh, yuck! I thought. Six cats! 

I can’t sit through a boring report about a boring cat! I told myself. 

I shot my hand into the air and waved it frantically. “Mr. Saur? Mr. Saur?” 

The teacher’s smile faded. “Greg—now what?” he demanded. 

“Uh... before Marci starts,” I said, “can I show you the camera? You know. The 



one from my report? You said if I brought it in and proved that it’s evil, you’d 
change my grade.” 

Mr. Saur rubbed his chin and frowned at me. “It’s Marci’s turn,” he replied 
coldly. “I know we all want to hear about Waffles.” 

“But, Mr. Saur—you promised!” I cried. 

A few kids snickered. My voice was so high, only dogs could hear it. 

“Greg, you’re not going to change my mind,” Mr. Saur insisted. 

“But I can prove it!” I pleaded. “I can prove the camera is evil.” 

A few more kids snickered. 

“Greg is evil!” Donny shouted. 

It got a big laugh. 

“Greg is baaaaad! ” some other kid shouted. 

Another big laugh. 

Mr. Saur slammed the chalkboard with his wooden pointer. “Quiet, everyone.” 

He sighed and motioned me forward. “Okay, Greg. One minute. It isn’t fair to 
the 

others to give you extra time. But I’ll give you one minute to show off your 
camera.” 

One minute! 

I knew that’s all I needed. 

I felt my shirt pocket to make sure I had the snapshot of Jon inside. I knew that 



once Sourball saw that photo and heard what happened to Jon that night, he’d 
believe 

me. 

“Come on, Greg,” the teacher urged. “Get up here. One minute.” 

“Coming,” I said. I eagerly tried to stand up. 

41 

Tried again. 

Again. 

We have those chairs with the desk attached to the front. 

And I was stuck in the chair. Too fat to get out! 

42 



18 


What is happening to me? I wondered, feeling panic creep up from my stomach. 
My 

big blobby stomach. 

I climbed into this chair without any problem. That was less than an hour ago. 

And now I’m stuck in here. I must have put on a hundred pounds while I was 
sitting 

here! 

“Greg, we’re waiting.” Mr. Saur rolled his eyes and tapped the chalkboard 
impatiently with the pointer. 

On the fourth try, I finally managed to slide out of the seat. Carrying the camera 
carefully, I tromped up to the front of the room. 

“This is the camera,” I told Mr. Saur. “My friends and I found it in a deserted 
house. Just as I said in my report. The camera has a curse on it, and—” 

He took the camera from my hands and examined it. He rolled it over and over. 
He brought it up close to his face. He raised the viewfinder to his eye. 

“No—don’t!” I shrieked. “Don’t take a picture!” 

He lowered the camera. “If I don’t take a picture, how will I know if the camera 
is evil or not?” 

I reached into my shirt pocket. “I brought a photo,” I told him. “This will prove 
I’m telling the truth.” 



My fingers were so fat, I had trouble poking them into the pocket. My hands felt 
like squishy balls of dough. They were too blobby to make a fist! 

I nearly pulled the pocket off as I struggled to take out the snapshot of Jon. 
Finally, I pulled it out and shoved it in Mr. Saur’s face. “Here. Look!” 

He took the snapshot and studied it. 

“That boy is named Jon,” I told him. “I took his picture two nights ago. He was 

perfectly okay. But the photo showed him with a nail through his foot. Two 
minutes 

later, it came true. Jon got a nail in his foot, and his dad had to rush him to the 
hospital.” 

Mr. Saur burst out laughing. 

Another first. The first time he’d ever laughed in class! 

“It’s not funny,” I insisted. “Poor Jon was in so much pain. He—” 

“I’ve seen those trick nails,” Mr. Saur said, his eyes on the photo. 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand him. 

He handed the photo back to me. “I used to have a fake arrow,” he said. “When I 
slid it on, it looked as if I had an arrow going straight through my head. So I 
understand how you made it appear that this boy has a nail through his foot.” 
“No! It’s real! It’s real!” I cried. “Look how much pain Jon is in! Look at his 
face!” 


43 



“Your friend is a good actor,” Mr. Saur replied. 

“No!” I shrieked. “He isn’t my friend! I don’t even know him! You’ve got to 
believe me! You’ve got to!” 

Mr. Saur glanced up at the clock. “Your minute is up.” 

“But you promised—!” I cried. 

“Greg, go sit down,” he ordered. “You’re not going to fool me with an old 
camera and a joke snapshot.” 

“You lose, Greg!” Donny shouted. 

“You’re evil, Greg!” Brian chimed in. 

Everyone laughed. I could feel my face growing hot. I knew I must be beet-red. 

I felt ready to explode. I was embarrassed and hurt and angry—all at the same 
time. 

“I’d give you an A for effort,” Mr. Saur said cruelly. “But I’m still giving you an 
F for your report. F for fake! ” 

Everyone laughed again. 

I couldn’t take it anymore. 

I let out a cry of fury—and went running for the door. 

At least, I tried to run. But I was too heavy to move fast. I could only waddle. 
“Greg—where are you going?” I heard Mr. Saur call. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him and lumbered to the door. I had the camera tucked 



under one flabby arm. I pulled the door open with the other. 

And bounced out into the silent, empty hall. 

I could hear Mr. Saur calling me from the classroom. And I could hear the kids 
laughing and talking excitedly. 

I slammed the door shut behind me and kept moving. 

I didn’t know where I was going. I didn’t have a plan. I was so angry. I wanted 
to 

scream and cry and punch the walls. 

I turned the corner—and saw Shari down the hall. 

“Greg!” she called, surprised to see me. “What’s going on?” 

She was wearing a short black skirt over blue tights. She started to run down the 
hall toward me. 

She took about four steps—and then cried out as her skirt fell down! 


44 



19 

“I don’t believe this!” Shari wailed. 

We both stared down at her skirt, which had fallen around her ankles. 

She dropped her books and bent to pull it up. 

Normally, I would have burst out laughing. But she seemed so upset, I just stood 
there. 

“I—I’m losing weight,” she stammered, straightening the skirt around her waist. 
“I weighed myself this morning. I’ve lost eight pounds!” 

“Oh, wow!” I shook my head. Why was she losing weight? 

I tried to cheer her up. “Uh... eight pounds isn’t so much,” I said. I knew it was 
lame. But I couldn’t think of anything else. 

“Greg—I only weighed ninety to start!” she replied sharply. “Now I’m down to 
eighty-two. I can’t keep my skirt up. All my clothes hang on me!” 

“Maybe if you eat a really big lunch...” I started. 

“You’re no help!” she snapped. 

“Look at me!” I cried, holding my arms out so she could see my big stomach. “I 

think I put on two hundred pounds overnight! A few minutes ago, I couldn’t get 
out 

of my chair!” 

Her eyes checked me out. She was so upset about being skinny, she hadn’t even 



looked at me. 


She squinted hard at me. Then she burst out laughing. “Oh, gross. You look 
really 

weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch,” I sighed. 

“What are we going to do?” she demanded. “Why is this happening to us?” 

I started to answer—but I heard footsteps approaching from down the hall. 

Shari heard them, too. “Let’s go,” she urged. “Quick—help me pick up my 
books.” 

I bent to pick up the books—and the back of my jeans burst open with a loud 
rrrrrrip. 

After school, Bird and Michael and some other kids started up a softball game 
on the 

diamond behind school. I didn’t want to play. I didn’t want them to see how 
huge I 

was getting. 

But they pulled me onto the diamond and forced me to play first base. 

Maybe they won’t notice anything different, I thought. I crossed my fingers and 
hoped. Maybe they won’t notice that I’ve filled out a bit—since this morning! 

My T-shirt was stretched against my bulging stomach. The shirt was so tight, I 
could barely move my arms. My ripped jeans fit over my legs like tights. 


45 



Maybe they won’t notice, I told myself as I tried to trot out to first base. Maybe 
they won’t notice. 

“Hey, Greg—” Bird called from the pitcher’s mound. “Have you been super¬ 
sizing all your meals?” 

Everyone whooped and laughed. A few guys rolled around on the grass, giggling 
like hyenas. 

Michael pointed at me. “Hey—it’s Sumo Three!” he yelled. 

“It’s Sumo Three and Four!” someone else called out. 

More loud whooping and laughing. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered angrily. 

“Give him a lunch break!” Michael called. 

It wasn’t funny. But everyone laughed, anyway. 

They gathered around me in a wide circle. They shook their heads. “Weird,” 
Bird 

muttered. “How did you put on two hundred pounds since yesterday?” 

I didn’t want to talk about it. “Are we going to play ball or what?” I demanded. 

I had a strong urge to tell Bird and Michael why I was ballooning up so fast. I 
wanted to tell them that I had taken out the evil camera. That Shari had taken my 
picture. That it showed me weighing at least four hundred pounds. 

And now it was coming true. 

But I didn’t dare tell them. They had warned me not to go back to the Coffman 



house. And they had begged me not to take out the camera. 

If I told them the truth, they’d think I was a total jerk. 

So I kept my mouth shut and tried to concentrate on the game. 

I did pretty well until I went to bat in the third inning. I hit the ball over the 

second baseman’s head and trotted to first base with a single. 

I was totally out of breath by the time I reached the base. But the ball was still 

rolling around in the outfield. “Keep running!” my teammates shouted. “Greg— 
go to 

second!” 

So, huffing and puffing, I lifted my heavy legs and made my way to second. 
“Slide! Slide!” everyone was shouting. 

So I slid into second. Safe! 

And then I couldn’t get off my back. 

I wasn’t strong enough to pick up my heavy body. I must look like Humpty- 
Dumpty! I realized. 

I tried rolling. I tried rocking back and forth. 

And then I tried calling my friends for help. 

* * * 

I was exhausted by the time I pulled my huge body to my house. Sweat poured 
off 

my forehead and rolled down my round cheeks and chins. 



My clothes were stretched so tight, I could barely breathe. My jeans were ripped. 
My shirt pressed against my skin. Even my sneakers pinched my feet! 

This is horrible! I’ve got to get into something comfortable, I decided. 

46 

I remembered my huge, baggy shorts. The ones I wore to go bike riding the 
other 

day. 

I carried my bulky body over to the dresser. Bent over with a groan and pulled 
out the big shorts. 

I tugged them on, eager to get comfortable. 

Tugged. Tugged harder. Then gasped in horror. 

The huge, baggy shorts were skintight! 


47 



20 


I put on nearly three hundred pounds that day. By evening, I could barely walk. 
“It’s an allergic reaction,” Mom said. 

I stared at her. “Excuse me? What’s that?” 

“You ate something you’re allergic to,” she answered. “A person doesn’t swell 
up 

like a balloon overnight.” 

Dad squinted at me. He was trying to look calm, but I could see how worried he 
was. “Do you eat a lot of candy bars after school?” he asked. 

Mom shook her head at Dad. “He could eat a thousand candy bars a day! They 
wouldn’t make him this huge!” she declared. 

“We’d better take him to an allergy doctor,” Dad murmured, rubbing his chin. 
“We’ll take him to Dr. Weiss first,” Mom argued. “Dr. Weiss can tell us what 
kind of doctor to take him to.” 

They started to argue about what kind of doctor I needed. 

I waddled out of the room. It took all my strength just to raise my enormous legs. 
My chins sagged down over my neck. My big stomach bounced out of the room 
ahead of me. 

I knew that no doctor could help me. I knew I didn’t have an allergy. And I knew 
I didn’t become a blimp because of candy bars. 



The snapshot from the evil camera made me look as big as a mountain. And the 
snapshot had come true. 

No doctor could slim me down. No diet would work. 

Later, I begged Mom and Dad to let me stay home. “Please don’t make me go to 
school tomorrow like this,” I pleaded. “The kids will laugh at me. I’ll be so 
embarrassed.” 

“You can’t miss school,” Dad insisted. “What if it takes weeks and weeks to get 
you back to normal?” 

“The kids won’t laugh at you,” Mom added. “Your friends will understand that 
you’re sick.” 

I begged and whined. I even got down on my fat knees to plead with them. 

But would they listen? No. 

“Don’t be embarrassed,” Dad said as I waddled out the door to go to school the 
next 

morning. 

Don’t be embarrassed? 

I wore one of his baggy running suits—and it was tight on me! 

48 

I felt embarrassed just walking down the street. When cars drove past, I knew 
the 

people inside were staring at me. Laughing at the big mound of Jell-0 bouncing 



along the sidewalk. 

I didn’t want to walk to school. But my parents have a Honda Civic—and I 
didn’t 

fit in the car! 

Kids were staring as I squeezed through the front door of Pitts Landing Middle 

School. But everyone was kind. No one made jokes. In fact, no one said a word 
to 

me. 

I think they were afraid to come up to me. Afraid I might fall on them! I really 
did look like one of the balloons in the Thanksgiving Day parade! 

The morning went pretty well. I kept to myself and tried to hide in corners. It 
wasn’t easy to hide. But everyone left me alone. 

Until I stepped into Mr. Saur’s class. 

He was as sour as ever. And he embarrassed me in front of the whole class. 
“Greg, I don’t think you’ll fit into a chair,” he said, rolling his wooden pointer 
between his hands. “Why don’t you just stand by the window.” 

I didn’t say anything. I waddled over to the side of the room. 

The room fell silent. The other kids didn’t laugh. They could see that there was 
something seriously wrong with me. 

But Mr. Saur insisted on giving me a hard time. 

“Greg, forget the window,” he said. “If you stand there, I’m afraid you’ll block 



out all the sunlight.” Then he smiled. 

Again, no one laughed. I think the other kids felt sorry for me. Even Donny and 
Brian weren’t cracking jokes. 

“Greg, I want you to go see the nurse,” Mr. Saur ordered. “I want her to discuss 
the four food groups with you. I think you’ve been eating too much of all four!” 

I think that was supposed to be a cruel joke. But no one laughed. 

I turned my bulk around and stared at him. Was he serious? Was he really 
sending me to the nurse? 

“Get going,” he said, pointing to the door. 

I turned and shuffled heavily out of the classroom. I expected Donny to stick out 

his big foot and try to trip me, the way he always does. 

But he stared straight ahead, as silent and still as everyone else in the class. 

I was glad. If he tripped me, I knew I’d never be able to get up. 

I pulled myself down the hall, thinking angry thoughts about Mr. Saur. Why did 

he make fun of me in front of everyone? Why was he so cruel? 

I couldn’t answer my questions. Besides, I felt too angry to think clearly. I’ll pay 

him back some day. That’s what I told myself. I’ll do something mean to him. 
I’ll 

embarrass old Sourball in front of everyone. 

My angry thoughts followed me to the nurse’s office. But I instantly forgot them 
when I saw the girl huddled in the chair in the waiting room. I stopped outside 



the 


door and gaped at her in shock. 

Shari! 

It took me a few seconds to recognize her. 

49 

Her jeans and T-shirt appeared to be about ten sizes too big! Her arms were as 

thin as toothpicks. Her face was pale and puckered. Her head had shrunk. It 
looked 

like a tiny lemon on her frail, noodlelike body. 

“Greg,” she whispered weakly. “Is that you in that big body?” 

“Shari!” I cried. “How much weight have you lost?” 

“I—I don’t know,” she stammered. “Look at me! I’m shrinking away. I’m so 

light. It took me hours to walk to school this morning because the wind kept 
pushing 

me back!” 

“Are you sick?” I cried. 

She frowned at me. “I’m not sick, and neither are you,” she replied in a tiny, frail 

voice. “I’m shrinking away, and you’re bloating up—and it’s because of those 
photos 

we took.” 

I sighed and lifted my huge stomach with both hands so that I could get through 
the doorway. “What are we going to do, Shari?” I whispered. “It’s those photos. 



You’re right. But what are we going to do?” 
50 



21 


Dad picked me up after school. He had rented a van since I couldn’t fit into the 
car. 

Dad helped me squeeze through the door. My body took up the entire backseat. 
The seat belt wouldn’t stretch over my stomach. So we had to forget about it. 
“I’m sure Dr. Weiss will have you back to normal in no time,” Dad said. He was 
trying to be cheerful. But I could tell he was really upset and worried. 

He drove slowly to Dr. Weiss’ office across town. The van couldn’t pick up 
speed because of all the weight it carried—me! 

Dr. Weiss is a nice elderly man with bright blue eyes and a long mane of white 

hair. He talks to all the kids as if they’re two years old. He still gives me a 
lollipop 

after each visit, even though I’m twelve! 

But I didn’t think he’d give me a lollipop today. 

He tsk-tsked as I climbed on the scale. But he couldn’t get my weight. The scale 
didn’t go high enough! 

He had trouble listening to my heartbeat. His stethoscope got stuck in the folds 
of 

flab over my chest. 

He took all kinds of tests, his expression tense and thoughtful. “We’ll send the 
blood samples to the lab,” he told me. “We should have some answers in a few 



days.” 

He shook his head and frowned. His blue eyes appeared to fade. “I’ve never seen 
anything like it, Greg,” he said softly. “I’m completely stumped.” 

I wasn’t stumped. I knew exactly what the problem was. 

As soon as I got home, I lumbered to my room and grabbed the phone. It took all 
my strength to raise my huge, flabby arm and hold the receiver up to the bulging 
flesh of my face. 

I punched in Shari’s number. It took three tries. My finger was so fat, it kept 
hitting two numbers at once. 

She answered on the third ring. “Hello?” Her voice floated out so tiny and weak, 
I could barely hear her. 

“I’m coming over,” I announced. “And I’m bringing the camera.” 

“You don’t have to shout!” she squeaked. And then she added, “Hurry, Greg. 
I’ve 

lost five more pounds. I’m so light, I’m afraid I’m going to float away.” 

“I’ll be right there,” I told her. “We’ll figure out a way to save ourselves.” 

I hung up the phone. Then I carefully dug the camera out from its hiding place in 

my underwear drawer. I had to bend over to reach into the drawer. I was huffing 
and 

puffing, gasping for breath. 

If I get any fatter, I’ll explode, I thought unhappily. 



51 


Carefully gripping the camera, I lowered my bulk down the stairs. “I’m going to 
Shari’s,” I called to my parents. 

They were in the den, discussing what Dr. Weiss had told Dad. 

“It started to rain,” Mom called. “Take an umbrella.” 

“I’m only going next door!” I shouted back. 

Besides, an umbrella wouldn’t cover all of me. 

I peeked outside. It was only drizzling. Not much of a rain at all. 

I tucked the camera under the folds of my arm, pulled open the front door, and 
started to step out. But I stopped when I saw the dark-haired boy walking up the 
driveway. 

Jon! 

“Oh, no!” I murmured. I knew why he had come. He wanted his camera back. 
But I couldn’t give it back. I needed it to save Shari and me. 

I watched him walking slowly, his head down because of the rain. 

What am I going to do? I asked myself. I can’t let him take back his camera. I 
can’t! 

I’ll duck back inside and hide, I decided. 

I tried to back up. Tried to back my heavy bulk into the house. 


Too late. 



Jon saw me. 


52 



22 


He waved to me and started jogging toward the house. 

I had the camera in my hand. I carefully lowered it to the porch and stepped in 

front of it. I knew it would be hidden behind my enormous body. 

But what was I going to say to Jon? How could I convince him to let me keep 
the 

camera for a while longer? 

“Hi!” he called. 

“Hi,” I answered, my voice muffled by the thick folds of flab around my face. 

“I’m looking for a boy who lives around here,” Jon said, stepping up to the 
porch. 

“His name is Greg, and he’s blond, and he’s about my age. Do you know him? 
He 

has a camera of mine.” 

I stared at him. My mouth dropped open. I could feel my chins drop onto my 
chest. 

“What’s his name?” I choked out. 

“Greg,” Jon repeated. “I don’t know his last name. Does he live around here?” 

He doesn’t recognize me! I realized. I’m so huge, he doesn’t know that I’m me! 
“Uh... yeah. I think I know who you mean,” I told him. “There’s a kid named 
Greg who lives over there.” I pointed up the street. 



“Do you know which house?” Jon asked, turning to where I pointed. 

“It’s about four blocks that way,” I lied. “A big redbrick house. You can’t miss it. 
It’s the only brick house on the block.” 

“Hey, thanks,” Jon said. The rain started to come down harder. He turned quickly 
and jogged down the driveway. 

A close call, I thought. 

I felt bad about lying to Jon. But I had to lie. I couldn’t give him back the 
camera—ever. It was too dangerous. 

I watched him until he disappeared behind some hedges. Then, I reached my 
flabby hand down, picked up the camera, and bounced across the front yard to 
Shari’s house. 

Shari greeted me at her front door. I could see the shock in her eyes when she 
saw 

how huge I had become. 

I was shocked, too. I cried out in surprise. She was starting to look like a stick 
figure! 

As she led the way to her room, she kept tripping over the cuffs of her jeans, 
which sagged down over her feet. She had tied a knot in the belt around her tiny 
waist, an attempt to keep the jeans from falling off. 

“If I get any smaller, I’ll have to wear doll clothes!” she wailed. 


53 



“Did your parents take you to a doctor?” I asked, huffing and puffing as I tried to 
drag my weight after her. 

“Of course,” she replied in her tiny, weak voice. “The doctor said to make me 
drink milk shakes five times a day!” 

“I wish my doctor said that.” I sighed. 

I lowered myself carefully onto her bed. I didn’t want the bed to collapse under 
me. But as soon as I sat down, I heard a crunching sound. The sound of wood 
splintering. 

And the bed crashed loudly to the floor. 

“Don’t worry about it,” Shari said softly. “I don’t have the strength to climb up 
to 

bed, anyway.” 

“If I get any bigger,” I moaned, “I won’t be able to get out of the house. I really 
won’t fit through the door.” 

She folded her hands in front of her. Her fingers were so skinny, they looked like 
bird claws. With her black hair hanging down from her tiny, round head, and her 
straight pole of a body, she looked more like a mop than a person! 

“What are we going to do?” she wailed. 

I patted the camera with a fat, spongy hand. “I brought this,” I said. “I thought 
maybe—” 

“What good will that stupid camera do?” Shari cried. “I wish I’d never seen it! 



Never! Never!” 


“I have an idea,” I told her. I flicked a fly off one of my chins. 

She hugged herself, wrapping her skinny arms around her toothpick body. “What 
kind of an idea?” 

“Let’s take new pictures of ourselves,” I said. “Maybe the new pictures will 
show 

us looking normal. Maybe the new pictures will change us back to the way we 
were 

before.” 

She raised her eyes to mine. I could see her thinking about it, thinking hard. “It’s 
kind of risky—isn’t it?” she said finally. 

“Do you have a better idea?” I asked. 

She thought hard again. Then she lowered her eyes to the camera. “Okay,” she 
agreed. “Let’s do it.” 


54 



23 


I struggled to climb to my feet. But my arms and legs were barely strong enough 
to 

push up my huge body. 

Before I could move, Shari flew across the room. She grabbed the camera from 
my lap. 

“Oh!” she cried out as she nearly dropped it. “It feels so heavy!” 

“That’s because you’re so light,” I told her. I tried again to lift my bulk off the 
bed. And failed again. 

“Sit still,” Shari ordered. “I’ll take your picture first.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I hope the new photo shows me skinny.” I tried to cross my 
fingers. But they were too fat to cross! 

“Say cheese,” Shari said, aiming the camera at me. 

“Don’t be funny,” I snapped. “Just take the picture.” 

She stared through the viewfinder. Raised her finger over the shutter button. 

Then she lowered the camera with a sigh. “It—it’s too dangerous,” she 
stammered. 

“Shari—take my picture!” I insisted. “Look at us! We couldn’t be any worse 
off—could we?” 

She nodded in agreement. Then, with a sigh, she raised the camera to her eye 



again. It felt so heavy in her skinny arms, she had to hold it up with both hands. 
“Here goes,” she said softly. “I hope it shows you normal again, Greg.” 

She snapped the picture. The flash made me blink. 

A second later, the white square slid out from the front of the camera. She 
carried 

it over to the bed and dropped lightly down beside me. 

“Let’s see it!” I cried, eagerly grabbing for it. 

“Careful!” Shari warned. “If you fall over, you’ll crush me!” 

I gasped. She was right. Sitting next to me could be extremely dangerous. 
“Maybe you’d better stand up,” I suggested. 

She climbed to her feet, swaying because she wasn’t used to being so light. “It’s 
starting to develop,” she announced. 

She held the snapshot in front of me so we could both watch it. The yellow filled 
in first. I squinted to see if I could make out my face. 

Was it fat in the photo? Or back to normal? 

The yellow was too pale. I couldn’t see my face at all. 

Shari and I both were frozen there, staring at the small square. Not moving a 
muscle. Not blinking. Watching it darken. 

And suddenly, I could see myself. 

My huge blobby face. My round, balloon body. 


55 



Still enormous. Still enormously fat. 

“Noooooooo!” I let out a long cry of horror. “Noooooooo! I want to be changed 
back!” 

Shari was shaking her tiny head sadly, still staring at the darkening photo. 
“What’s that on your face?” she cried. “Yuck!” 

I grabbed the snapshot from her and held it close. “Oh, no!” I groaned. “My 
skin—it’s all scaly. I look like an alligator or something!” 

Shari grabbed back the photo and studied it. “The scaly stuff is on your arms, 
too,” she said. “It looks like reptile skin or something.” 

And as she said that, I started to itch. 

I glanced down and saw red scales covering my arms. Itchy red patches. I started 
to scratch. But the scratching made the scales itch even more. 

My skin flaked off under my fingernails. 

“Oh, yuck!” I moaned. “It itches so bad!” 

I scratched my arms. Then I scratched my face. More dry skin peeled off as I 
scratched. Chunks of skin. 

Shari took a step back. She let the new photo fall to the carpet. “Oh, this is so 

horrible!” she declared. “You’re still huge—and now all your skin is cracking 
off!” 

“Ohh! My back itches so bad!” I wailed. “But I can’t reach it.” 

“I’m not going to scratch it for you!” Shari declared. “It—it’s too gross!” 



I pulled a chunk of scaly, red skin off the back of my hand. “Do you want me to 
take a new picture of you?” I asked Shari. “Maybe you’ll have better luck.” 

“No! No way!” she cried. She took another few steps back. “No new picture. It 
will only make things worse.” 

Her face twisted in disgust. She swallowed hard. “I’m sorry, Greg,” she choked 
out. “But you look so gross, I think I’m going to be sick.” 

I tried to scratch the back of my neck. But my arms were too fat. I couldn’t reach 
back there. 

I rubbed my forehead. A big chunk of skin dropped off and bounced on the 
carpet. 

“Let’s just rip up the photos!” Shari declared. 

“Huh?” I gaped at her. 

She bent to pick up the scaly new picture of me. “Let’s rip them all up,” she 
urged. “I’ll bet as soon as we rip them up, our bodies will return to normal.” 

I stopped my frantic scratching for a moment. “Do you think so? Do you think 
that’s all we have to do?” 

“Maybe,” Shari replied. “It’s worth a try—don’t you think?” 

I pulled the first two photos from my pocket. The negative of Shari and the first 
fat photo of me. 

“I’ll rip these two up,” I said. “You tear that one. We’ll see what happens.” 



We both held the photos up. I started to tear mine—then stopped. 

“Maybe if we rip them up, we’ll disappear completely!” I exclaimed. 

Shari and I stared at each other. Our hands stayed in the air, ready to tear the 
snapshots to pieces. 

56 

Should we do it? 

57 



24 


“No!” Shari cried. “Don’t do it!” 

We both lowered the snapshots. 

“You’re right,” I said. My whole body was shaking. “It’s too dangerous.” 

“If we tear the photos to pieces, we might be torn to pieces, too,” Shari said. “Or 
we might disappear completely and never come back.” 

I shuddered. “Let’s not talk about what might happen to us,” I moaned. “Look at 
us. What could be worse?” 

“A lot of things,” Shari sighed. “We’ll think of something to save ourselves, 

Greg. We just have to think positive.” 

I stared at her. “What did you say?” 

“I said, think positive,” she repeated. 

Think positive. 

“Shari—you just gave me a really good idea!” 

I cried. 

* * * 

We carried the snapshots to Kramer’s, the photo store where my brother works. 

It wasn’t easy to walk there. I had to stop to catch my breath every few steps. 

And I had to scratch my scaly, peeling skin. And I had to hold on to Shari to 
keep the 



wind from blowing her away. 

The walk was only about eight blocks. But it took us more than an hour. 

When we finally stepped inside the store, my heart sank to my knees. I didn’t see 
Terry. 

“He’s in the developing lab,” Mr. Kramer told me. He kept staring at Shari and 

me. I guess we looked pretty weird. A stick figure and an elephant. 

I pulled Shari to the lab in the back of the store and knocked on the door. You 

can’t just open the door and walk into the developing lab. If you let in the light, 
you 

destroy the film in there. 

We waited about five minutes. Then Terry came out. At first, he didn’t recognize 
me. I think he forgot that I had put on four hundred pounds in the past few days. 
“Yuck. What happened to your skin, Greg?” he demanded, making a disgusted 
face. “Have you got a rash or something?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied glumly. “Can you do me a favor, Terry?” 

He shrugged. “What’s the favor?” 

I held up the first two snapshots. The negative of Shari, and the positive of me 
weighing a ton. “Can you reverse these for us?” I asked. 

58 

He squinted at the two squares for a long while. “I don’t get you,” he said finally. 
I sighed. “Can you take the negative and make a positive of it? And can you take 



the positive and make a negative?” 

Shari let out a sharp cry. She realized what my plan was. 

Maybe if we reversed the pictures, it would reverse our bodies. 

Terry would make a positive of Shari’s negative, and she’d grow back to her 

normal size. Then he’d make a negative of my picture, and I’d shrink the way 
Shari 

had. 

It seemed to make sense. Was it worth a try? 

Definitely. 

Terry took the two snapshots. He studied them closely. He scratched his head. “I 

guess I could do it,” he said. “But I’m really busy in there. When do you need 
it?” 

“NOW!” Shari and I both cried. 

Terry stared at us, then down at the two photos. 

I scratched the back of my neck. My arms were so fat, I could barely lift them 

that high. In a few hours, I knew, I’d be too heavy to walk. Someone would have 
to 

wheel me around in a wheelbarrow. No—make that two wheelbarrows! 

“Please!” I begged. 

“I just don’t have time,” Terry said. 

“I’ll give you my allowance for the next two months!” I cried. 

“Okay. I guess I can find the time. It’s a deal,” Terry replied. “Wait out here.” 



He disappeared into the lab. We stood outside the door and waited. 

And waited. 

And waited. 

The longest half hour of my life. 

Mr. Kramer kept staring back at us from the front counter. Shari and I tried to 
ignore him. 

I wanted to sit down. Carrying so much weight made my feet hurt. But I was 

afraid if I took a seat, I’d break it. And I wouldn’t be able to get back up. 

So Shari and I stood outside the door to the lab. And thought about this new 
plan. 

Would it work? Would reversing the photos reverse us ? 

Finally, the door swung open and Terry stepped out. “Here,” he grunted. He 
handed me the new prints. “Don’t forget what you said about your allowance.” 

“I won’t,” I promised. “Thanks, Terry.” 

I gazed at the new prints. Terry had done it right. A positive of Shari, smiling 
into 

the camera. A negative of me, weighing four hundred pounds. 

“Now, get lost,” Terry said, glancing up to the front desk. “Go ahead. Beat it. 
Before you make me lose my job.” 

I took Shari’s hand and started to pull her to the front of the store. 

Poor Shari. She really did feel light as a feather. She looked even paler and 



skinnier than when we came into the store. Her hand felt like brittle bones. 

We stepped out of the store and stopped on the corner. I held the new prints up 
so 

we both could see them. 

“Is it working?” I asked her. “Do you feel any different?” 

59 

“Not yet,” she replied softly. 

“Neither do I,” I moaned. 

We stared at the new prints. And waited. 

We stood on that corner for at least half an hour. Staring and waiting. 

Waiting to feel different. Waiting for our bodies to change. 

But nothing happened. 

We didn’t change at all. 

“We’re doomed,” I murmured sadly. “Doomed.” 

A chunk of skin peeled off my forehead and dropped to the sidewalk. 


60 



25 


The next morning, I woke up early, before my alarm. I stretched and yawned. 
Then I 

turned and struggled to pull my huge body out of bed. 

“Heave-ho!” I cried, straining every muscle. 

And I went flying across the room! 

“Oww!” I groaned as I hit the wall. I bounced off. Dropped to the floor. Bounced 
up again. 

“What’s going on?” I cried out loud. 

And scrambled to the mirror. And stared at the reflection of my old face. My old 
body. 

No folds of sagging flesh. No puffed-out cheeks or bulging balloon of a belly. 
Me! 

I was back! 

I squeezed my arms. I mbbed my face. I pulled my hair. 

I felt so happy to see myself! 

I leaped onto the bed and started jumping up and down, tossing up my arms, and 
whooping and cheering at the top of my lungs. 

“It worked! It worked!” 

Reversing the photo had reversed me! 



“Yaaaaay!” I let out a cheer for myself. 

Mom and Dad burst into the room, still in their bathrobes. Frightened 
expressions 

on their faces. “Greg—what’s wrong?” 

And then they both froze with bulging eyes and opened mouths. 

Mom uttered a squeak of surprise. Dad goggled at me in shocked silence. 

“You—you’re you again!” Mom stammered finally. 

“You—you—you—” Dad struggled to say something, but he couldn’t. He 
pointed a finger at me and stuttered. 

And then they both rushed over and wrapped me in a tight hug. 

“I knew it was something you ate,” Mom said happily. “Some kind of food 
poisoning.” 

“Just an allergic reaction,” Dad added, finally able to speak. “I knew you’d be 
fine in a day or two.” 

“We knew you’d be fine,” Mom declared. 

“Yeah. Me, too,” I said. 

What a lie! 

“You were very good during all this trouble, Greg,” Mom said, wiping away a 
tear from her eye with the back of her hand. “You had such a good attitude.” 

61 

“Yeah. Well... I always try to think positive,” I told her. 



I gobbled down my breakfast and hurried next door to Shari’s house. As I ran up 
to 

the back door, she stepped out, grinning, waving her arms in the air in triumph. 
“It worked! It worked, Greg!” she cried happily. 

She came running toward me, her black hair flying behind her head, laughing 
and 

cheering. Back to normal. 

Back to normal! 

Whooping and shouting, the two of us did a wild “Back to Normal” dance in her 
backyard. 

When we stopped to catch our breath, Shari turned to me. “We’d better hurry. 

We’re going to be late for school. I can’t wait to show everyone that I’m me 
again.” 

“Me, too!” I cried. “But wait right here. I have to get something in my room. I’ll 
be right back.” 

I turned and started jogging quickly across the grass to my house. 

“What are you getting?” Shari called, following me. 

“The camera,” I shouted back. 

She ran faster. Caught up with me. Grabbed my shoulders and pulled me to a 

stop. “Greg—the camera? Why do you need the camera?” 

I narrowed my eyes at her. My expression turned serious. I lowered my voice to 
a 



whisper. 


“For revenge,” I replied. 
62 



26 


“Greg—don’t!” Shari pleaded. 

I ignored her. I knew what I wanted to do. I knew what I had to do. 

I ran into the house. Took the stairs two at a time up to my room. Pulled the 
camera from its hiding place. And hurried back outside. 

Shari was waiting for me on the sidewalk. “Greg—this is crazy,” she insisted. 
“What are you going to do?” 

I couldn’t stop an evil smile from spreading across my face. “I’m going to take 
Mr. Saur’s picture,” I told her. 

“NO!” she gasped. “Greg—you can’t!” 

“Watch me,” I replied, still grinning. 

“But—but—but—” she sputtered. 

I started walking toward school, taking long strides. I gripped the camera tightly 
in both hands. 

“Greg—something terrible will happen!” Shari protested. 

“I know,” I said, unable to stop grinning. “Old Sourball deserves it.” 

“But, Greg—” She tried to stop me. But I jogged faster, moving away from her. 

“He deserves it,” I repeated. “He refused to believe a true story. He called me a 

liar in front of the whole class. And he gave me an F. An F for a really good 
report.” 



“But, Greg—” Shari started. 

I didn’t let her get a word in. I was too worked up. The closer we came to school, 
the more excited I got about my revenge plan. 

“He’s going to ruin my whole summer,” I continued. “And he’s wrong, wrong, 

wrong! And then, when I got so huge, Sourball was really cruel. He made jokes 
about 

me in front of everyone. He embarrassed me, Shari. He totally embarrassed me.” 
“Greg—” 

“He wanted to hurt my feelings,” I declared. I could see our school through the 

trees in the next block. “He wanted to embarrass me in front of the whole class. 
He 

deserves what he’s going to get.” 

“So what are you going to do?” she demanded breathlessly. 

I stopped at the corner. “He dared me to prove that the camera is evil. So I’m 

going to prove it—and get my revenge at the same time.” 

* * * 

I slipped into class just as the final bell rang. The other kids were already in their 
seats, just getting quiet. 

Mr. Saur had his back turned. He was writing something on the chalkboard. 


63 




I stepped up behind him. And waited for him to turn around. 

My heart thudded in my chest. My hands were shaking so much, I could barely 
hold the camera. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

This was my big moment. My big chance. 

“Mr. Saur—?” I called softly. 

He spun around, as if I had shouted. “Greg!” he cried. “You’re looking very 
slender.” 

I ignored his words. I raised the camera to my eye. 

Time for revenge, I thought. 

“I brought the camera,” I told him. My voice came out high and shrill. 

“Remember? The camera from my report? You asked me to prove that it’s evil. 
So 

here goes!” 

I centered his startled face in the viewfinder. 

I raised my finger over the shutter button. 

He grabbed the camera from my hands. 

“Oh, yes! The evil camera!” he declared, staring down at it. “Don’t waste it on 



me. Let’s take everyone’s picture!” 

“No!” I cried. 

He waved his hand. “Donny and Brian—move in closer.” Then he shoved me in 
front of him. “Get in the shot, Greg.” 

“No!” I pleaded. “Mr. Saur—no!” 

“Say cheese, everyone!” 

The camera flashed. 

The white square photo slid out. 

Mr. Saur smiled at me. “I think I got everyone in class in the shot,” he said. 
“Now 

what’s going to happen?” 

I swallowed hard. “Uh... we’ll see,” I replied. “We’ll see.” 






Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
CSit jwkcmfeGiji 



r 

Be c 1 ihoH 

nou eon r l ml 

.--■j> . ••: •. _' ,,' f 

- i ji.■■ 

1 . 





















GHOST CAMP 


Goosebumps - 45 
R.L. Stine 





1 


“You know I get bus sick, Harry,” Alex groaned. 

“Alex, give me a break.” I shoved my brother against the window. “We’re 
almost there. Don’t start thinking about getting bus sick now!” 

The bus rumbled over the narrow road. I held onto the seat in front of me. I 
gazed out the window. 

Nothing but pine trees. They whirred past in a blur of green. Sunlight 
bounced off the dusty glass of the window. 

We’re almost to Camp Spirit Moon, I thought happily. 

I couldn’t wait to get off the bus. My brother, Alex, and I were the only 
passengers. It was kind of creepy. 

The driver was hidden in front of a green curtain. I had glimpsed him as 
Alex and I climbed on board. He had a nice smile, a great suntan, curly blond 
hair, and a silver earring in one ear. 

“Welcome, dudes!” he greeted us. 

Once the long bus ride began, we didn’t see him or hear from him again. 
Creepy. 

Luckily, Alex and I get along okay. He’s a year younger than me. He’s 
eleven. But he’s as tall as I am. Some people call us the Altman twins, even 
though we’re not twins. 

We both have straight black hair, dark brown eyes, and serious faces. Our 
parents are always telling us to cheer up—even when we’re in really good 
moods! 

“I feel a little bus sick, Harry,” Alex complained. 

I turned away from the window. Alex suddenly looked very yellow. His 
chin trembled. A bad sign. 

“Alex, pretend you’re not on a bus,” I told him. “Pretend you’re in a car.” 

“But I get carsick, too,” he groaned. 

“Forget the car,” I said. Bad idea. Alex can get carsick when Mom backs 
down the driveway! 

It’s really a bad-news habit of his. His face turns a sick yellow. He starts to 
shake. And then it gets kind of messy. 

“You’ve got to hold on,” I told him. “We’ll be at camp soon. And then 



you’ll be fine.” 

He swallowed hard. 

The bus bounced over a deep hole in the road. Alex and I bounced with it. 

“I really feel sick,” Alex moaned. 

“I know!” I cried. “Sing a song. That always cures you. Sing a song, Alex. 
Sing it really loud. No one will hear. We’re the only ones on the bus.” 

Alex loves to sing. He has a beautiful voice. 

The music teacher at school says that Alex has perfect pitch. I’m not sure 
what that means. But I know it’s a good thing. 

Alex is serious about his singing. He’s in the chorus at school. Dad says 
he’s going to find a voice teacher for Alex this fall. 

I stared at my brother as the bus bounced again. His face was about as 
yellow as a banana skin. Not a good sign. 

“Go ahead—sing,” I urged him. 

Alex’s chin trembled. He cleared his throat. Then he began to sing a Beatles 
song we both really like. 

His voice bounced every time the bus bumped. But he started to look better 
as soon as he started to sing. 

Pretty smart idea, Harry, I congratulated myself. 

I watched the pine trees whir past in the sunlight and listened to Alex’s 
song. He really does have an awesome voice. 

Am I jealous? 

Maybe a little. 

But he can’t hit a tennis ball the way I can. And I can beat him in a swim 
race every time. So it evens out. 

Alex stopped singing. He shook his head unhappily. “I wish Mom and Dad 
signed me up for the music camp.” He sighed. 

“Alex, the summer is half over,” I reminded him. “How many times do we 
have to go over this? Mom and Dad waited too long. It was too late.” 

“I know,” Alex said, frowning. “But I wish—” 

“Camp Spirit Moon was the only camp we could get into this late in the 
summer,” I said. “Hey, look—!” 

I spotted two deer outside the window, a tall one and a little baby one. They 
were just standing there, staring at the bus as it sped by. 

“Yeah. Cool. Deer,” Alex muttered. He rolled his eyes. 

“Hey—lighten up,” I told him. My brother is so moody. Sometimes I just 



want to shake him. “Camp Spirit Moon may be the coolest camp on earth,” I 
said. 

“Or it may be a dump,” Alex replied. He picked at some stuffing that poked 
up from a hole in the bus seat. 

“The music camp is so great.” He sighed. “They put on two musicals each 
summer. That would have been so awesome!” 

“Alex, forget about it,” I told him. “Let’s enjoy Camp Spirit Moon. We only 
have a few weeks.” 

The bus suddenly screeched to a stop. 

Startled, I bounced forward, then back. I turned to the window, expecting to 
see a camp out there. But all I could see were pine trees. And more pine trees. 

“Camp Spirit Moon! Everybody out!” the driver called. 

Everybody? It was just Alex and me! 

The driver poked his blond head out from behind the curtain. He grinned at 
us. “How was the ride, dudes?” he asked. 

“Great,” I replied, stepping into the aisle. Alex didn’t say anything. 

The driver climbed out. We followed him around to the side of the bus. 
Bright sunlight made the tall grass sparkle all around us. 

He leaned into a compartment and pulled out our bags and sleeping bags. 
He set everything down on the grass. 

“Uh... where’s the camp?” Alex asked. 

I shielded my eyes with my hand and searched around. The narrow road 
curved through a forest of pine trees as far as I could see. 

“Right through there, dudes,” the driver said. He pointed to a dirt path that 
cut through the trees. “It’s a real short walk. You can’t miss it.” 

The driver shut the baggage compartment. He climbed back onto the bus. 
“Have a great time!” he called. 

The door shut. The bus roared away. 

Alex and I squinted through the bright sunlight at the dirt path. I swung my 
duffel bag over my shoulder. Then I tucked my sleeping bag under one arm. 

“Shouldn’t the camp send someone out here to greet us?” Alex asked. 

I shrugged. “You heard the driver. He said it’s a very short walk.” 

“But still,” Alex argued. “Shouldn’t they send a counselor to meet us out 
here on the road?” 

“It’s not the first day of camp,” I reminded him. “It’s the middle of the 
summer. Stop complaining about everything, Alex. Pick up your stuff, and let’s 



get going. It’s hot out here!” 

Sometimes I just have to be the big brother and order him around. 
Otherwise, we won’t get anywhere! 

He picked up his stuff, and I led the way to the path. Our sneakers crunched 
over the dry red dirt as we made our way through the trees. 

The driver hadn’t lied. We’d walked only two or three minutes when we 
came to a small, grassy clearing. A wooden sign with red painted letters 
proclaimed camp spirit moon. An arrow pointed to the right. 

“See? We’re here!” I declared cheerfully. 

We followed a short path up a low, sloping hill. Two brown rabbits scurried 
past, nearly in front of our feet. Red and yellow wildflowers swayed along the 
side of the hill. 

When we reached the top, we could see the camp. 

“It looks like a real camp!” I exclaimed. 

I could see rows of little white cabins stretching in front of a round blue 
lake. Several canoes were tied to a wooden dock that stuck out into the lake. 

A large stone building stood off to the side. Probably the mess hall or the 
meeting lodge. A round dirt area near the woods had benches around it. For 
campfires, I guessed. 

“Hey, Harry—they have a baseball diamond and a soccer field,” Alex said, 
pointing. 

“Excellent!” I cried. 

I saw a row of round red-and-white targets at the edge of the trees. “Wow! 
They have archery, too,” I told Alex. I love archery. I’m pretty good at it. 

I shifted the heavy duffel bag on my shoulder. We started down the hill to 
the camp. 

We both stopped halfway down the hill. And stared at each other. 

“Do you notice anything weird?” Alex asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I do.” 

I noticed something very weird. Something that made my throat tighten and 
my stomach suddenly feel heavy with dread. 

The camp was empty. 

No one there. 



2 


“Where is everyone?” I asked, moving my eyes from cabin to cabin. No one in 
sight. 

I squinted at the lake behind the cabins. Two small, dark birds glided low 
over the sparkling water. No one swimming there. 

I turned to the woods that surrounded the camp. The afternoon sun had 
begun to lower itself over the pine trees. No sign of any campers in the woods. 

“Maybe we’re in the wrong place,” Alex said softly. 

“Huh? Wrong place?” I pointed to the sign. “How can we be in the wrong 
place? It says Camp Spirit Moon—doesn’t it?” 

“Maybe they all went on a field trip or something,” Alex suggested. 

I rolled my eyes. “Don’t you know anything about camp?” I snapped. “You 
don’t go on field trips. There’s nowhere to go!” 

“You don’t have to shoutl” Alex whined. 

“Then stop saying such stupid things!” I replied angrily. “We’re all alone in 
the woods in an empty camp. We’ve got to think clearly.” 

“Maybe they’re all in that big stone building over there,” Alex suggested. 
“Let’s go check it out.” 

I didn’t see any signs of life there. Nothing moved. The whole camp was as 
still as a photograph. 

“Yeah. Come on,” I told Alex. “We might as well check it out.” 

We were still about halfway down the hill, following the path through the 
tangles of pine trees—when a loud cry made us both stop and gasp in surprise. 

“Yo! Hey! Wait up!” 

A red-haired boy, in white tennis shorts and a white T-shirt, appeared beside 
us. I guessed he was sixteen or seventeen. 

“Hey—where did you come from?” I cried. He really startled me. One 
second Alex and I were alone. The next second this red-haired guy was standing 
there, grinning at us. 

He pointed to the woods. “I was gathering firewood,” he explained. “I lost 
track of the time.” 

“Are you a counselor?” I asked. 

He wiped sweat off his forehead with the front of his T-shirt. “Yes. My 



name is Chris. You’re Harry and you’re Alex—right?” 

Alex and I nodded. 

“I’m sorry I’m late,” Chris apologized. “You weren’t worried, were you?” 

“Of course not,” I replied quickly. 

“Harry was a little scared. But I wasn’t,” Alex said. Sometimes Alex can 
really be a pain. 

“Where is everyone?” I asked Chris. “We didn’t see any campers, or 
counselors, or anyone.” 

“They all left,” Chris replied. He shook his head sadly. When he turned 
back to Alex and me, I saw the frightened expression on his face. 

“The three of us—we’re all alone out here,” he said in a trembling voice. 



3 


“Huh? They left?” Alex cried shrilly. “But—but—where did they go?” 

“We can’t be all alone!” I cried. “The woods—” 

A smile spread over Chris’ freckled face. Then he burst out laughing. 
“Sorry, guys. I can’t keep a straight face.” He put his arms around our shoulders 
and led us toward the camp. “I’m just joking.” 

“Excuse me? That was a joke?” I demanded. I was feeling very confused. 

“It’s a Camp Spirit Moon joke,” Chris explained, still grinning. “We play it 
on all the new campers. Everyone hides in the woods when the new campers 
arrive at camp. Then a counselor tells them that the campers all ran away. That 
they’re all alone.” 

“Ha-ha. Very funny joke,” I said sarcastically. 

“You always try to scare the new campers?” Alex asked. 

Chris nodded. “Yeah. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. We have a lot of 
great traditions here. You’ll see. Tonight at the campfire—” 

He stopped when a big black-haired man—also dressed in white—came 
lumbering across the grass toward us. “Yo!” the man called in a booming, deep 
voice. 

“This is Uncle Marv,” Chris whispered. “He runs the camp.” 

“Yo!” Uncle Marv repeated as he stepped up to us. “Harry, what’s up?” He 
slapped me a high five that nearly knocked me into the trees. 

Uncle Marv grinned down at Alex and me. He was so huge —he reminded 
me of a big grizzly bear at the zoo back home. 

He had long, greasy black hair that fell wildly over his face. Tiny, round 
blue eyes—like marbles—under bushy black eyebrows. 

His arms bulged out from under his T-shirt. Powerful arms like a wrestler’s. 
His neck was as wide as a tree trunk! 

He reached down and shook Alex’s hand. I heard a loud crunch and saw 
Alex gasp in pain. 

“Good firm handshake, son,” Uncle Marv told Alex. He turned to me. “Did 
Chris play our little 'Alone in the Woods’ joke on you guys?” His voice boomed 
so loud, I wanted to cover my ears. 

Does Uncle Marv ever whisper? I wondered. 



“Yeah. He fooled us,” I confessed. “I really thought there was no one here.” 

Uncle Marv’s tiny blue eyes sparkled. “It’s one of our oldest traditions,” he 
said, grinning. What a grin! It looked to me as if he had at least six rows of teeth! 

“Before I take you to your cabin, I want to teach you the Camp Spirit Moon 
greeting,” Uncle Marv said. “Chris and I will show it to you.” 

They stood facing each other. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Uncle Marv bellowed. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Chris boomed back. 

Then they gave each other a left-handed salute, placing the hand on the 
nose, then swinging it straight out in the air. 

“That’s how Camp Spirit Moon campers greet each other,” Uncle Marv told 
us. He pushed Alex and me together. “You two try it.” 

I don’t know about you, but this kind of thing embarrasses me. I don’t like 
funny greetings and salutes. It makes me feel like a jerk. 

But I had just arrived at camp. And I didn’t want Uncle Marv to think I was 
a bad sport. So I stood in front of my brother. “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” I shouted. 
And I gave Alex a sharp nose salute. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Alex showed a lot more enthusiasm than I did. He 
likes this kind of thing. He flashed me a sharp salute. 

Uncle Marv tossed back his head in a loud, bellowing laugh. “Very good, 
guys! I think you’re both going to be great Camp Spirit Moon campers.” 

He winked at Chris. “Of course, the campfire tonight is the real test.” 

Chris nodded, grinning. 

“The campfire tonight?” I asked. “A test?” 

Uncle Marv patted my shoulder. “Don’t worry about it, Harry.” 

Something about the way he said that made me worry a lot. 

“All new campers come to a Welcoming Camp-fire,” Chris explained. “It’s 
a chance to learn our Camp Spirit Moon traditions.” 

“Don’t tell them any more about it,” Uncle Marv told Chris sharply. “We 
want them to be surprised—don’t we?” 

“Surprised—?” I choked out. 

Why did I suddenly have such a bad feeling? Why did my throat tighten up 
again? Why did I have a fluttering feeling in my chest? 

“Do we sing camp songs at the Welcoming Campfire?” Alex asked. “I’m 
really into singing. I take voice lessons back home and—” 

“Don’t worry. You’ll sing. Plenty,” Uncle Marv interrupted in a low, almost 



menacing voice. 

I caught the cold look in his tiny eyes—cold as blue ice. And I felt a shiver 
roll down my back. 

He’s trying to scare us, I thought. It’s all a joke. He’s having fun with us. He 
always tries to scare new campers. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. 

“I think you boys will enjoy the campfire tonight,” Uncle Marv boomed. “If 
you survive it!” 

He and Chris shared a laugh. 

“Catch you later,” Chris said. He gave Alex and me a nose salute and 
vanished into the woods. 

“This will be your bunk,” Uncle Marv announced. He pulled open the 
screen door of a tiny white cabin. “Whoa!” He nearly pulled the door off its 
hinges. 

Alex and I dragged our duffels and sleeping bags into the cabin. I saw bunk 
beds against three of the walls. Narrow wooden chests of drawers. Cubbyholes 
for storing things. 

The walls were white. A light dangling from the ceiling cast a bright glow. 
The afternoon sun sent orange rays through a small window above one of the 
bunk beds. 

Not bad, I thought. 

“That bunk is free,” Uncle Marv told us, pointing to the bed against the 
window. “You can decide who gets the top and who gets the bottom.” 

“I need the bottom,” Alex said quickly. “I toss and turn a lot at night.” 

“And he sings in his sleep,” I told Uncle Marv. “Do you believe it? Alex is 
so into singing, he doesn’t even stop when he’s sleeping!” 

“You will have to try out for the talent show,” Uncle Marv told Alex. And 
then he repeated in a low voice, “If you survive tonight.” He laughed. 

Why did he keep saying that? 

He’s kidding, I reminded myself. Uncle Marv is just kidding. 

“The boys’ cabins are on the left,” Uncle Marv told us. “And the girls’ 
cabins are on the right. We all use the lodge and mess hall. It’s that big stone 
building near the woods.” 

“Should we unpack now?” Alex asked. 

Uncle Marv pushed back his greasy black hair. “Yes. Use any cubbies that 
are empty. You’d better hurry, guys. The rest of the campers will be back from 
the woods soon with firewood. It will be time for our campfire.” 



He gave us a “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” and a sharp nose salute. 

Then he turned and lumbered away. The screen door slammed hard behind 

him. 

“Fun guy,” I muttered. 

“He’s kind of scary,” Alex admitted. 

“He’s just joking,” I said. “All summer camps try to terrify the new 
campers. I think.” I dragged my duffel bag over to the bed. 

“But it’s all in fun. There’s nothing to be scared about, Alex,” I told my 
brother. “Nothing at all.” 

I tossed my sleeping bag into the corner. Then I started toward the low 
dresser to see if I could find an empty drawer. 

“Whoa—!” I cried out as my sneaker stuck on something. 

I peered down. 

A blue puddle. 

My sneaker had landed in a sticky blue puddle. 

“Hey—” I tugged my sneaker out. The blue liquid was thick. It stuck to the 
bottom and sides of my shoe. 

I glanced around the room. 

And saw more blue puddles. A sticky blue puddle in front of every bed. 
“What’s going on here? What is this stuff?” I cried. 



4 


Alex had his bag open and was pulling stuff out and spreading it on the bottom 
bed. “What’s your problem, Harry?” he called without turning around. 

“It’s some kind of blue slime,” I replied. “Check it out. There are puddles 
all over the floor.” 

“Big deal,” Alex muttered. He turned and glanced at the blue liquid stuck to 
my sneaker. “It’s probably a camp tradition,” he joked. 

I didn’t think it was funny. “Yuck!” I exclaimed. I reached down and poked 
my finger into the tiny, round puddle. 

So cold! 

The blue slime felt freezing cold. 

Startled, I pulled my hand away. The cold swept up my arm. I shook my 
hand hard. Then I rubbed it, trying to warm it. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

Of course, everything got a lot weirder. In a hurry. 

“Campfire time!” 

Uncle Marv’s cry through the screen door shook our cabin. 

Alex and I spun to face the door. It had taken us forever to unpack our stuff. 
To my surprise, the sun had lowered. The sky outside the door was evening gray. 

“Everyone is waiting,” Uncle Marv announced. A gleeful smile spread over 
his face. His tiny eyes practically disappeared in the smile. “We all love the 
Welcoming Campfire.” 

Alex and I followed him outside. I took a deep breath. The air smelled fresh 
and piney. 

“Wow!” Alex cried out. 

The campfire was already blazing. Orange and yellow flames leaped up to 
the gray sky. 

We followed Uncle Marv to the round clearing where the fire had been 
built. And saw the other campers and counselors for the first time. 

They sat around the fire, all facing us. Watching us. 

“They’re all dressed alike!” I exclaimed. 

“The camp uniform,” Uncle Marv said. “I’ll get you and Alex your camp 



uniforms tonight after the campfire.” 

As Alex and I neared the circle, the campers and counselors rose to their 
feet. A deafening “YOHHHHHHHHHH, SPIRITS!” shook the trees. Then a 
hundred left-handed nose salutes greeted us. 

Alex and I returned the greeting. 

Chris, the red-haired counselor, appeared beside us. “Welcome, guys,” he 
said. “We’re going to roast hot dogs on the fire before the campfire activities 
begin. So grab a stick and a hot dog, and join in.” 

The other kids were lining up in front of a long food table. I saw a huge 
platter of raw hot dogs in the center of the table. 

As I hurried to get in line, several kids said hi to me. 

“You’re in my cabin,” a tall boy with curly blond hair said. “It’s the best 
cabin!” 

“Cabin number seven rules!” a girl shouted. 

“This is an awesome camp,” the kid in front of me turned to say. “You’re 
going to have a great time, Harry.” 

They seemed to be really nice kids. Up ahead, a boy and a girl were having 
a playful shoving match, trying to knock each other out of line. Other kids began 
cheering them on. 

The fire crackled behind me. The orange light from its flames danced over 
everyone’s white shorts and shirts. 

I felt a little weird, not being dressed in white. 

I was wearing an olive-green T-shirt and faded denim cutoffs. I wondered if 
Alex felt weird, too. 

I turned and searched for him in the line. He was behind me, talking 
excitedly to a short blond boy. I felt glad that Alex had found a friend so fast. 

Two counselors handed out the hot dogs. I suddenly realized I was starving. 
Mom had packed sandwiches for Alex and me to eat on the bus. But we were too 
excited and nervous to eat them. 

I took the hot dog and turned to the crackling fire. Several kids were 
already huddled around the fire, poking their hot dogs on long sticks into the 
flames. 

Where do I get a stick? I asked myself, glancing around. 

“The sticks are over there,” a girl’s voice called from behind me—as if she 
had read my mind. 

I turned and saw a girl about my age, dressed in white, of course. She was 



very pretty, with dark eyes and shiny black hair, pulled back in a ponytail that 
fell down her back. Her skin was so pale, her dark eyes appeared to glow. 

She smiled at me. “New kids never know where to find the sticks,” she 
said. She led the way to a pile of sticks leaning against a tall pine tree. She 
picked up two of them and handed one to me. 

“Your name is Harry, right?” she asked. She had a deep, husky voice for a 
girl. Like she was whispering all the time. 

“Yeah. Harry Altman,” I told her. 

I suddenly felt very shy. I don’t know why. I turned away from her and 
shoved the hot dog onto the end of the stick. 

“My name is Lucy,” she said, making her way to the circle of kids around 
the fire. 

I followed her. The kids’ faces were all flickering orange and yellow in the 
firelight. The aroma of roasting hot dogs made me feel even hungrier. 

Four girls were huddled together, laughing about something. I saw a boy 
eating his roasted hot dog right off the stick. 

“Gross,” Lucy said, making a disgusted face. “Let’s go over here.” 

She led me to the other side of the campfire. Something popped in the fire. 
It sounded like a firecracker exploding. We both jumped. Lucy laughed. 

We sat down on the grass, raised the long sticks, and poked our hot dogs 
into the flames. The fire was roaring now. I could feel its heat on my face. 

“I like mine really black,” Lucy said. She turned her stick and pushed it 
deeper into the flames. “I just love that burnt taste. How about you?” 

I opened my mouth to answer her—but my hot dog fell off the stick. “Oh 
no!” I cried. I watched it fall into the sizzling, red-hot blanket of flames. 

I turned to Lucy. And to my surprise—to my horror —she leaned forward. 

Stuck her hand deep into the fire. 

Grabbed my hot dog from the burning embers and lifted it out. 



5 


I jumped to my feet. “Your hand!” I shrieked. 

Yellow flames leaped over her hand and up her arm. 

She handed me the hot dog. “Here,” she said calmly. 

“But your hand!” I cried again, gaping in horror. 

The flames slowly burned low on her skin. She glanced down at her hand. 
Confused. As if she didn’t know why I was in such a panic. 

“Oh! Hey—!” she finally cried. Her dark eyes grew wide. “Ow! That was 
hot!” she exclaimed. 

She shook her hand hard. Shook it until the flames went out. 

Then she laughed. “At least I rescued your poor hot dog. Hope you like 
yours burned!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. I stared at her hand and arm. The flames 
had spread all over her skin. But I couldn’t see any burns. Not a mark. 

“The buns are over there,” she said. “You want some potato chips?” 

I kept staring at her hand. “Should we find the nurse?” I asked. 

She rubbed her arm and wrist. “No. I’m fine. Really.” She wiggled her 
fingers. “See?” 

“But the fire—” 

“Come on, Harry.” She pulled me back to the food table. “It’s almost time 
for the campfire activities to start.” 

I ran into Alex at the food table. He was still hanging out with the short 
blond boy. 

“I made a friend already,” Alex told me. He had a mouthful of potato chips. 
“His name is Elvis. Do you believe it? Elvis McGraw. He’s in our cabin.” 

“Cool,” I muttered. I was still thinking about the flames rolling up and 
down Lucy’s arm. 

“This is a great camp,” Alex declared. “Elvis and I are going to try out for 
the talent show and the musical.” 

“Cool,” I repeated. 

I grabbed a hot dog bun and tossed some potato chips on my plate. Then I 
searched for Lucy. I saw her talking to a group of girls by the fire. 



“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” a deep voice bellowed. No way anyone could 
mistake that cry. It had to be Uncle Marv. 

“Places around the council fire, everyone!” he ordered. “Hurry—places, 
everyone!” 

Holding plates and cans of soda, everyone scurried to form a circle around 
the fire. The girls all sat together and the boys all sat together. I guessed each 
cabin had its own place. 

Uncle Marv led Alex and me to a spot in the middle. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” he cried again, so loud the fire trembled! 

Everyone repeated the cry and gave the salute. 

“We’ll begin by singing our camp song,” Uncle Marv announced. 

Everyone stood up. Uncle Marv started singing, and everyone joined in. 

I tried to sing along. But of course I didn’t know the words. Or the tune. 

The song kept repeating the line, “We have the spirit—and the spirit has 

us.” 

I didn’t really understand it. But I thought it was pretty cool. 

It was a long song. It had a lot of verses. And it always came back to: “We 
have the spirit—and the spirit has us.” 

Alex was singing at the top of his lungs. What a show-off! He didn’t know 
the words, either. But he was faking it. And singing as loud as he could. 

Alex is so crazy about his beautiful singing voice and his perfect pitch. He 
has to show it off whenever he can. 

I gazed past my brother. His new friend, Elvis, had his head tossed back and 
his mouth wide open. He was singing at the top of his lungs, too. 

I think Alex and Elvis were having some kind of contest. Seeing who could 
sing the leaves off the trees! 

The only problem? Elvis was a terrible singer! 

He had a high, whiny voice. And his notes were all coming out sour. 

As my dad would say, “He couldn’t carry a tune in a wheelbarrow!” 

I wanted to cover my ears. But I was trying to sing along, too. 

It wasn’t easy with the two of them beside me. Alex sang so loud, I could 
see the veins in his neck pulsing. Elvis tried to drown him out with his sour, off- 
key wails. 

My face felt hot. 

At first, I thought it was the heat from the blazing campfire. But then I 
realized I was blushing. 



I felt so embarrassed by Alex. Showing off like that on his first night at 
camp. 

Uncle Marv wasn’t watching. He had wandered over to the girls’ side of the 
fire, singing as he walked. 

I slipped back, away from the fire. 

I felt too embarrassed to stay there. I’ll sneak back into place as soon as the 
song is over, I decided. 

I just couldn’t sit there and watch my brother act like a total jerk. 

The camp song continued. “We have the spirit—and the spirit has us,” 
everyone sang. 

Doesn’t the song ever end? I wondered. I backed away, into the trees. It felt 
a lot cooler as soon as I moved away from the fire. 

Even back here, I could hear Alex singing his heart out. 

I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself. I’ve got to tell him it isn’t cool to 
show off like that. 

“Ohh!” I let out a sharp cry as I felt a tap on my shoulder. 

Someone grabbed me from behind. 

“Hey—!” I spun around to face the trees. Squinted into the darkness. 

“Lucy! What are you doing back here?” I gasped. 

“Help me, Harry,” she pleaded in a whisper. “You’ve got to help me.” 



6 


A chill ran down my back. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered. 

She opened her mouth to reply. But Uncle Marv’s booming voice 
interrupted. 

“Hey, you two!” the camp director shouted. “Harry! Lucy! No sneaking off 
into the woods!” 

The campers all burst out laughing. I could feel my face turning hot again. 
I’m one of those kids who blushes very easily. I hate it—but what can I do? 

Everyone stared at Lucy and me as we made our way back to the fire. Alex 
and Elvis were slapping high fives and laughing at us. 

Uncle Marv kept his eyes on me as I trudged back. “I’m glad you make 
friends so easily, Harry,” he boomed. And all the campers started laughing at 
Lucy and me again. 

I felt so embarrassed, I wanted to shrivel up and disappear. 

But I was also worried about Lucy. 

Had she followed me to the woods? Why? 

Why did she ask me to help her? 

I sat down between Lucy and Elvis. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered. 

She just shook her head. She didn’t look at me. 

“Now I’m going to tell the two ghost stories,” Uncle Marv announced. 

To my surprise, some kids gasped. Everyone suddenly became silent. 

The crackling of the fire seemed to get louder. Behind the pop and crack of 
the darting flames, I heard the steady whisper of wind through the pine trees. 

I felt a chill on the back of my neck. 

Just a cool breeze, I told myself. 

Why did everyone suddenly look so solemn? So frightened? 

“The two ghost stories of Camp Spirit Moon have been told from 
generation to generation,” Uncle Marv began. “They are tales that will be told 
for all time, for as long as dark legends are told.” 

Across the fire, I saw a couple of kids shiver. 

Everyone stared into the fire. Their faces were set. Grim. Frightened. 

It’s only a ghost story, I told myself. Why is everyone acting so weird? 



The campers must have heard these ghost stories already this summer. So 
why do they look so terrified? 

I snickered. 

How can anyone be afraid of a silly camp ghost story? 

I turned to Lucy. “What’s up with these kids?” I asked. 

She narrowed her dark eyes at me. “Aren’t you afraid of ghosts?” she 
whispered. 

“Ghosts?” I snickered again. “Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts,” I told her. 
“And ghost stories never scare us. Never!” 

She leaned close to me. And whispered in my ear: “You might change your 
mind—after tonight.” 



7 


The flames flickered, crackling up to the dark, starry sky. Uncle Marv leaned 
into the orange firelight. His tiny, round eyes sparkled. 

The woods suddenly became quiet. Even the wind stopped whispering. 

The air felt cold on my back. I scooted closer to the campfire. I saw others 
move closer, too. No one talked. All eyes were on Uncle Marv’s smiling face. 

Then, in a low voice, he told the first ghost story.... 

A group of campers went into the woods for an overnight. They carried tents and 
sleeping bags. They walked single file along a narrow dirt path that twisted 
through the trees. 

Their counselor’s name was John. He led them deeper and deeper into the 
woods. 

Dark clouds floated overhead. When the clouds covered the full moon, the 
darkness swept over the campers. They walked close together, trying to see the 
curving path. 

Sometimes the clouds moved away, and the moonlight poured down on 
them. The trees glowed, silvery and cold, like ghosts standing in the forest. 

They sang songs at first. But as they moved deeper into the woods, their 
voices became tiny and shrill, muffled by the trees. 

They stopped singing and listened to the scrape of their footsteps and the 
soft rustlings of night animals scampering through the weeds. 

“When are we going to stop and set up camp?” a girl asked John. 

“We have to go deeper into the woods,” John replied. 

They kept walking. The air became colder. The trees bent and shivered 
around them in a swirling breeze. 

“Can we set up camp now, John?” a boy asked. 

“No. Deeper,” John replied. “Deeper into the forest.” 

The path ended. The campers had to make their way through the trees, 
around thorny bushes, over a deep carpet of crackling dead leaves. 

Owls hooted overhead. The campers heard the flutter of bat wings. 
Creatures scratched and slithered around their feet. 

“We’re really tired, John,” a boy complained. “Can we stop and set up the 



tents?” 

“Deeper into the woods,” John insisted. “An overnight is no fun unless you 
are deep, deep in the woods.” 

So they kept walking. Listening to the low hoots and moans of the night 
animals. Watching the old trees bend and sway all around them. 

Finally they stepped out into a smooth, wide clearing. 

“Can we set up camp now, John?” the campers begged. 

“Yes,” John agreed. “We are deep in the woods now. This is the perfect 
place.” 

The campers dropped all the bags and supplies in the middle of the clearing. 
Silvery moonlight spilled all around them, making the smooth ground shimmer. 
They pulled out the tents and started to unfold them. 

But a strange sound made them all stop their work. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“What was that?” a camper cried. 

John shook his head. “Probably just the wind.” 

They went back to the tents. They pushed tent poles into the soft, smooth 
ground. They started to unfold the tents. 

But the strange sound made them stop again. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

A chill of fear swept over the campers. 

“What is that sound?” they asked. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of animal,” John replied. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“But it sounds so close!” a boy cried. 

“It’s coming from right above us,” another boy said. “Or maybe beneath 

us!” 

“It’s just a noise,” John told them. “Don’t worry about it.” 

So they set up the tents. And they spread sleeping bags inside the tents. 
Ka-thump ka-thump. 

They tried to ignore the sound. But it was so close. So close. 

And such a strange—but familiar—sound. 

What could it be? the campers wondered. What on earth makes a sound like 

that? 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 



The campers couldn’t sleep. The noise was too loud, too frightening—too 

near. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

They burrowed deep into their sleeping bags. They zipped themselves in 
tight. They covered their ears. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

It didn’t help. They couldn’t escape the sound. 

“John, we can’t sleep,” they complained. 

“I can’t sleep, either,” John replied. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“What should we do?” the campers asked the counselor. 

John didn’t get a chance to answer. 

They heard another Ka-thump ka-thump. 

And then a deep voice growled: “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY 
HEART?” 

The ground shook. 

The campers suddenly realized what the frightening sound was. And as the 
ground rose up, they realized—too late—they had camped on the smooth skin of 
a hideous monster. 

“I guess we went too deep into the woods!” John cried. 

His last words. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

The monster’s heartbeat. 

And then its huge, hairy head lifted up. Its mouth pulled open. And it 
swallowed John and the campers without even chewing. 

And as they slid down the monster’s throat, the sound of the heartbeat grew 
louder and louder. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-THUMP! 

Uncle Marv shouted the last Ka-thump at the top of his lungs. 

Some campers screamed. Some gazed at Uncle Marv in silence, their faces 
tight with fear. Beside me, Lucy hugged herself, biting her bottom lip. 

Uncle Marv smiled, his face flickering in the dancing orange flames. 
Laughing, I turned to Elvis. “That’s a funny story!” I exclaimed. 

Elvis narrowed his eyes at me. “Huh? Funny?” 

“Yeah. It’s a very funny story,” I repeated. 



Elvis stared hard at me. “But it’s true!” he said softly. 



8 


I laughed. “Yeah. For sure,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

I expected Elvis to laugh. But he didn’t. The firelight flickered in his pale 
blue eyes as he stared at me. Then he turned to talk to my brother. 

A chill ran down my back. Why was he acting so weird? 

Did he really think I’d believe a crazy story like that was true? 

I’m twelve years old. I stopped believing in things like the Easter Bunny 
and the Tooth Fairy a long time ago. 

I turned to Lucy. She was still hugging herself, staring intently into the fire. 

“Do you believe him?” I asked, motioning to Elvis. “Is he weird or what?” 

Lucy stared straight ahead. She seemed so deep in thought, I don’t think she 
heard me. 

Finally she raised her head. She blinked. “What?” 

“My brother’s new friend,” I said, pointing to Elvis again. “He said that 
Uncle Marv’s story was true.” 

Lucy nodded, but didn’t reply. 

“I thought it was a funny story,” I said. 

She picked up a twig and tossed it on the fire. I waited for her to say 
something. But she seemed lost in thought again. 

The flames of the campfire had died down. Sparkling red embers and 
chunks of burning wood spread over the ground. Chris and another counselor 
carried fresh logs into the meeting circle. 

I watched them rebuild the fire. They piled armfuls of twigs and sticks onto 
the burning embers. When the sticks burst into flames, the two counselors 
lowered logs over them. 

Then they stepped back, and Uncle Marv took his place in front of the fire. 
He stood with his hands in the pockets of his white shorts. The full moon floated 
behind his head, making his long black hair shine. 

He smiled. “And now I will tell the second traditional story of Camp Spirit 
Moon,” he announced. 

Once again, the circle of campers grew silent. I leaned back, trying to get 
my brother’s attention. But Alex was staring across the fire at Uncle Marv. 

Alex probably thought the first ghost story was kind of dumb, I knew. He 



hates ghost stories even more than I do. He thinks they’re silly baby stuff. And 
so do I. 

So what was Elvis’ problem? 

Was he goofing? Just teasing me? Or was he trying to scare me? 

Unde Marv’s booming voice interrupted my thoughts. “This is a story we 
tell every year at Camp Spirit Moon,” he said. “It’s the story of the Ghost 
Camp.” 

He lowered his deep voice nearly to a whisper, so that we all had to lean 
closer to hear him. And in hushed tones, he told us the story of the Ghost Camp. 

The story takes place at a camp very much like Camp Spirit Moon. On a warm 
summer night, the campers and counselors met around a blazing council fire. 

They roasted hot dogs and toasted marshmallows. They sang the camp 
songs. One of the counselors played a guitar, and he led them in singing song 
after song. 

When they were tired of singing, the counselors took turns telling ghost 
stories. And telling the legends of the camp, legends that had been passed on 
from camper to camper for nearly a hundred years. 

The evening grew late. The campfire had died low. The moon floated high 
in the sky, a pale full moon. 

The camp director stepped forward to end the council meeting. 

Suddenly, darkness swept over the circle of campers. 

They all looked up—and saw that the moon had been covered by a heavy 
blanket of black clouds. 

And swirls of fog came drifting over the camp. A cold, wet fog. Cloudy 
gray at first. Then darkening. 

And thickening. 

Until the fog swept over the camp, billowing like black smoke. 

Tumbling and swirling, the cold wet fog rolled over the dying campfire. 
Rolled over the campers and counselors. Over the cabins and the lake and the 
trees. 

A choking fog, so thick and dark the campers couldn’t see each other. 
Couldn’t see the fire. Or the ground. Or the moon in the sky. 

The fog lingered for a short while, swirling and tossing, low over the 
ground. Wet, so wet and silent. 

It moved on just as silently. 



Like smoke blown away. 

The moonlight shone through. The grass sparkled as if a heavy dew had 
settled. 

The fire was out. Dark purple embers sizzled over the ground. 

The fog swirled away. Swept over the trees. And vanished. 

And the campers sat around the dead campfire. Their eyes blank. Their 
arms limp at their sides. 

Not moving. Not moving. Not moving. 

Because they were no longer alive. 

The fog had left a ghost camp in its wake. 

The campers, the counselors, the camp director—they were all ghosts now. 
All spirits. All ghosts. Every last one of them. 

They climbed to their feet. And returned to their bunks. 

They knew the ghost camp was their home now— forever! 

With a smile, Uncle Marv stepped back from the fire. 

I glanced around the circle. The faces were so solemn. No one smiled or 
laughed. 

It’s a pretty good story, I thought. Kind of scary. 

But it doesn’t have much of an ending. 

I turned to see what Alex thought. 

And gasped when I saw the terrified expression on his face. “Alex—what?” 
I cried, my voice cutting through the silence of the circle. “What’s wrong?” 

He didn’t reply. His eyes were raised to the sky. He pointed up. 

I gazed up too—and let out a cry of horror. 

As a black, swirling fog came sweeping over the camp. 



9 


My mouth dropped open as I watched the fog roll closer. It darkened the ground 
as it moved steadily toward us. 

Darkened the trees. Darkened the sky. 

This is crazy, I told myself. 

This is impossible ! 

I scooted next to Alex. “It’s just a coincidence,” I told him. 

He didn’t seem to hear me. He jumped to his feet. His whole body 
trembled. 

I stood up beside him. “It’s only fog,” I said, trying to sound calm. “It gets 
foggy out here in the woods all the time.” 

“Really?” Alex asked in a tiny voice. 

The black smoky fog swirled over us. 

“Of course,” I replied. “Hey—we don’t believe in ghosts, remember? We 
don’t think ghost stories are scary.” 

“But—but—” Alex stuttered. “Why is everyone staring at us?” he finally 
choked out. 

I turned and squinted through the thick fog. 

Alex was right. All around the circle, the other campers had their eyes on 
Alex and me. Their faces appeared to dim behind the curtain of dark mist. 

“I—I don’t know why they’re watching us,” I whispered to my brother. 

Fog billowed around us. I shivered. It felt cold against my skin. 

“Harry—I don’t like this,” Alex whispered. 

The fog was so thick now, I could barely see him, even though he stood 
close beside me. 

“I know we don’t believe in ghosts,” Alex said. “But I don’t like this. It— 
it’s too creepy.” 

From the other side of the circle, Uncle Marv’s voice broke the silence. “It’s 
a beautiful fog tonight,” he said. “Let’s all stand up and sing the Camp Spirit 
Moon song.” 

Alex and I were already standing. The other campers and counselors 
obediently climbed to their feet. 



Their pale faces shimmered in and out of the fog. 

I rubbed my arms. Cold and wet. I dried my face with the front of my T- 

shirt. 

The fog grew even heavier and darker as Uncle Marv began to sing. 
Everyone joined in. Beside me, Alex began to sing, quieter this time. 

Our voices were muffled by the heavy mist. Even Uncle Marv’s booming 
voice sounded smaller and far away. 

I tried to sing too. But I didn’t know the words. And my own voice came 
out choked and small. 

As I stared into the swirling fog, the voices faded. Everyone sang, but the 
sound sank into the fog. 

The voices vanished. All of them. All except for Alex’s. 

He seemed to be the only one still singing, his voice pure and soft beside 
me in the dark mist. 

And then Alex stopped singing, too. 

The fog swept on. The darkness lifted. 

Silvery moonlight washed down on us once again. 

Alex and I gazed around in surprise. 

No one else remained. 

Alex and I were all alone. All alone in front of the dying fire. 



10 


I blinked. And blinked again. 

I don’t know what I expected. Did I think they would all appear again? 

Alex and I gazed across the circle in stunned silence. 

They had vanished with the fog. The campers. The counselors. Uncle Marv. 

A chill ran down my back. My skin still felt damp and cold from the heavy 

mist. 

“Wh-where—?” Alex choked out. 

I swallowed hard. 

A burned log crumbled into the purple embers. The soft thud startled me. 

I jumped. 

And then I started to laugh. 

Alex squinted at me, studying me. “Harry—?” 

“Don’t you see?” I told him. “It’s a joke.” 

He squinted at me harder. “Huh?” 

“It’s a camp joke,” I explained. “It’s a joke they probably always play on 
new campers here.” 

Alex twisted up his whole face. He was thinking about it. But I don’t think 
he believed me. 

“They all ran off into the woods,” I told him. “They hid behind the fog and 
ran away. They were all in on the joke. I’ll bet they do it to every new kid.” 

“But—the fog—” Alex choked out. 

“I’ll bet the fog was a fake!” I exclaimed. “They probably have some kind 
of smoke machine. To help them with the joke.” 

Alex rubbed his chin. I could still see the fear in his eyes. 

“They probably do this all the time,” I assured him. “Uncle Marv tells the 
story. Then somebody turns on the smoke machine. The black smoke rolls over 
the campfire circle. And everyone runs and hides.” 

Alex turned and stared into the woods. “I don’t see anyone hiding back 
there,” he said softly. “I don’t see anyone watching us.” 

“I’ll bet they’re all back at the cabins,” I told him. “I’ll bet they’re waiting 
for us. Waiting to see the looks on our faces.” 



“Waiting to laugh at us for falling for their dumb joke,” Alex added. 

“Let’s go!” I cried. I slapped him on the shoulder. Then I started running 
across the wet grass toward the row of cabins. 

Alex ran close behind. The moon sent a silvery path across the grass in 
front of us. 

Sure enough—as we came near the cabins, the campers all came running 
out. They were laughing and hooting. Slapping each other high fives. 

Enjoying their joke. A joke they play on new campers when the fog rolls in, 
they told us. 

I saw Lucy laughing along with a bunch of girls. 

Elvis grabbed Alex and wrestled him playfully to the ground. 

Everyone teased us and told us how scared we looked. 

“We weren’t scared even for a second,” I lied. “Alex and I figured it out 
before the fog cleared.” 

That made everyone start laughing and cheering all over again. 

“Owoooooooh!” 

Some of the kids cupped their hands around their mouths and made ghost 
howls. 

“Owoooooooh!” 

That led to more laughing and joking. 

I didn’t mind the teasing. Not a bit. 

I felt so relieved. My heart was still pounding like crazy. And my knees felt 
kind of weak. 

But I felt so happy that it was all a joke. 

Every summer camp has its jokes, I told myself. And this is a pretty good 

one. 

But it didn’t fool me. Not for long, anyway. 

“Lights Out in five minutes,” Uncle Marv’s booming command stopped the 
fun. “Lights Out, campers!” 

The kids all turned and scurried to their bunks. 

I stared down the row of cabins, suddenly confused. Which one was ours? 

“This way, Harry,” Alex said. He tugged me toward the third cabin down 
the path. Alex has a better memory than I do for things like that. 

Elvis and two other guys were already in the cabin when Alex and I came 
in. They were getting changed for bed. The other guys introduced themselves. 
Sam and Joey. 



I made my way to the bunk bed and started to undress. 

“Owoooooooh!” A ghostly howl made me jump. 

I spun around and saw Joey grinning at me. 

Everyone laughed. Me, too. 

I like camp jokes, I thought. They’re mean. But they’re kind of fun. 

I felt something soft and gooey under my bare foot. Yuck! I glanced down. 
And saw that I had stepped in a fresh puddle of blue slime. 

The cabin lights went out. But before they did, I saw blue puddles—fresh 
blue puddles—all over the floor. 

The cold blue stuff stuck to the bottom of my foot. I stumbled through the 
dark cabin and found a towel to wipe it off. 

What are these blue puddles? I asked myself as I climbed up to my top 
bunk. 

I glimpsed Joey and Sam in the bunk against the wall. 

I gasped. 

They stared back at me, their eyes shining like flashlights! 

What is going on here? I wondered. 

What are the sticky blue puddles all over the floor? 

And why do Sam and Joey’s eyes glow like that in the dark? 

I turned my face to the wall. I tried not to think about anything. 

I had almost drifted to sleep—when I felt a cold, slimy hand sliding down 
my arm. 



11 


“Huh?” 

I shot straight up. Still feeling the cold, wet touch on my skin. 

I stared at my brother. “Alex—you scared me to death!” I whispered. “What 
do you want?” 

He stood on his mattress, his dark eyes staring at me. “I can’t sleep,” he 
moaned. 

“Keep trying,” I told him sharply. “Why are your hands so cold?” 

“I don’t know,” he replied. “It’s cold in here, I guess.” 

“You’ll get used to it,” I said. “You always have trouble sleeping in new 
places.” 

I yawned. I waited for him to drop back onto the bottom bunk. But he didn’t 
move. 

“Harry, you don’t believe in ghosts—do you?” he whispered. 

“Of course not,” I told him. “Don’t let a couple of silly stories creep you 

out.” 

“Yeah. Right,” he agreed. “Good night.” 

I said good night. He disappeared back to his bed. I heard him tossing 
around down there. He had a very squeaky mattress. 

Poor guy, I thought. That dumb Ghost Camp joke with the fog really 
messed him up. 

He’ll be fine in the morning, I decided. 

I turned and gazed across the dark cabin toward Joey and Sam’s bunk. Were 
their eyes still glowing so strangely? 

No. 

Darkness there. 

I started to turn away—then stopped. 

And stared hard. 

“Oh no!” I murmured out loud. 

In the dim light, I could see Joey. Stretched out. Asleep. 

Floating two feet above his mattress! 



12 


I scrambled to climb out of bed. My legs tangled in the blanket, and I nearly fell 
on my head! 

“Hey—what’s up?” I heard Alex whisper below me. 

I ignored him. I swung myself around, and leaped to the floor. 

“Ow!” I landed hard, twisting my ankle. 

Pain shot up my leg. But I ignored it and hobbled to the door. I remembered 
the light switch was somewhere over there. 

I had to turn on the light. 

I had to see for sure that I was right. That Joey slept floating in the air 
above his bed. 

“Harry—what’s wrong?” Alex called after me. 

“What’s up? What time is it?” I heard Elvis groan sleepily from the bunk 
against the other wall. 

I pulled myself across the cabin. My hand fumbled against the wall until I 
found the light switch. 

I pushed it up. 

The overhead light flashed on, flooding the tiny cabin in white light. 

I raised my eyes to Joey’s bunk. 

He lifted his head from the pillow and squinted down at me. “Harry— 
what’s your problem?” he asked. He was sprawled on his stomach, on top of his 
blanket. 

Not floating in the air. Not floating. 

Resting his head in his hands, yawning and staring down at me. 

“Turn off the light!” Sam barked. “If Uncle Marv catches us with the light 
on...” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Turn it off\ ” Elvis and Sam both insisted. 

I clicked off the light. 

“Sorry,” I muttered. “I thought I saw something.” 

I felt like a jerk. Why did I think I saw Joey floating in the air? 

I must be as creeped out as Alex, I decided. Now I’m seeing things! 



I scolded myself and told myself to calm down. 

You’re just nervous because it’s your first day in a new camp, I decided. 

I started slowly across the cabin to my bed. Halfway there, I stepped in a 
cold, sticky puddle of goo. 

The next morning, Alex and I found our white Camp Spirit Moon uniforms— 
white shorts and T-shirts—waiting for us at the foot of our beds. 

Now we won’t stand out like sore thumbs, I thought happily. 

Now we can really be part of Camp Spirit Moon. 

I quickly forgot about my fears from the night before. I couldn’t wait for the 
camp day to get started. 

That afternoon, Alex tried out for the Camp Spirit Moon talent show. 

I had to be at the soccer field. A bunch of us were supposed to practice 
putting up tents. We were getting ready for an overnight in the woods. 

But I stopped in front of the outdoor stage at the side of the lodge to listen 
to Alex sing. 

A counselor named Veronica, with long, copper-colored hair all the way 
down her back, was in charge of the tryouts. I leaned against a tree and watched. 

A lot of kids were trying out. I saw two guitar players, a boy with a 
harmonica, a tap dancer, and two baton twirlers. 

Veronica played a small upright piano at the front of the stage. She called 
Alex up and asked him what song he wanted to sing. 

He picked a Beatles song he likes. My brother doesn’t listen to any new 
groups. He likes the Beatles and the Beach Boys—all the groups from the 
sixties. 

He’s the only eleven-year-old I know who listens to the oldies station. I feel 
kind of sorry for him. It’s like he was born in the wrong time or something. 

Veronica played a few notes on the piano, and Alex started to sing. 

What a voice! 

The other kids had all been laughing and talking and messing around. But 
after Alex sang for a few seconds, they got real quiet. They huddled close to the 
stage and listened. 

He really sounded like a pro! I mean, he could probably sing with a band 
and make a CD. 

Even Veronica was amazed. I could see her lips form the word “Wow!” as 
she played the piano for Alex. 



When Alex finished singing, the kids all clapped and cheered. Elvis slapped 
Alex a high five as he hopped off the small stage. 

Veronica called Elvis up next. He told her he wanted to sing an Elvis song, 
since he was named after Elvis Presley. 

He cleared his throat and started to sing a song called “Heartbreak Hotel.” 

Well... it really was a heartbreak—because Elvis couldn’t sing a single note 
on key! 

Veronica tried to play along with him. But I could see that she was having 
trouble. I think she probably wanted to stop playing the piano and cover her 
ears! 

Elvis had a high, scratchy voice. And the notes came out really sour. Sour 
enough to make your whole face pucker up. 

The kids around the stage started grumbling and walking away. 

Elvis had his eyes shut. He was so wrapped up in his song, he didn’t even 
see them! 

Doesn’t he know how bad he is? I wondered. Why does he want to enter a 
talent show when he sounds like a squealing dog? 

Elvis started to repeat the chorus. I decided I had to get away from there 
before my eardrums popped. 

I flashed Alex a thumbs-up and hurried to the soccer field. 

Sam, Joey, and a bunch of other kids were already unfolding tents, getting 
ready for tent-raising practice. Chris, the counselor, was in charge. 

He waved to me. “Harry—unroll that tent over there,” he instructed. “Let’s 
see how fast you can put it up.” 

I picked up the tent. It was bundled tightly, no bigger than a backpack. I 
turned it over in my hands. I’d never set up a tent before. I wasn’t even sure how 
to unwrap it. 

Chris saw me puzzling over it and walked over. “It’s easy,” he said. 

He pulled two straps, and the nylon tent started to unfold. “See? Here are 
the poles. Just stretch it out and prop it up.” 

He handed the bundle back to me. 

“Yeah. Easy,” I repeated. 

“What’s that noise?” Joey asked, looking up from his tent. 

I listened hard. “It’s Elvis singing,” I told them. 

The sour notes floated over the soccer field from the stage. 

Sam shook his head. “It sounds like an animal caught in a trap,” he said. 



We all laughed. 

Joey and Sam took off their sneakers and went barefoot. I took mine off, 
too. The warm grass felt good under my feet. 

I unfolded the tent and spread it out on the grass. I piled the tent poles to the 

side. 

The sun felt hot on the back of my neck. I slapped a mosquito on my arm. 

I heard a shout and glanced up to see Sam and Joey wrestling around. They 
weren’t fighting. They were just goofing. 

They both picked up tent poles and started dueling with them, having a wild 
sword fight. They were laughing and having fun. 

But then Sam tripped over a tent. 

He lost his balance. Stumbled forward. Fell hard. 

I let out a scream as the tent pole went right through his foot. 



13 


My stomach lurched. I felt sick. 

The pointed pole had pierced the top of Sam’s foot, nailing his foot to the 
ground. 

Joey gaped, openmouthed, his eyes wide with surprise. 

With a gasp, I searched for Chris. I knew Sam needed help. 

Where had Chris wandered off to? 

“Sam—” I choked out. ‘Til get help. Til—” 

But Sam didn’t cry out. He didn’t react at all. Didn’t even grimace. 

He calmly reached down with both hands—and pulled the pole from his 

foot. 

I let out a groan. My foot ached! In sympathy, I guess. 

Sam tossed the pole aside. 

I stared down at his foot. No cut. No blood. 

It wasn’t bleeding! 

“Sam!” I cried. “Your foot. It’s not bleeding!” 

He turned and shrugged. “It missed my toes,” he explained. 

He dropped onto his knees and started propping up the tent. 

I swallowed hard, waiting for my stomach to stop churning. 

Missed his toes? I thought. Missed his toes? 

I saw the pole sink right into his foot! 

Or was I seeing things again? 

For the rest of the afternoon, I tried not to think about it. I worked on the tent. 
Once I got it spread out, it was easy to set up. 

Chris had us fold and unfold them a few times. Then we had a race to see 
who could set up a tent the fastest. 

I won easily. 

Sam said it was beginner’s luck. 

Chris said I was definitely ready for the overnight. 

“Where do we go for the overnight?” I asked. 

“Deep, deep into the woods,” Chris replied. He winked at Sam and Joey. 



I felt a chill, thinking about Uncle Marv’s ghost story. 

I shook the chill away. No way I was going to let myself get scared by a 
silly camp story. 

We had instructional swim at the waterfront. The lake was clear and cold. 
I’m up to Junior Lifesaver. Joey and I took turns rescuing each other. 

I didn’t think about Sam driving the pole through his foot. I forced it from 
my mind. 

After the swim, I returned to the bunk to get changed for dinner. There were 
fresh puddles of blue goo on the cabin floor. 

Nobody made a big deal about them. I didn’t want to, either. So I tried hard 
not to think about them. 

Alex came in, very excited. “I’m going to be the first act in the talent 
show!” he announced. “And Veronica liked my singing so much, she wants me 
to star in the camp musical.” 

“Way to go!” I cried. I slapped him a high five. Then I asked, “What about 
Elvis?” 

“He’s going to be in the show, too,” Alex replied. “He’s going to be stage 
manager.” 

I pulled on my white Camp Spirit Moon shorts and T-shirt and headed to 
the mess hall for dinner. 

I saw a group of girls come out of the cabins on the other side. I searched 
for Lucy, but didn’t see her. 

I was feeling pretty good. 

Not thinking about the strange things I’d seen. 

Not thinking about the blue puddles of slime. The mysterious black fog. 

Not thinking about the ghost story that Elvis said was tme. 

Not thinking about Lucy sticking her hand into the fire and pulling out my 
flaming hot dog. 

Not thinking about Joey floating above his bed. Or Sam jamming a thick 
pole through his foot. 

And not bleeding. Not crying out. 

So totally calm about it. As if he couldn’t feel it, couldn’t feel any pain. 

I was starving. Looking forward to dinner. Not thinking about any of these 
puzzling things. 

Leeling really good. 

But then Joey ruined my good mood at dinner. And forced all the scary 



thoughts back into my mind. 

The food had just been served. Chicken in some kind of creamy sauce, 
spinach, and lumpy mashed potatoes. 

I didn’t care what it was. I was so hungry, I could eat anything! 

But before I had a chance to eat, Joey called out to me from across the 
table. “Hey, Harry—look!” 

I glanced up from my plate. 

He picked up his fork—and jammed it deep into his neck! 



14 


“Ohhh.” I let out a groan. My fork fell from my hand and clattered to the floor. 

Joey grinned at me. The fork bobbed up and down, stuck in his neck. 

I felt sick. My heart started to pound. 

He pulled the fork out with a hard tug. His grin didn’t fade. “You try it!” he 
called. 

“Joey—stop it!” Elvis cried from across the table. 

“Yeah. Give us a break,” Sam agreed. 

I stared at Joey’s neck. No cut. No fork marks. No blood. 

“How—how did you do that?” I finally stammered. 

Joey’s grin grew wider. “It’s just a trick,” he replied. 

I glimpsed Alex at the end of the table. Had he seen Joey’s “trick”? 

Yes. Alex looked green. His mouth had dropped open in horror. 

“Here. I’ll show you how to do it,” Joey offered. 

He raised the fork again—but stopped when he saw Uncle Marv leaning 
over his shoulder. 

“What’s going on, Joey?” Uncle Marv demanded sharply. 

Joey lowered the fork to the table. “Just kidding around,” he replied, 
avoiding the camp director’s hard stare. 

“Well, let’s eat our dinner, guys,” Uncle Marv said sternly. “Without 
kidding around.” His stubby fingers tightened over Joey’s shoulders. “We have a 
night soccer game, you know. Boys against the girls.” 

Uncle Marv loosened his grip on Joey’s shoulders and moved on to the next 
table. A food fight had broken out there. And the mashed potatoes were flying. 

Joey mumbled something under his breath. I couldn’t hear him over all the 
noise. 

I turned to see how Alex was doing at the end of the table. He had his fork 
in his hand, but he wasn’t eating. He was staring hard at Joey. My brother had a 
very thoughtful expression on his face. 

I knew he was wondering exactly the same thing I was. 

What is going on here? 

Joey said the fork-stabbing was just a trick. But how did he do it? Why 



didn’t it hurt? Why didn’t he bleed? 

“Night soccer games are cool!” Elvis declared. He was stuffing chicken into 
his mouth. The cream sauce ran down his chin. 

“Especially boys against the girls,” Sam agreed. “We’ll kill them! They’re 
pitiful.” 

I glanced at the girls’ table across the room. They were chattering noisily. 
Probably about the soccer game. 

I saw Lucy in the shadows near the wall. She didn’t seem to be talking to 
anyone. She had a solemn expression on her face. 

Did she keep looking over at me? 

I couldn’t really tell. 

I ate my dinner. But my appetite had disappeared. 

“How did you do that fork thing?” I asked Joey. 

“I told you. It’s just a trick,” he replied. He turned away from me to talk to 

Sam. 

Dessert was little squares of red, yellow, and green Jell-O. It was okay. But 
it needed some whipped cream. 

As I was finishing my dessert, I heard some squeals from the front of the 
big room. I turned toward the cries—and saw a bat swooping wildly back and 
forth over the mess hall. 

Some of the younger kids were screaming. But everyone stayed calm at my 
table. 

The bat fluttered noisily, swooping and diving, darting from one end of the 
hall to the other. 

Uncle Marv followed it with a broom. And after only a minute or two, he 
gently pinned the bat to the wall with the straw broom head. 

Then he lifted the bat off the wall, carrying it in one hand. 

It was so tiny! No bigger than a mouse. 

He carried it out the door and let it go. 

Everyone cheered. 

“That happens all the time,” Sam said to me. “It’s because there aren’t any 
screens on the mess hall doors.” 

“And the woods are full of bats,” Joey added. “Killer bats that land in your 
hair and suck the blood out of your head.” 

Sam laughed. “Yeah. Right.” He grinned at me. “That’s what happened to 
Joey. That’s why he acts so weird now.” 



I laughed along with everyone else. 

But I wondered if Sam was really joking. 

I mean, Joey did act weird. 

“Soccer field, everyone!” Uncle Marv boomed from the mess hall door. 
“Check with the sports counselors. Alissa and Mark will set up the teams.” 

Chairs scraped over the stone floor as everyone jumped up. 

I saw Lucy waving to me. But Sam and Joey pulled me away. 

Into a cool, cloudy night. The full moon hidden behind low clouds. The 
grass already wet with a heavy dew. 

The counselors divided up the teams. Alex and I were on the second team. 
That meant we didn’t play the first period. Our job was to stand on the sidelines 
and cheer on the boys’ first team. 

Two floodlights on tall poles sent down wide triangles of white light over 
the field. It wasn’t really enough light. Long shadows spread over the field. 

But that was part of the fun. 

Alex stood close beside me as the game began. The girls’ team scored a 
goal in less than a minute. 

Girls on the sidelines went wild. 

The players on the boys’ team stood around, scratching their heads and 
muttering unhappily. 

“Lucky break! Lucky break!” yelled Mark, a tall, lanky boys’ counselor. 
“Go get them, guys!” 

The game started up again. 

The light from the floodlights appeared to dim. I raised my eyes to the sky 
—and saw fog rolling in. 

Another swirling fog. 

Mark jogged past us, looking like a big stork. “Going to be another foggy 
night,” he said to Alex and me. “Night games are more fun in the fog.” He 
shouted instructions to the boys’ team. 

The thick fog swept over us quickly, driven by a gusting wind. 

Alex huddled close to me. I turned and caught his worried expression. 

“Did you see what Joey did at dinner?” he asked softly. 

I nodded. “He said it was a trick.” 

Alex thought about that for a moment. “Harry,” he said, keeping his eyes on 
the game. “Don’t you think some of these kids are a little weird?” 

“Yeah. A little,” I replied. I thought about the tent pole going through Sam’s 



foot. 

“Something happened at the waterfront,” Alex continued. “I can’t stop 
thinking about it.” 

I watched the game, squinting into the drifting fog. It was getting hard to 
see the players. 

Cheers rang out from the girls’ side. I guessed they had scored another goal. 
Layers of heavy fog blocked my view. 

I shivered. “What happened?” I asked my brother. 

“I had free swim. After tryouts for the show,” he said. “There was my group 
and a couple of girls’ groups. Younger girls, mostly.” 

“The lake is nice,” I commented. “It’s so clear and clean. And not too cold.” 

“Yeah. It’s good,” Alex agreed. He frowned. “But something strange 
happened. I mean—I think it was strange.” 

He took a deep breath. I could see he was really upset. 

“Let’s go, guys! Go, go, go!” Mark shouted to the team. 

The glow from the floodlights twisted and bent in the fog, sending strange 
shadows over the playing field. The fog was so thick now, I had trouble telling 
the players from the shadows. 

“I was floating on top of the water,” Alex continued, wrapping his arms 
around his chest. “Sort of taking it easy. Moving slowly. Stroke... stroke... very 
slow. 

“It was free swim. So we could do what we wanted. Some of the guys were 
having a back-floating race near the shore. But I floated out by myself. 

“The water was so clear. I put my face in the water, and I stared down to the 
bottom. And—and I saw something down there.” 

He swallowed hard. 

“What was it? What did you see?” I asked. 

“A girl,” Alex replied with a shudder. “One of the girls from the younger 
group. I don’t know her name. She has short, curly black hair.” 

“She was under the water?” I demanded. “You mean, swimming 
underwater?” 

“No.” Alex shook his head. “She wasn’t swimming. She wasn’t moving. 
She was way underwater. I mean, near the bottom of the lake.” 

“She dove down?” I asked. 

Alex shrugged. “I got so scared!” he cried over the shouts of the two teams. 
“She wasn’t moving. I didn’t think she was breathing. Her arms floated up and 



down. And her eyes—her eyes stared out blankly into the water.” 

“She drowned ?” I cried. 

“That’s what I thought,” Alex said. “I panicked. I mean, I didn’t know what 
to do. I couldn’t think. I didn’t think. I just dove down.” 

“You dove down to the bottom to get her?” I asked. 

“Yeah. I didn’t really know if I was too late. Or if I should get a counselor. 
Or what,” Alex said, shuddering again. 

“I swam down. I grabbed her arms. Then I gripped her under the shoulders. 
I pulled her up. She floated up easily. Like she was weightless or something. 

“I pulled her up to the surface. Then I started to drag her to the shore. I was 
gasping for breath. Mostly from panic, I think. My chest felt about to burst. I 
was so scared. 

“And then I heard laughing. She laughed at me. I was still holding her 
under the shoulders. She turned—and spit water in my face!” 

“Oh, wow!” I gasped. “Wow, Alex. You mean she was okay?” 

“Yeah,” Alex replied, shaking his head. “She was perfectly okay. She was 
laughing at me. She thought it was really funny. 

“I just stared at her. I couldn’t believe it. I mean, she had been way down at 
the bottom. For a long, long time. 

“I let go of her. She floated away from me, still laughing. 

“I said, ‘How did you do that?’ That’s what I asked her. I asked, ‘How long 
can you hold your breath?’ 

“And that made her laugh even harder. ‘How long?’ I asked. 

“And she said, ‘Along, long time.’ 

“And then she swam back to the other girls.” 

“And what did you do?” I asked Alex. 

“I had to get out of the water,” he replied. “I was shaking all over. I couldn’t 
stop shaking. I—I thought...” His voice trailed off. 

“At least she was okay,” he murmured after a while. “But don’t you think 
that was weird, Harry? And then at dinner, when Joey stuck that fork in his neck 

“It’s weird, Alex,” I said softly. “But it may just be jokes.” 

“Jokes?” he asked. His dark eyes stared hard into mine. 

“Kids always play jokes on new campers,” I told him. “It’s a camp 
tradition. You know. Terrify the new kids. It’s probably just jokes. That’s all.” 

He chewed his bottom lip, thinking about it. Even though he was standing 



so close to me, the swirling black fog made him appear far away. 

I turned back to the game. The boys were moving across the grass toward 
the goal. Passing the ball, kicking it from player to player. They looked unreal, 
moving in and out of the swirling shadows. 

Jokes, I thought. 

All jokes. 

I squinted into the fog. And saw something that couldn’t be a joke. 

A boy kicked the ball to the net. The girls’ goalie moved to block the shot. 
She wasn’t fast enough. Or she stumbled. 

The ball hit her smack in the forehead. 

It made a sickening thud. 

The ball bounced onto the ground. 

And her head bounced beside it. 



15 


I gasped. And started to run. 

Through the thick wisps of black fog. 

The swirling, dark mist seemed to float up from the ground and sweep 
down from the trees. It felt cold and wet on my face as I hurtled toward the girl. 

Squinting into the heavy darkness, I could see her sprawled on her stomach 
on the ground. 

And her head... 

Her head... 

I bent down and grabbed it. I don’t know what I was thinking. 

Did I plan to plop it back on her shoulders? 

In a total panic, trembling with horror, I bent into the swirling mist—and 
picked up the head with both hands. 

It felt surprisingly hard. Inhumanly hard. 

I raised it. Raised it close to my face. 

And saw that I held a soccer ball. 

Not a head. Not a girl’s head. 

I heard a groan. And gazed down to see the girl climb to her knees. She 
muttered something under her breath and shook her head. 

Her head. The head on her shoulders. 

She stood and frowned at me. 

I stared at her face, her head. My whole body was still shaking. 

“Your head—” I choked out. 

She tossed back her straight blond hair. Brushed dirt off her white shorts. 
Then she reached for the ball. 

“Harry—you’re not on the first team!” I heard a boy call. 

“Get off the field!” another boy demanded. 

I turned and saw that the players had all gathered around. 

“But I saw her head fall off!” I blurted out. 

I instantly regretted it. I knew I shouldn’t have said it. 

Everyone laughed. They tossed back their heads and laughed at me. 
Someone slapped me on the back. 



Their grinning, laughing faces floated all around me. For a moment, it 
looked to me as if all their heads had come off. I was surrounded by laughing 
heads, bobbing in the eerie, shadowy light from the floodlights. 

The girl raised her hands to the sides of her head and tugged up. “See, 
Harry?” she cried. “See? It’s still glued on!” 

“Someone better check Harry’s head!” a boy cried. 

Everyone laughed some more. 

A kid came up, grabbed my head, and tugged it. 

“Ow!” I screamed. 

More wild laughter. 

I tossed the goalie the soccer ball. Then I slunk off the field. 

What is wrong with me? I wondered. Why am I so messed up? 

Why do I keep seeing things? 

Am I just nervous because I’m in a new camp? Or am I totally losing it? 

I trudged to the sidelines and kept walking. I didn’t know where I was 
going. I just knew I wanted to get away from the laughing kids, away from the 
soccer game. 

The heavy fog had settled over the field. I glanced back. I could hear the 
players’ shouts and cheers. But I could barely see them. 

I turned and started toward the row of cabins. The dew on the tall grass 
tickled my legs as I walked. 

I was halfway to the cabins when I realized I was being followed. 



16 


I spun around. 

A face floated out of the darkness. 

“Alex!” I cried. In all the excitement over the soccer ball and the goalie’s 
head, I had forgotten all about him. 

He stepped close to me, so close I could see beads of sweat on his upper lip. 
“I saw it, too,” Alex whispered. 

“Huh?” I gasped. I didn’t understand. “You saw what?” 

“The girl’s head,” Alex said sharply. He turned back to the soccer field. To 
see if anyone had followed him, I guess. 

Then he turned back to me and tugged my T-shirt sleeve. “I saw her head 
fall off, too. I saw it bounce on the ground.” 

I swallowed hard. “You did? Really?” 

He nodded. “I thought I was going to puke. It—it was so gross.” 

“But—it didn’t fall off!” I cried. “Didn’t you see? When I ran onto the 
field? I picked up the ball. Not her head.” 

“But I saw it, Harry,” Alex insisted. “At first I thought it was just the fog. 
You know. My eyes playing tricks on me because of the heavy fog. But—” 

“It had to be the fog,” I replied quietly. “That girl—she was perfectly okay.” 

“But if we both saw it...” Alex started. He stopped and sighed. “This camp 
—it’s so weird.” 

“That’s for sure,” I agreed. 

Alex shoved his hands into the pockets of his shorts. He shook his head 
unhappily. “Elvis says the ghost stories are true,” he said. 

I put my hands on Alex’s shoulders. I could feel him trembling. We don’t 
believe in ghosts—remember?” I told him. “Remember?” 

He nodded slowly. 

The first howl made us both jump. 

I turned to the woods. Another eerie howl rose up from the same spot. 

Not an animal howl. Not an animal cry at all. 

A long, mournful howl. A human howl. 

“Owwoooooooooooooo. ” 



Another deeper cry made me gasp. 

Alex grabbed my arm. His hand felt cold as ice. 

“What is that?” he choked out. 

I opened my mouth to reply—but another mournful howl interrupted. 
“Owwoooooooooooo. ” 

I heard two creatures howling. Maybe three. 

Maybe more. 

The eerie wails floated up from behind the trees. Until it sounded as if the 
whole woods were howling. 

Inhuman howls. Ghostly howls. 

“We’re surrounded, Harry,” Alex whispered, still gripping my arm. 
“Whatever it is, it’s got us surrounded.” 



17 


“Owwooooooo. ” 

The frightening wails rose up from the trees. 

“Run!” I whispered to Alex. “To the main lodge. Maybe we can find Uncle 
Marv. Maybe—” 

Heading into the fog, we started running toward the lodge. 

But the howls followed us. And grew louder. 

I heard the heavy thud of footsteps behind us, tromping over the grass. 

We can’t escape, I realized. 

Alex and I both turned at the same time. 

And saw Elvis, Sam, and Joey—grinning as they ran after us. 

Sam cupped his hands around his mouth and let out a long, ghostly howl. 
Laughing, Elvis and Joey tossed back their heads and howled too. 

“You jerks!” I screamed, swinging a fist at them. 

I could feel the blood mshing to my face. 

I felt ready to explode. I wanted to punch those three clowns. And kick 
them. And pound their grinning faces. 

“Gotcha!” Elvis cried. “Gotcha!” He turned to Sam and Joey. “Look at 
them! They’re shaking! Oh, wow! They’re shaking!” 

Sam and Joey laughed gleefully. “Did you think there were wolves in the 
woods?” Sam asked. 

“Or ghosts? Did you think we were ghosts?” Joey demanded. 

“Shut up,” I replied. 

Alex didn’t say a word. He lowered his eyes to the ground. I could see that 
he was as embarrassed as I was. 

“Owwoooooo!” Elvis uttered another high-pitched howl. He threw his arms 
around my brother’s waist and wrestled him to the ground. 

“Get off. Get off!” Alex cried angrily. 

The two of them wrestled around in the wet grass. 

“Did I scare you?” Elvis demanded breathlessly. “Admit it, Alex. You 
thought it was a ghost, right? Right?” 

Alex refused to reply. He let out a groan and heaved Elvis off him. They 



wrestled some more. 

Sam and Joey stepped up beside me, grinning. Very pleased with 
themselves. 

“You guys aren’t funny,” I grumbled. “That was so babyish. Really.” 

Joey slapped Sam a high five. “Babyish?” he cried. “If it was so babyish, 
why did you fall for it?” 

I opened my mouth to reply—but only a choking sound came out. 

Why did I fall for it? I asked myself. 

Why did I let myself get scared by three guys standing behind trees and 
making howling sounds? 

Normally, I would have laughed at such a dumb joke. 

As the five of us walked to the cabin, I thought hard about it. The campers 
and counselors had all been trying to scare Alex and me since we arrived, I 
realized. Even Uncle Marv had tried to scare us with his creepy stories. 

They must have a tradition of trying to scare new campers at Camp Spirit 
Moon, I decided. 

And it works. It really has scared Alex and me. It has made us tense. 
Jumpy. Ready to leap out of our skins at the slightest noise. 

We stepped into the cabin. I clicked the light on. 

Elvis, Sam, and Joey were still laughing, still enjoying their joke. 

Alex and I have got to get it together, I decided. 

We’ve got to shove all the stupid stuff about ghosts out of our heads. 

We don’t believe in ghosts, I told myself. 

We don’t believe in ghosts. We don’t believe in ghosts. 

I repeated that sentence over and over. Like a chant. 

Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts. We’ve never believed in ghosts. 

Never. Never. 

One night later... after a short hike through the woods—I did believe in 
ghosts! 



18 


Alex and I took a lot of teasing the next day. 

Coming out of the mess hall after breakfast, someone tossed a soccer ball at 
me and screamed, “My head! Give me back my head!” 

We had instructional swim in the morning. Joey and Sam and some of the 
other guys started howling like ghosts. Everyone thought it was a riot. 

I saw Lucy hanging out on the shore with some girls from her cabin. The 
other girls were laughing at the ghostly howls. Lucy was the only one who didn’t 
laugh. 

In fact, she had a solemn expression on her face. A thoughtful expression. 

Several times, I caught her staring at me. 

She’s probably thinking about what a total baby I am, I told myself 
unhappily. I’ll bet she feels sorry for me. Because I acted like such a jerk in front 
of everyone on the soccer field last night. 

After instructional swim, I dried myself off. 

Then I wrapped the towel around myself and walked over to Lucy at the 
little boat dock. 

The other girls had wandered away. Lucy stood in her white shorts and T- 
shirt. She had one foot on a plastic canoe, making it bob up and down in the 
shallow water. 

“Hi,” I said. I suddenly realized I didn’t know what to say. 

“Hi,” she replied. 

She didn’t smile. Her dark eyes locked on mine. 

To my surprise, she turned quickly—and ran off. 

“Hey—!” I called. I started to run after her. But stopped when my legs got 
tangled in my towel. “Hey—what’s your problem?” 

She vanished behind the Arts and Crafts cabin. She never looked back. 

I know what her problem is, I told myself sadly. She doesn’t want to be seen 
talking to a total nutcase. To someone who thinks that a girl’s head can roll off. 
And who thinks there are howling ghosts lurking in the woods. 

I wrapped the towel around me. Sam and Joey and some other guys were 
staring at me from the shore. I could see by the grins on their faces that they had 
seen Lucy run away from me. 



“Maybe it’s your breath!” Joey teased. 
They all fell on the ground, howling. 


* * * 


After lunch, we had letter-writing time. The counselors made sure we ah stayed 
in our bunks and wrote letters home to our parents. 

It was a camp rule that we had to write home once a week. “So your parents 
won’t worry about you,” Uncle Marv announced at lunch. “We want them to 
know that you’re having the best summer of your lives—right?” 

“Yohhhhhhhhhh, Spirits!” everyone cheered. 

I wasn’t exactly having the best summer of my life. 

In fact, so far, this was one of the worst. 

But I decided not to write that in my letter home. 

I climbed up to my top bunk and started to think about my letter to Mom 
and Dad. 

Please come and get me, I thought I might write. 

Everyone is weird here. Alex and I are both scared out of our wits. 

No. No way. I couldn’t write that. 

I leaned over the side of the mattress and peered down at my brother. He 
was sitting on his bunk, crouched over his letter. I could see him scribbling 
away. 

“What are you writing?” I called down. 

“I’m telling them about the Camp Spirit Moon talent show,” he replied. 
“How I’m going to be the star. And how I’m going to be in the musical next 
week.” 

“Nice,” I muttered. 

I decided I’d tell my parents only good things, too. Why worry them? Why 
make them think that I’m losing it? 

If Alex isn’t writing about all the weird things, I won’t either, I decided. 

I leaned over my sheet of paper and started my letter: 

Dear Mom and Dad, 

Camp Spirit Moon is a lot more exciting than I ever dreamed.... 

“Tonight’s after-dinner activity is a night hike,” Uncle Marv announced. 

A cheer shook the wooden rafters of the huge mess hah. 



“Where are we going to hike?” someone called out. 

Uncle Marv grinned. “Deep, deep into the woods.” 

Of course, that answer reminded everyone of Uncle Marv’s ghost story. 
Some kids cheered. Others laughed. 

Alex and I exchanged glances. 

But the hike turned out to be fun. A full moon made the woods glow. We 
followed a path that curved around the lake. 

Everyone seemed in a good mood. We sang the camp song so many times, I 
almost learned the words! 

About halfway around the lake, two deer stepped out onto the path. A 
mother and her doe. 

The little one was so cute. It looked just like Bambi. 

The two deer stared at us. They turned up their noses, as if to say, “What are 
you doing in our woods?” 

Then they calmly loped into the trees. 

The path headed through a small, round clearing. As we stepped out of the 
trees, the ground appeared to light up. The moonlight poured down so brightly, I 
felt as if I could see every bush, every weed, every blade of grass. 

It was really awesome. 

I started to relax. Sam, Joey, and I walked along singing, making up funny 
words to songs we knew. We sang “On Top of Spaghetti” about twenty times— 
until kids begged us to stop singing it! 

Why have I been so crazy? I asked myself. 

I’ve made some cool new friends here at Camp Spirit Moon. I’m having an 
excellent time. 

I felt great until we returned to camp. 

The black fog had started to roll in. It greeted us, wrapping its cold, wet 
mists around us, darkening the sky, the ground, the whole camp. 

“Lights Out in ten minutes,” Uncle Marv announced. 

Kids scampered to their cabins. 

But two strong arms held me from behind. Held me back. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. I felt myself being pulled into the trees. 

“Ssshhhhh,” someone whispered in my ear. 

I spun around to find Lucy holding onto me. “What are you doing?” I 
whispered. “We have to go to our bunks. We have to get ready for—” 

“Ssshhhhhh,” she hissed again in my ear. 



Her dark eyes searched my face. Were those tears staining her pale cheeks? 
Clouds of fog rolled around us. 

She loosened her grip on my arms. But her eyes stayed on mine. “Harry, 
you’ve got to help me,” she whispered. 

I swallowed hard. “Lucy, what’s wrong?” 

“I think you know,” she said softly. “It’s all true. What you think. It’s true.” 

I didn’t understand. I stared back at her with my mouth open. 

“We’re ghosts, Harry,” Lucy told me. “We’re all ghosts at this camp.” 

“But, Lucy—” I started. 

“Yes.” She nodded sadly. “Yes. Yes. Yes. I’m a ghost too.” 



19 


The trees disappeared behind the fog. The moonlight made Lucy’s eyes sparkle 
like dark jewels. But the light faded from her eyes as the fog covered the moon. 

I didn’t blink. I didn’t move. I suddenly felt as wooden as the trees hiding 
behind the swirling fog. 

“You—you’re joking, right?” I stammered. “This is one of those great 
Camp Spirit Moon jokes?” 

But I knew the answer. 

I could read the answer in her dark eyes. In her trembling mouth. In her 
pale, pale skin. 

“I’m a ghost,” she repeated sadly. “The stories—they’re true, Harry.” 

But I don’t believe in ghosts! 

That’s what I almost blurted out. 

But how could I not believe in ghosts when one stood right in front of me, 
staring into my face? 

How could I not believe in Lucy? 

“I believe you,” I whispered. 

She sighed. She turned her face away. 

“How did it happen?” I asked. 

“Just as Uncle Marv told in the story,” she replied. “We were sitting around 
the campfire. All of us. Just like the other night. The fog rolled in. Such a dark, 
heavy fog.” 

She sighed again. Even in the darkness, I could see the tears glistening in 
her eyes. 

“When the fog finally floated away,” Lucy continued, “we were all dead. 
All ghosts. We’ve been out here ever since. I can’t explain any more. I don’t 
know any more.” 

“But—when did it happen?” I demanded. “How long... how long have you 
been a ghost, Lucy?” 

She shrugged. “I don’t know. I’ve lost track of time. There is no time when 
you’re a ghost. There’s just one day and then the next. And then the next. 
Forever, I guess.” 

I stared at her without speaking. 



Chill after chill swept down my back. My whole body was shaking. I didn’t 
even try to stop it. 

I reached out and grabbed her hand. 

I guess I wanted to see if she was real or not. One last test to see if she was 
pulling a joke. 

“Oh!” I dropped her hand as its icy cold shot through me. So cold. Her hand 
—as cold as the black fog. 

“You believe me now?” she asked softly. Once again her dark eyes studied 
my face. 

I nodded. “I—I believe you,” I stammered. “I believe you, Lucy.” 

She didn’t reply. 

I could still feel the cold of her hand on my fingers. 

“The blue puddles,” I murmured. “The sticky blue puddles on the cabin 
floor. Do you know what they are?” 

“Yes,” she replied. “Those puddles are drops of protoplasm.” 

“Huh? Protoplasm?” 

She nodded. “The puddles are made when we materialize. When we make 
ourselves visible.” 

She twisted her face into a sorrowful frown. “It takes so much strength to 
make ourselves visible. So much energy. The protoplasm puddles are made when 
we use that energy.” 

I didn’t really understand. 

But I knew when I stepped in them that the slimy blue puddles were 
something strange. Something inhuman. 

Traces of ghosts. 

“And the things Alex and I saw?” I demanded. “Kids floating above their 
bunks? Their eyes glowing like spotlights? Kids stabbing themselves and not 
bleeding? Not crying out in pain?” 

“Some of the kids tried to scare you,” Lucy confessed. “They only wanted a 
little fun, Harry. It isn’t fun being a ghost. Believe me. It isn’t fun spending day 
after day after day out here, knowing you aren’t real anymore. Knowing you will 
never grow. Knowing you will never change.” She uttered a loud sob from deep 
in her chest. “Knowing you will never have a lifel” 

“I—I’m so sorry,” I stammered. 

Her expression changed. 

Her eyes narrowed. Her mouth twisted into an unpleasant sneer. 



I took a step back, suddenly afraid. 

“Help me, Harry,” Lucy whispered. “I can’t stand it anymore. You’ve got to 
help me get away from here.” 

“Get away?” I cried, taking another step back. “How?” 

“You’ve got to let me possess your mind,” Lucy insisted. “You’ve got to let 
me take over your body!” 

20 

“No!” I gasped. 

Panic shot through my body. I felt every muscle tense. The blood throbbed 
at my temples. 

“I need to take over your mind, Harry,” Lucy repeated, stepping toward me. 
“Please. Please help me.” 

“No!” I uttered again. 

I wanted to turn and run. But I couldn’t move. 

My legs felt like Jell-O. My whole body shook. 

I don’t believe in ghosts. 

That thought flashed into my mind. 

But it wasn’t true anymore. 

I stood at the edge of the woods—staring at Lucy. Staring at Lucy’s ghost. 

The fog swept around us. 

Again, I tried to run. But my legs wouldn’t cooperate. 

“Wh-what do you want to do to me?” I finally choked out. “Why do you 
have to take over my mind?” 

“It’s my only way to escape,” Lucy replied. Her eyes locked on mine. “My 
only way.” 

“Why don’t you just run away?” I demanded. 

She sighed. “If I try to leave the camp by myself, I’ll disappear. If I try to 
leave the others, I’ll fade away. I’ll join the mist, be part of the fog.” 

“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. 

I took a step back. The fog seemed to tighten around me, cold and wet. 

Lucy stood two feet in front of me. But I could barely see her. She seemed 
to shimmer in and out with the fog. 

“I need help.” Her voice floated softly. I had to struggle to hear her. “The 
only way a ghost can escape is to take over the mind of a living person.” 

“But—that’s impossible !” I screeched. 

What a dumb thing to say, I scolded myself. Seeing a ghost is impossible! 
Everything happening to me is impossible. 

But it’s happening. 



“I need to possess the mind and body of a living boy or girl,” Lucy 
explained. “I need to take over your body, Harry. I need you to take me away 
from here.” 

“No!” I screamed again. “I can’t! I mean...” My heart thudded so hard, I 
could barely speak. 

“I can’t let you take over my mind,” I finally managed to say. “If you do 
that, I won’t be me anymore.” 

I started to back away. 

I have to get to the cabin, I decided. I have to get Alex. We have to run 
away from this camp. As fast as we can. 

“Don’t be scared,” Lucy pleaded. She followed me. The fog circled us, as if 
holding us inside. 

“Don’t be scared,” Lucy said. “As soon as we are far away from here, I’ll 
get out. I’ll leave your mind. I’ll leave your body. I promise, Harry. As soon as 
we escape this camp, I’ll go away. You will be yourself again. You will be 
perfectly okay.” 

I stopped backing up. My whole body trembled. The fog washed its cold 
mist over me. 

“Please, Harry,” Lucy begged. “Please. I promise you’ll be okay. I 
promise.” 

I squinted at her through the rising mists. 

Should I do it? 

Should I let Lucy take over my mind? 

Will she give it back? 

Can I believe her? 



21 


Lucy floated in front of me. Her dark eyes pleaded with me. “Please,” she 
whispered. 

“No. I’m sorry. I can’t.” The words escaped my lips almost before I thought 
them. “I can’t, Lucy.” 

She shut her eyes. I could see the muscles in her jaw tighten as she gritted 
her teeth. 

“I’m sorry,” I repeated, backing up. 

“I’m sorry too,” she said coldly. Her eyes narrowed. Her lips formed a 
sneer. “I’m really sorry, Harry. But you don’t have a choice. You have to help 
me!” 

“No! No way!” 

I turned and tried to run. 

But something held me back. The fog. It tightened around me. 

The thick, wet mist. A choking mist. It drew around me, pushing me, 
holding me in place. 

I tried to scream for help. But the fog muffled my cry. 

Lucy vanished behind the black fog. 

And then I felt something cold on the top of my head. 

My hair tingled. 

I reached up with both hands. And felt ice. As if a frost had settled over my 

hair. 

“No!” I screamed. “Lucy—no!” 

The cold sank down. My scalp itched. My face froze. 

I rubbed my cheeks. 

Numb. 

Cold and numb. 

“Lucy—please!” I begged. 

I could feel her—so light, so cold—settling into my body. Sinking into my 
brain. 

I could feel her. And I could feel myself slipping away. 

Slipping... slipping... 



As if drifting into a deep sleep. 

The cold spreading over me. Sweeping down my neck. Down my chest. 
“Nooooo!” I uttered a long howl of protest. 

I shut my eyes tight. I knew I had to concentrate. I had to think hard. I had 
to keep awake. I couldn’t let myself fade away. 

I couldn’t let her take over. 

I couldn’t let her shove my mind aside. And take control. Take control of 
my body. 

I set my jaw hard. And kept my eyes shut. And tightened every muscle. 

No! I thought. No—you can’t do this to me, Lucy! 

You can’t take my mind! 

You can’t take over. You can’t—because I won’t let you! 

The cold settled over me. My skin tingled. I felt numb all over. 

And so sleepy... so sleepy... 



22 


“Nooooo!” I tossed back my head in another long howl. 

If I can keep screaming, I can keep awake, I told myself. 

And I can fight Lucy off. I can force her away. 

“Noooooooo!” I wailed into the spinning, whirling fog. 

“Noooooooo!” 

And I felt the cold start to lift. 

“Noooooo!” 

I squeezed my arms. Rubbed my cheeks. And knew the feeling was 
returning. 

“Noooooo!” 

I suddenly felt lighter. And totally alert. 

I did it! I realized. I fought her off! 

But how long did I have before she tried to take over again? 

I took a deep breath. Then another. 

I’m breathing, I told myself. I’m me—and I’m breathing. 

I felt stronger now. I lowered my head and darted into the fog. 

My sneakers pounded the ground. I made my way to the cabin. 

The lights were out. The other guys were in their bunks. 

I burst inside and let the screen door slam behind me. 

“What’s up?” Sam demanded. 

I didn’t answer him. I ran across the room. Grabbed my brother. Shook him 
hard. “Come on. Hurry,” I ordered. 

“Huh?” Alex squinted up at me sleepily. 

I didn’t say another word. I tossed him his shorts and his sneakers. 

I heard the other guys stirring. Joey sat up in his bed. “Harry—where were 
you?” he asked. 

“Lights Out was ten minutes ago,” Sam said. “You’re going to get us ah in 
trouble.” 

I ignored them. “Alex—hurry!” I whispered. 

As soon as he had his sneakers tied, I grabbed his arm and tugged him to 
the door. “Harry—what’s wrong?” he asked. 



“Where are you two going?” I heard Joey call. 

I pulled Alex outside. The screen door slammed behind us. 

“Run!” I cried. “HI explain later. We have to get out of here—now!” 

“But, Harry—” 

I pulled Alex over the grass. The fog had parted enough to let a trail of 
moonlight slip through. We followed the trail to the woods. 

Our sneakers slipped and slid over the wet grass. The only other sound was 
the chirp of crickets and the rush of wind rattling the pine trees. 

After a minute or two, Alex wanted to stop to catch his breath. 

“No,” I insisted. “Keep moving. They’ll follow us. They’ll find us.” 

“Where are we going?” Alex demanded. 

“Deep into the woods,” I told him. “As far away from that camp as we 

can.” 

“But I can’t keep running, Harry,” Alex cried. “My side hurts and—” 

“They’re all ghosts!” I blurted out. “Alex—I know you won’t believe me— 
but you’ve got to try. The kids. The counselors. Uncle Marv. They’re all ghosts!” 

Alex’s expression grew solemn. “I know,” he replied in a tiny voice. 

“Huh? How do you know?” I demanded. 

We squeezed between two tangled tree trunks. Over the chirp of crickets, I 
could hear the lake washing over the shore just beyond some tall shrubs. 

We’re still too close to the camp, I told myself. 

I pulled my brother in the other direction. Away from the lake. Pushing 
aside tall weeds and shrubs, we made our own path, deeper into the woods. 

“Alex—how do you know?” I repeated. 

“Elvis told me,” he replied, wiping sweat off his forehead with his arm. 

We ducked under a tall thorn bush. Thorns scraped the top of my head. I 
ignored the pain and kept moving. 

“Elvis said the ghost story about the fog was true,” Alex continued. “I 
thought he was just trying to scare me. But then he—he—” Alex’s voice trailed 
off. 

We ran into a small clearing. Moonlight made the grass glow like silver. My 
eyes flashed in one direction, then the other. I couldn’t decide which way to run. 

I swatted a mosquito off my arm. “What did Elvis do?” I asked Alex. 

Alex raked back his dark hair. “He tried to take over my mind,” he told me 
in a trembling voice. “He floated into the fog. And then I started to feel really 
cold.” 



Twigs snapped. Dry leaves crackled. 

Footsteps? 

I shoved Alex back into the trees. Out of the clearing. 

We pressed against a wide tree trunk and listened. 

Silence now. 

“Maybe it was a squirrel, or a chipmunk, or something,” Alex whispered. 
“Maybe,” I replied, listening hard. 

Moonlight trickled through the treetops. It made shadows dance over the 
smooth clearing. 

“We have to keep going,” I said. “We’re still too close to the camp. If the 
ghosts follow us...” 

I didn’t finish my thought. I didn’t want to think about what would happen 
if the ghosts followed us. If they caught us... 

“Which way is the highway?” Alex asked, his eyes searching the trees. “It 
isn’t too far from the camp—right? If we can get to the highway, someone will 
give us a ride.” 

“Good idea,” I said. Why hadn’t I thought of that? 

Now here we were, in the middle of the woods. Far from the highway. 

I didn’t even know which direction to go to find it. 

“It must be back that way,” Alex suggested, pointing. 

“No. That’s the way back to the camp,” I argued. 

Alex started to reply—but a loud thumping sound made him stop. “Did you 
hear that?” he whispered. 

I did. 

And then I heard it again. 

A loud thump. Very close by. 

“Is it an animal?” I cried softly. 

“I—I don’t think so,” Alex stammered. 

KA-THUMP. 

Louder. 

Is it a ghost? I wondered. 

Has one of them found us? 

“Quick—this way!” I urged. I grabbed Alex by the wrist and tugged him 

hard. 

We had to get away from whatever was making that frightening noise. 



KA-THUMP. 

Louder. 

“We’re going the wrong way!” I cried. 

We spun around and darted back into the clearing. 

KA-THUMP. 

“Which way?” Alex screeched. “Which way? It—it’s everywhere !” 
KA-THUMP 

And then—from somewhere just ahead of us—a deep, booming voice 
growled, “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY HEART?” 



23 


The ground tumbled and shook. 

Alex and I both let out terrified cries. 

But our cries were drowned out by a rumbling sound that quickly rose to a 

roar. 

The ground gave way beneath us. 

We both raised our arms high as we toppled over. 

I landed on my hands and knees. Alex fell onto his back. The ground 
trembled and tossed, tumbling us around. 

“It—it’s the monsterl” Alex shrieked. 

But that’s impossible! I thought, struggling to my feet. 

That monster is from a story. A dumb camp ghost story. 

It can’t be here in the woods. 

I helped pull Alex up. But the ground shook again, and we both fell to our 
knees. 

KA-THUMP. KA-THUMP. 

“It can’t be real!” I cried. “It can’t—” 

My mouth dropped open in horror as a huge, hairy head raised itself in front 
of us. Its eyes glowed as red as flames—round, terrifying, glowing eyes set deep 
in an ugly, growling face. The creature glared furiously at us. 

“Th-the monster!” Alex stuttered. 

We were both on our knees, bouncing helplessly on the rolling, tossing 
ground. 

Was it the ground? Or the monster’s chest? 

The creature opened an enormous cavern of a mouth. It flashed rows and 
rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

Slowly it raised its head, moving closer. Closer. 

Opening its hairy jaws wide. Preparing to swallow us as we frantically 
struggled to scramble away. 

“Harry—! Harry—!” Alex shrieked my name. “It’s going to eat us! It’s 
going to swallow us whole!” 

And then—in a flash—I had an idea. 



24 


The huge monster uttered a low growl. 

Its hairy mouth opened wider. An enormous purple tongue rolled out. I 
gasped when I saw that the tongue was covered in prickly burrs. 

“Look out, Alex!” I cried. 

Too late. 

The ground tossed, bouncing us both into the air. We landed with a hard 
plop on the tongue. 

“Owwww!” we both howled. It felt like a cactus! 

Slowly, the prickly purple tongue began to slide, carrying us into the 
creature’s open mouth. 

“We don’t believe in monsters,” I told Alex. 

I had to shout over the bellowing of the hungry monster. The tongue carried 
us closer. Closer to the rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

“We don’t believe in this monster!” I shouted. “It is just made up. Part of a 
story. If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!” 

Alex’s whole body shook. He hunched over, making himself into a tight 
ball. “It looks pretty real!” he choked out. 

The tongue dragged us closer. I could smell the monster’s foul breath. I 
could see black stains on its jagged teeth. 

“Concentrate,” I instructed my brother. “We don’t believe in you. We don’t 
believe in you.” 

Alex and I began chanting those words, over and over. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

The purple tongue carried us into the huge mouth. I tried to grab onto the 
teeth. But they were too slippery. 

My hands slid off. I felt myself being swallowed. 

Down, down. Into sour darkness. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” Alex and I continued to 
chant. 

But our voices were muffled as we slid down the creature’s throbbing 
throat. 



“Harry—it swallowed us!” Alex wailed. 

“Keep chanting,” I ordered him. “If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!” 
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

A glob of thick saliva rolled over me. I gagged as it clung to my clothes, my 
skin—hot and sticky. 

The walls of the throat throbbed harder. 

Pulling us down. Down. 

Down into the vast, churning gurgling pit of a stomach below. 

“Ohhhh.” Alex let out a long, defeated sigh. He sank to his knees. He was 
covered in thick saliva too. 

“Keep chanting! It’s got to work! It’s got to!” I screamed. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

“We don’t believe in you! ” 

Alex and I both opened our mouths in screams of horror as we began to fall. 
Falling, falling, into the churning stomach below. 



25 


I shut my eyes. 

And waited for the splash. Waited for the crash. 

Waited to hit the stomach floor. 

Waited. 

When I opened my eyes, I was standing on the ground. Standing next to 
Alex in a grassy clearing. 

The pine trees shivered in the breeze. A full moon poked out from behind 
wispy clouds. 

“Hey—!” I cried. I was so happy to hear my own voice! 

So happy to see the sky. The ground. So happy to breathe the cool air. 

Alex started spinning. Spinning like a top. Laughing at the top of his lungs. 
“We didn’t believe in you!” he cried gleefully. “We didn’t believe in you—and it 
worked!” 

We were both so thrilled. So excited that the monster had vanished. 

Poof! A puff of imagination. 

I started to spin with Alex. Spinning and laughing. 

We stopped when we realized we were no longer alone. 

I let out a startled cry when I saw the faces all around us. The pale, pale 
faces with their glowing eyes. 

I recognized Sam, and Joe, and Lucy, and Elvis. 

I moved close to Alex as the campers—the ghost campers—moved to form 
a circle around us. To trap us. 

Uncle Marv moved into the circle. His tiny eyes glowed red as fire. He 
narrowed them angrily at Alex and me. 

“Capture them!” he bellowed. “Take them back to camp. No one ever 
escapes Camp Spirit Moon.” 

Several counselors moved quickly to grab us. 

We couldn’t move. There was nowhere to run. 

“What are you going to do to us?” I cried. 



26 


“We need living kids,” Unde Marv boomed. “We cannot allow living kids to 
escape. Unless they carry one of us with them.” 

“Noooo!” Alex wailed. “You can’t take over my mind! You can’t! I won’t 
let you!” 

The ghostly circle tightened. The ghost campers moved in on us. 

I tried to stop my legs from shaking. Tried to slow my pounding heart. 

“Alex—we don’t believe in them, either,” I whispered. 

He stared at me, confused for a moment. Then he understood. 

We made the monster vanish by not believing in him. We could do the same 
thing to the ghost campers. 

“Grab them. Take them back to camp,” Uncle Marv ordered the counselors. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you,” Alex and I started to 
chant. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

I stared hard at the circle of ghostly faces. Waited for them to disappear. 

I chanted with my brother. Chanted faster. Chanted louder. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

I shut my eyes. Shut them tight. 

And when I opened them... 

The ghosts were still there. 

“You can’t make us disappear, Harry,” Lucy said, stepping into the circle. 
She narrowed her eyes at me. They glittered cold and silvery in the moonlight. 

“You made the monster disappear because it wasn’t real, just one of our 
ghost tricks,” Lucy explained. “We made you see it. But we’re all real! All of us! 
And we’re not going to vanish in a puff of smoke.” 

“We’re not going away,” Elvis added, moving close to my brother. “In fact, 
we’re coming closer. A lot closer.” 

“I’m taking over your mind,” Lucy whispered to me. “I’m going to escape 
Camp Spirit Moon inside your mind and body.” 

“Nooo! No—please!” I protested. 

I tried to back up. But the other ghost campers had me trapped. 



“You can’t! I won’t let you!” I shrieked to Lucy, frozen in terror. 

“Go away!” Alex shouted at Elvis. 

The woods darkened as clouds swept over the moon. All around me, the 
ghostly eyes appeared to glow brighter. 

I saw Elvis reach for my brother. 

And then my view was blocked by Lucy. She floated up. Up off the ground. 
Up over me. 

“No! Stay away! Stay away!” I screamed. 

But I felt my hair tingle. 

I felt the cold sweep down over me. Down, down. 

I felt Lucy’s ghostly cold. Felt her slipping into my mind. 

Slipping down, down. Taking over. 

And I knew I couldn’t escape. 



27 


“Get away, Lucy. I’m going first!” I heard a voice shout. 

“No way!” a boy cried. “Move out of the way. Uncle Marv said I could be 
first!” 

I could feel the cold sweep up from my body. I opened my eyes—and saw 
Lucy back on the ground. 

Other kids tugged her away. 

“Let go of me!” Lucy screamed, pulling back. “I saw him first!” 

“Finders keepers!” another ghostly girl cried. 

They are fighting over me, I realized. 

They pulled Lucy away. And now they’re fighting to see who will take over 
my mind. 

“Hey—let go!” I heard a ghostly girl cry. I saw her wrestling with another 

girl. 

The ghosts were wrestling and fighting, shoving and clawing at each other. 
I saw the counselors join the fight. 

“Stop this! Stop this!” Uncle Marv bellowed. 

He tried to pull the fighting campers apart. 

But they ignored him and continued to battle. 

And as I stared in horror, they began to spin around me. Faster and faster. A 
ghostly circle of wrestling, fighting, shrieking campers. Boys and girls, 
counselors and Uncle Marv, spinning, struggling, clawing. 

Faster. Faster. 

They spun around and around my brother and me. 

Until they became a swirl of white light. 

And then the light faded. Faded to gray smoke. 

Wisps of smoke that floated to the trees. And disappeared in the trembling 
branches. 

Alex and I stood watching until the last wisp of smoke had floated away. 
“They’re gone,” I choked out. “They fought each other. And they’re gone. 
All of them.” 

I shook my head. I drew in a deep breath of fresh air. 



My heart was still pounding. My whole body trembled. 

But I was okay. Alex and I were okay. 

“Are they really gone?” Alex asked in a tiny voice. 

“Yes. Let’s go,” I said, taking his arm. “Come on. Hurry. Let’s get away 
from here.” 

He followed me eagerly. “Where are we going?” 

“To the highway,” I said. “We’ll walk past the camp to the highway. And 
we’ll stop the first car that comes by. We’ll get to a phone. We’ll call Mom and 
Dad.” 

I slapped my brother on the back. “We’ll be okay, Alex!” I cried happily. 
“We’ll be home before you know it!” 

We walked quickly through the woods. Pushing bushes and weeds out of 
the way. Making our own path. 

As we made our way to the highway, Alex started to hum a song to himself. 

“Whoa!” I cried. “Alex, what’s wrong?” 

“Huh?” He stared at me in surprise. 

I stopped and held him in place. “Sing that again,” I ordered. 

He sang a little more. 

Horrible! His singing was horrible. Totally off-key and sour. 

I stared hard into my brother’s eyes. “Elvis—is that you in there?” I cried. 

Elvis’ voice came out of Alex’s mouth. “Please, Harry, don’t tell,” he 
begged. “I swear I’ll never sing again—if you promise not to tell!” 







Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
IpH 1- 1 

[ if \ v J 

/ \ 

II 

/ VvJBr 


lift 





HOW TO KILL 
A MONSTER 


Goosebumps - 46 
R.L. Stine 





1 


“Why do we have to go there?” I wailed from the backseat of the car. “Why?” 

“Gretchen, I’ve told you three times why.” Dad sighed. “Your mother and I 
have to go to Atlanta. For work!” 

“I know that,” I replied, leaning over the front seat. “But why can’t we go 
with you? Why do we have to stay with Grandma and Grandpa?” 

“Because we said so,” Mom and Dad declared together. 

Because we said so. Once they said those deadly words, there was no use 
arguing. 

I slumped down in my seat. 

Mom and Dad had some kind of work emergency in Atlanta. They got the 
call this morning. 

It’s not fair, I thought. They get to visit a cool city like Atlanta. And Clark 
—my stepbrother—and I have to go to Mud Town. 

Mud Town. 

Well, it’s not really called Mud Town. But it should be. Because it’s a 
swamp. Grandma Rose and Grandpa Eddie live in southern Georgia—in a 
swamp. 

Can you believe it? 

A swamp. 

I stared out the car window. We’d been riding on highways all day. Now we 
were driving on a narrow road through the swamp. 

It was late afternoon. And the cypress trees began to cast long shadows over 
the marshy grass. 

I stuck my head out the window. A blast of hot, humid air hit my face. I 
ducked back in and turned to Clark. His nose was buried in a comic book. 

Clark is twelve—like me. He’s much shorter than I am. Much shorter. And 
he has curly brown hair, brown eyes, and tons of freckles. He looks exactly like 
Mom. 

I’m kind of tall for my age. I have long, straight blond hair and green eyes. 
I look like Dad. 

My parents divorced when I turned two years old. The same thing happened 
to Clark. My dad and his mom married each other right after our third birthdays, 



and we all moved into a new house together. 

I like my stepmother. And Clark and I get along okay, I guess. He acts like 
a jerk sometimes. Even my friends say so. But I think their brothers act like 
jerks, too. 

I stared at Clark. 

Watched him read. 

His glasses slid down his nose. 

He pushed them up. 

“Clark...” I started. 

“Shhhh.” He waved his hand at me. “I’m at the good part.” 

Clark loves comic books. Scary ones. But he’s not brave—so he’s always 
terrified by the time he finishes. 

I glanced out the window again. 

I stared at the trees. At the branches, all draped in long gray webs. They 
dangled from every tree—curtains of gray. They made the swamp look really 
gloomy. 

Mom told me about the gray webs when we were packing this morning. She 
knows a lot about swamps. She thinks swamps are pretty—in a spooky sort of 
way. 

Mom said the gray webs were actually a swamp plant that grew right on the 
trees. 

A plant that grows on a plant. Weird, I thought. Definitely weird. 

Almost as weird as Grandma and Grandpa. 

“Dad, how come Grandma and Grandpa never visit us?” I asked. “We 
haven’t seen them since we were four.” 

“Well, they’re a little strange.” Dad peered at me through the rearview 
mirror. “They don’t like to travel. They almost never leave their house. And they 
live so far back in the swamp, it’s very hard to visit them.” 

“Oh, wow!” I said. “A sleepover with two strange old hermits.” 

“Smelly, strange old hermits,” Clark mumbled, glancing up from his comic. 

“Clark! Gretchen!” Mom scolded. “Don’t talk about your grandparents that 
way.” 

“They’re not my grandparents. They’re hers.” Clark jerked his head toward 
me. “And they do smell. I can still remember it.” 

I punched my stepbrother in the arm. But he was right. Grandma and 
Grandpa did smell. Like a combination of mildew and mothballs. 



I sank deep into my seat and let out a loud yawn. 

It seemed as if we’d been riding in the car for weeks. And it was really 
crowded back there—with me, Clark, and Charley kind of squished together. 
Charley is our dog—a golden retriever. 

I pushed Charley out of the way and stretched out. 

“Quit shoving him onto me!” Clark complained. His comic book dropped to 
the floor. 

“Sit still, Gretchen,” Mom muttered. “I knew we should have boarded 
Charley.” 

“I tried to find a kennel for him,” Dad said. “But no one could take him at 
the last minute.” 

Clark pushed Charley off his lap and reached down for his comic. But I 
grabbed it first. 

“Oh, brother,” I moaned when I read the title. “Creatures from the Muck? 
How can you read this garbage?” 

“It’s not garbage,” Clark shot back. “It’s really cool. Better than those 
stupid nature magazines you read.” 

“What’s it about?” I asked, flipping through the pages. 

“It’s about some totally gross monsters. Half-human. Half-beast. They set 
traps to catch people. Then they hide under the mud. Near the surface,” Clark 
explained. He grabbed the comic from my hand. 

“Then what happens?” I asked. 

“They wait. They wait as long as it takes—for the humans to fall in their 
traps.” Clark’s voice started to quiver. “Then they force them deep into the 
swamp. And make them their slaves!” 

Clark shuddered. He glanced out the window. Out at the eerie cypress trees 
with their long beards of gray. 

It was growing dark now. The trees’ shadows shifted over the tall grass. 

Clark lowered himself in his seat. He has a wild imagination. He really 
believes the stuff he reads. Then he gets scared—like now. 

“Do they do anything else?” I asked. I wanted Clark to tell me more. He 
was really scaring himself good. 

“Well, at night, the monsters rise up from the mud,” he went on, sliding 
down in his seat some more. “And they drag kids from their beds. They drag 
them into the swamp. They drag them down into the mud. No one ever sees the 
kids again. Ever.” 



Clark was totally freaked now. 

“There really are creatures like that in the swamp. I read about them in 
school,” I lied. “Horrible monsters. Half-alligator, half-human. Covered with 
mud. With spiky scales underneath, hidden. If you just brush against one, the 
scales rip the flesh right off your bones.” 

“Gretchen, stop,” Mom warned. 

Clark hugged Charley close to him. 

“Hey! Clark!” I pointed out the window to an old narrow bridge up ahead. 
Its wooden planks sagged. It looked ready to crumble. “I bet a swamp monster is 
waiting for us under that bridge.” 

Clark gazed out the window at the bridge. He hugged Charley closer to 

him. 

Dad began steering the car over the old wooden planks. They rumbled and 
groaned under the weight. 

I held my breath as we slowly rolled across. This bridge can’t hold us, I 
thought. No way. 

Dad drove very, very slowly. 

It seemed to take forever to ride across. 

Clark clung to Charley. He kept his eyes out the window, glued to the 
bridge. 

When we finally neared the end, I let out a long whoosh of air. 

And then I gasped—as a deafening explosion rocked the car. 

“Nooo!” Clark and I both screamed as the car swerved wildly. 

Skidded out of control. 

It crashed into the side of the old bridge. 

Plowed right through the old wood. 

“We-we’re going down!” Dad cried. 

I shut my eyes as we plunged into the swamp. 



2 


We hit hard, with a loud thud. 

Clark and Charley bounced all over the backseat. When the car finally slid 
to a stop, they were sitting on top of me. 

“Is everyone okay?” Mom asked in a shaky voice. She turned to the back. 
“Uh-huh,” I replied. “I guess.” 

We all sat quietly for a moment. 

Charley broke the silence with a soft whimper. 

“Wh-what happened?” Clark stammered. 

“Flat tire.” Dad sighed. “I hope the spare is okay. There’s no way we’re 
going to get help at night in the middle of a swamp.” 

I leaned out the window to check out the tire. Dad was right. It was totally 

flat. 

Boy, were we lucky, I thought. Lucky this was a low bridge. Otherwise... 
“Okay, everybody out of the car,” Mom interrupted my thoughts. “So Dad 
can change the tire.” 

Clark took a long look out the car window before he opened the door. I 
could tell he was afraid. 

“Better be careful, Clark,” I said as he swung his short, stubby legs out the 
door. “The swamp monster likes low targets.” 

“That’s funny, Gretchen. Really funny. Remind me to laugh.” 

Dad headed for the trunk to find the jack. Mom followed. Clark and I 
stepped into the swamp. 

“Oh, gross!” My brand-new white high-tops sank into the thick black mud. 

I let out a long sigh. 

How could anyone live in a swamp? I wanted to know. It was so gross out 

here. 

The air felt thick and soupy. So hot, it was hard to breathe. 

As I pulled my hair back into a scrunchie, I glanced around. 

I couldn’t see much. The sky had darkened to black. 

Clark and I drifted away from the car. “Let’s explore while Dad fixes the 
tire,” I suggested. 



“I don’t think that’s such a great idea,” Clark murmured. 

“Sure it is,” I urged. “There’s nothing else to do. And it’s better than 
standing around here, waiting. Isn’t it?” 

“I—I guess,” Clark stammered. 

We took a few steps into the swamp. My face began to tingle and itch. 

Mosquitoes! Hundreds of them. 

We ducked and dodged, frantically brushing them off our faces, off our bare 
arms. 

“Yuck! It’s disgusting out here!” Clark cried. “I’m not staying here. I’m 
going to Atlanta!” 

“It’s not this buggy at Grandma’s house,” Mom called out. 

“Oh, sure.” Clark rolled his eyes. “I’m going back to the car.” 

“Come on,” I insisted. “Let’s just see what’s over there.” I pointed to a 
patch of tall grass up ahead. 

I stomped through the mud, glancing over my shoulder—to make sure 
Clark was following me. He was. 

As we reached the grass, we could hear a loud rustling deep in the blades. 
Clark and I peered down, straining to see in the dark. 

“Don’t wander too far,” Dad warned, as he and Mom pulled our luggage 
from the trunk, searching for a flashlight. “There might be snakes out there.” 

“Snakes? Whoa!” Clark jumped away. He started running full speed back to 
the car. 

“Don’t be a baby!” I called after him. “Let’s do some exploring.” 

“No way!” He choked out the words. “And don’t call me a baby.” 

“I’m sorry,” I apologized. “Come on. We’ll walk over to that tree. The one 
that towers over the others. It’s not that far away. Then we’ll come right back,” I 
promised. “Puh-lease.” 

Clark and I started toward the tree. 

We walked slowly. Through the darkness. Through the jungle of cypress 
trees. 

The curtains of gray swayed on the tree branches. They were so thick— 
thick enough to hide behind. 

It would be real easy to get lost in here, I realized. Lost forever. 

I shuddered as the heavy gray curtains brushed against my skin. They felt 
like spiderwebs. Huge, sticky spiderwebs. 

“Come on, Gretchen. Let’s turn back,” Clark pleaded. “It’s gross out here.” 



“Just a little further,” I urged him on. 

We made our way carefully through the trees, sloshing through puddles of 
inky water. 

Tiny bugs buzzed in my ears. Bigger ones bit at my neck. I swatted them 
away. 

I stepped forward—onto a dry, grassy patch of ground. “Whoa!” 

The patch started to move. Started to float across the black water. 

I leaped off—and stumbled on a tree root. No—not a tree root. “Hey, Clark. 
Look at this!” I bent to get a better look. 

“What is that?” Clark kneeled beside me and peered at the knobby form. 
“It’s called a cypress knee,” I explained. “Mom told me about them. They 
grow near the cypress trees. They rise up from the roots.” 

“How come Mom never tells me about these things?” he demanded. 

“I guess she doesn’t want to scare you,” I replied. 

“Yeah, right,” he muttered, pushing up his glasses. “Want to go back now?” 
“We’re almost there. See?” I said, pointing to the tall tree. It stood in a 
small clearing just a few feet away. 

Clark followed me into the clearing. 

The air smelled sour here. 

The night sounds of the swamp echoed in the darkness. We could hear low 
moans. Shrill cries. The moans and cries of swamp creatures, I thought. Hidden 
swamp creatures. 

A shiver ran down my spine. 

I moved deeper into the clearing. The tree with the high branches stood 
right before me. 

Clark stumbled over a log. Stumbled into a black pool of mucky water. 
“That’s it,” he groaned. “I’m outta here.” 

Even in the dark, I could see the frightened expression on Clark’s face. 

It was scary in the swamp. But Clark seemed so petrified that I started to 

giggle. 

And then I heard the footsteps. 

Clark heard them too. 

Heavy, thudding footsteps across the black, misty swamp. 

Charging closer. 

Headed straight for us. 

“Come on!” Clark cried, yanking on my arm. “Time to go!” 



But I didn’t move. I couldn’t move. 

Now I could hear the creature’s breathing. Heavy, rasping breaths. Nearer. 
Nearer. 

It came springing out. From behind the gray-bearded tree limbs. 

A tall black form. A huge swamp creature. Loping toward us. Darker than 
the black swamp mud—with glowing red eyes. 



3 


“Charley—! What are you doing down there?” Mom cried, marching into the 
clearing. “I thought you kids were watching him.” 

Charley? 

I’d forgotten all about Charley. 

Charley was the swamp monster. 

“I’ve been looking all over for you,” Mom snapped angrily. “Didn’t we tell 
you to stay by the car? Dad and I have been searching everywhere.” 

“Sorry, Mom,” I apologized. I couldn’t say any more. Charley leaped on me 
and knocked me down—into the mud. 

“Off! Charley! Off!” I shouted. But he planted his huge paws on my 
shoulders and licked my face. 

I was covered in mud. Totally covered. 

“Come on, boy.” Clark tugged on Charley’s collar. “You were scared, 
Gretchen. You thought Charley was a swamp monster.” Clark laughed. “You 
were really scared.” 

“I—I was not,” I sputtered, wiping the mud from my jeans. “I was just 
trying to scare you.” 

“You were really scared. Just admit it,” Clark insisted. “Just admit it.” 

“I was NOT scared.” My voice started to rise. “Who was the one begging to 
go back?” I reminded him. “You! You! You!” 

“What’s all the fighting about?” Dad demanded. “And what are you two 
doing way out here? Didn’t I tell you to stay near the car?” 

“Um, sorry, Dad,” I apologized. “But we were kind of bored, just waiting 
around.” 

“We! What do you mean we? It was all Gretchen’s idea,” Clark protested. 
“She was the one who wanted to explore the swamp.” 

“That’s enough!” Dad scolded. “Everyone—back to the car.” 

Clark and I argued all the way back. Charley trotted by my side, flinging 
more mud on my jeans. 

The flat was fixed—but now Dad had to get the car back on the road. And it 
wasn’t easy. Every time he stepped on the gas, the tires just spun around and 
around in the thick mud. 



Finally, we all got out and pushed. 

Now Mom and Clark were splattered with mud, too. 

As we drove away, I stared out at the dark, eerie marsh. 

And listened to the night sounds. 

Sharp chitters. 

Low moans. 

Shrill cries. 

I’d heard lots of stories about swamp monsters. And I’d read some ancient 
legends about them. Could they be real? I wondered. Do swamp monsters really 
exist? 

Little did I know that I would soon find out the answer to that question. The 
hard way. 



4 


“Yes. Yes. They do.” 

“No way!” I told Dad. “That can’t be where they live!” 

“That’s their house,” Dad insisted as the car bumped up a narrow sandy 
road. “That’s Grandma and Grandpa’s house.” 

“That can’t be their house.” Clark rubbed his eyes. “It’s a swamp mirage. I 
read about them in Creatures from the Muck. The swamp mud plays tricks on 
your eyes. It makes you see things.” 

See what I mean about Clark? He really does believe the stuff he reads. 

And it was beginning to sound right to me, too. How else could you explain 
Grandma and Grandpa’s house? 

A castle. 

A castle in the middle of a swamp. 

Almost hidden in a grove of dark, towering trees. 

Dad pulled the car up to the front door. I stared at the house in the glow of 
the headlights. 

Three stories high. Built of dark gray stone. A turret rose up on the right 
side. On the left, a sliver of white smoke curled from a blackened chimney. 

“I thought swamp houses were smaller,” I murmured, “and built on stilts.” 

“That’s the way they look in my comic,” Clark agreed. “And what’s with 
the windows?” His voice shook. “Are they vampires or something?” 

I stared at the windows. They were tiny. And I could see only three of them. 
Three tiny windows in the entire house. One on each floor. 

“Come on, kids,” Mom said. “Let’s get your luggage.” 

Mom, Dad, and Clark climbed out of the car and headed for the trunk. I 
stood by the car door with Charley. 

The night air felt cold and damp on my skin. 

I stared up. 

Up at the big dark house. Almost hidden behind the trees. In the middle of 
nowhere. 

And then I heard the howl. A mournful howl. From somewhere deep in the 
swamp. 



A chill swept through me. 

Charley pressed against my leg. I bent to pet him. “What could that be?” I 
whispered to the dog in the dark. “What kind of creature howls like that?” 

“Gretchen. Gretchen.” Mom waved from the front door of the house. 
Everyone else had gone inside. 

“Oh, my,” Grandma said as I stepped into the dim entrance. “This can’t be 
our little Gretchen.” She wrapped her frail arms around me and gave me a big 
hug. 

She smelled just the way I had remembered—musty. I glanced at Clark. He 
rolled his eyes. 

I stepped back and forced a smile. 

“Move aside, Rose,” Grandpa yelled. “Let me get a look at her.” 

“He’s a little hard-of-hearing,” Dad whispered to me. 

Grandpa clasped my hand between his wrinkled fingers. He and Grandma 
seemed so slight. So fragile. 

“We’re really happy you’re here!” Grandma exclaimed. Her blue eyes 
twinkled. “We don’t get many visitors!” 

“For a while, we thought you weren’t coming!” Grandpa shouted. “We 
expected you hours ago.” 

“Flat tire,” Dad explained. 

“Tired?” Grandpa wrapped his arms around Dad. “Well, then come in and 
sit down, son.” 

Clark giggled. Mom shoved an elbow into his side. Grandpa and Grandma 
led us into the living room. 

The room was enormous. Our whole house could probably fit inside it. 

The walls were painted green. Drab green. I stared up at the ceiling. Up at 
an iron chandelier that held twelve candles, in a circle. 

An enormous fireplace took up most of one wall. 

The other walls were covered with black-and-white photographs. Yellowed 
with age. 

Photographs everywhere. Of people I didn’t recognize. Probably dead 
relatives, I thought. 

I glanced through a doorway into the next room. The dining room. It 
appeared to be as big as the living room. Just as dark. Just as dreary. 

Clark and I sat down on a tattered green couch. I felt the old springs sag 
under my weight. Charley groaned and stretched out on the floor at our feet. 



I glanced around the room. At the pictures. At the worn rug. At the shabby 
tables and chairs. The flickering light high above us made our shadows dance on 
the dark walls. 

“This place is creepy,” Clark whispered. “And it really smells bad—worse 
than Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I choked back a laugh. But Clark was right. The room smelled strange. 
Damp and sour. 

Why do two old people want to live like this? I wondered. In this musty, 
dark house. Deep in the swamp. 

“Would anyone like something to drink?” Grandma interrupted my 
thoughts. “How about a nice cup of tea?” 

Clark and I shook our heads no. 

Mom and Dad also said no. They sat opposite us. The stuffing in their 
chairs spilled out the backs. 

“Well, you’re finally here!” Grandpa yelled to us. “It’s just great. So, tell 
me—how come you were late?” 

“Grandpa,” Grandma shouted to him, “no more questions!” Then she turned 
to us. “After such a long trip, you must be starving. Come into the kitchen. I 
made my special chicken pot pie—just for you.” 

We followed Grandma and Grandpa into the kitchen. It looked like all the 
other rooms. Dark and dingy. 

But it didn’t smell as ancient as the other rooms. The tangy aroma of 
chicken pot pie floated through the air. 

Grandma removed eight small pies from the oven. One for each of us—and 
a couple of extras in case we were starving, I guessed. 

Grandma placed one on my plate, and I began to dig right in. I was starving. 

As I lifted the fork to my mouth, Charley sprang up from his place on the 
floor and started to sniff. 

He sniffed our chairs. 

The counter. 

The floor. 

He leaped up to the table and sniffed. 

“Charley, stop!” Dad ordered. “Down!” 

Charley jumped from the table. Then he reared up in front of us—and 
curled his upper lip. 

He let out a growl. 



A low, menacing growl that erupted into loud barking. 

Furious barking. 

“What on earth is wrong with him?” Grandma demanded, frowning at the 

dog. 

“I don’t know,” Dad told her. “He’s never done that before.” 

“What is it, Charley?” I asked. I shoved my chair from the table and 
approached him. 

Charley sniffed the air. 

He barked. 

He sniffed some more. 

A chill of fear washed over me. 

“What is it, boy? What do you smell?” 



5 


I grabbed Charley’s collar. Petted him. Tried to calm him down. But he jerked 
out of my grasp. 

He barked even louder. 

I reached for his collar again and tugged him toward me. His nails scraped 
the floor as he pulled away. 

The more I tugged on his collar, the harder Charley fought. He swung his 
head sharply from side to side. And started to growl. 

“Easy, boy,” I said softly. “Eeea—sy.” 

Nothing worked. 

Finally Clark helped me drag Charley into the living room—where he 
started to settle down. 

“What do you think is wrong with him?” Clark asked as we stroked the 
dog’s head. 

“I don’t know.” I stared down at Charley. Restless now, he turned in circles. 
Then he sat. Then turned in circles. Again and again. 

“I just don’t get it. He’s never done that before. Ever.” 

Clark and I decided to wait in the living room with Charley while Mom and 
Dad finished eating. We weren’t hungry anymore. 

“How’s that dog of yours?” Grandpa came in and sat down next to us. He 
ran his wrinkled fingers through his thinning gray hair. 

“Better,” Clark answered, pushing his glasses up. 

“Pet her?” Grandpa hollered. “Sure! If you think that will help.” 

After dinner, Mom, Dad, Grandma, and Grandpa talked and talked—about 
practically everything that had happened since they last saw each other. Eight 
years ago. 

Clark and I were bored. Really bored. 

“Can we, um, watch television?” Clark finally asked. 

“Oh, sorry, dear,” Grandma apologized. “We don’t have a television.” 

Clark glowered at me—as if it was my fault. 

“Why don’t you call Arnold?” I suggested. Arnold is the biggest nerd in our 
neighborhood. And Clark’s best friend. “Remind him to pick up your new 



comic.” 

“Okay,” Clark grumbled. “Um, where’s the phone?” 

“In town.” Grandma smiled weakly. “We don’t know many people—still 
alive. Doesn’t pay to have a phone. Mr. Donner—at the general store—he takes 
messages for us.” 

“Haven’t seen Donner all week, though,” Grandpa added. “Our car broke 
down. Should be fixed soon. Any day now.” 

No television. 

No phone. 

No car. 

In the middle of a swamp. 

This time it was my turn to glower—at Mom and Dad. 

I put on my angriest face. I was sure they were going to take us to Atlanta 
with them now. Absolutely sure. 

Dad glanced at Mom. He opened his mouth to speak. Then he turned 
toward me. And shrugged an apology. 

“Guess it’s time for bed!” Grandpa checked his watch. “You two have to get 
an early start,” he said to Mom and Dad. 

“Tomorrow you’re going to have so much fun,” Grandma assured Clark and 
me. 

“Yes, indeed,” Grandpa agreed. “This big old house is great to explore. 
You’ll have a real adventure!” 

“And I’m going to bake my famous rhubarb pie!” Grandma exclaimed. 
“You kids can help me. You’ll love it. It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after 
one bite!” 

I heard Clark gulp. 

I groaned—loudly. 

Mom and Dad ignored us. They said good night. And good-bye. They were 
leaving real early in the morning. Probably before we got up. 

We followed Grandma up the dark, creaky old steps and down a long, 
winding hall to our rooms on the second floor. 

Clark’s room was right next to mine. I didn’t have a chance to see what it 
looked like. After Clark went in, Grandma quickly ushered me to my room. 

My room. My gloomy room. 

I set my suitcase down next to the bed and glanced around. The room was 
nearly as big as a gym! And it didn’t have a single window. 



The only light came from a dim yellow bulb in a small lamp next to the 

bed. 

A handmade mg covered the floor. Worn thin in spots, its rings of color 
were dingy with age. 

A warped wooden dresser sat against the wall opposite the bed. It leaned to 
one side. The drawers hung out. 

Abed. A lamp. A dresser. 

Only three pieces of furniture in this huge, windowless room. 

Even the walls were bare. Not a single picture covered the dreary gray 
paint. 

I sat down on the bed. I leaned against the bars of the iron headboard. 

I ran my fingers over the blanket. Scratchy wool. Scratchy wool that 
smelled of mothballs. 

“No way I’m going to use that blanket,” I said out loud. “No way.” But I 
knew I would. The room was cold and damp, and I began to shiver. 

I quickly changed into my pajamas and pulled the smelly old blanket over 
me. 

I twisted and turned. Trying to get comfortable on the lumpy mattress. 

I stared up at the ceiling and listened. Listened to the night sounds of the 
creepy old house. Strange creaking noises that echoed through the old walls. 

Then I heard the howls. 

Frightening animal howls on the other side of the wall. 

The sad howls from the swamp. 

I sat up. 

Were they coming from Clark’s room? 



6 


I listened hard, afraid to move. 

Another long, sad howl. From outside. Not from Clark’s room. 

“Stop it!” I scolded myself. “Clark is the one with the wild imagination. 
Not you!” 

But I couldn’t shut out the eerie howls from the swamp. 

Was it an animal? Was it a swamp monster? 

I pressed the pillows over my face. It took me hours to fall asleep. 

When I woke up, I didn’t know if it was morning—or the middle of the 
night. Without a window, it was impossible to tell. 

I read my watch—8:30. Morning. 

I searched through the suitcase for my new pink T-shirt. I needed something 
to cheer me up—and pink is my favorite color. I pulled on my jeans. Slipped on 
my muddy sneakers. 

I dressed quickly. The room reminded me of a prison cell. I wanted to 
escape fast. 

I opened the bedroom door and peeked into the hall. 

Empty. 

But there, across from my room, I saw a small window. I hadn’t noticed it 
the night before. 

A bright ray of sunshine filtered through the dusty glass. I peered outside— 
into the swamp. 

A heavy mist hung over the red cypress trees, casting a soft, rosy glow over 
the wet land. The glowing mist made the swamp look mysterious and unreal. 

Something purple fluttered on a nearby tree limb. A purple bird. A purple 
bird with a bright orange beak. I’d never seen a bird like that before. 

Then I heard the sounds again. 

The horrible howls. The shrill cries. 

From animals hiding deep in the swamp—all kinds of creatures I’d 
probably never seen before. 

Swamp creatures. 

Swamp monsters. 



I shuddered. Then turned away from the window and headed for Clark’s 
room. 

I knocked on the door. “Clark!” 

No answer. 

“Clark?” 

Silence. 

I burst through the door and let out a cry. 

The sheets on Clark’s bed lay in a tangled mess—as if there had been some 
kind of struggle. 

And now there was nothing left of Clark—nothing but part of his pajamas, 
crumpled on the bed! 



7 


“Noooo!” 

I opened my mouth in a terrified cry. 

“Gretchen—what’s your problem?” 

Clark stepped out from the closet. 

He wore a T-shirt, baseball cap, sneakers, and his pajama bottoms. 

“Uh... n-no problem,” I stammered, my heart still pounding. 

“Then why did you scream?” Clark demanded. “And why do you look so 
weird?” 

“I look weird? You’re the one who looks weird,” I snapped. I pointed to his 
pajama bottoms. “Where are your pants?” 

“I don’t know.” He shook his head. “I think Mom must have packed them 
in your suitcase by mistake.” 

I have to stop letting this big, old house spook me. Clark is the one with the 
wild imagination—not me, I reminded myself again. 

“Come on,” I told my stepbrother. “Let’s go back to my room and look for 
your jeans.” 

On the way down to breakfast, Clark stopped to peer out the hall window. 
The mist had cleared. The dew-covered plants glistened in the sunlight. 

“It looks sort of pretty, doesn’t it?” I murmured. 

“Yeah,” Clark replied. “Pretty. Pretty creepy.” 

The kitchen looked pretty creepy too. It was dark—almost as dark in the 
morning as the night before. But the back door was open and some sun splashed 
on the floor and the walls. 

We could hear the sounds of the swamp through the open door. But I tried 
to ignore them. 

Grandma stood by the stove, a spatula in one hand, a huge plate of 
blueberry pancakes in the other. She set down the spatula and plate and wiped 
her hands on her faded flower apron. Then she gave us each a big good-morning 
hug—smearing Clark with pancake batter. 

I pointed at the stains on his shirt and giggled. Then I glanced down at my 
shirt. My brand-new pink T-shirt. Splotched with blueberry stains. 

I glanced around the kitchen for something to use to clean my shirt. The 



room was a disaster. 

Globs of pancake batter dripped from the stove. Batter covered the 
countertops and stuck to the floor. 

Then I took a good look at Grandma. She was a disaster too. 

Her face was striped—blue and white. Flour and blueberry stains filled the 
creases of her wrinkled cheeks. She had flour streaked across her nose and chin. 

“Did you sleep well?” She smiled, and her blue eyes crinkled. With the 
back of her hand, she wiped a wisp of gray hair from her eyes. Now a glob of 
blueberry batter nested in the thin strands of her hair. 

“I did,” Grandpa answered, as a loud shriek rang out from the swamp. 
“Always do. It’s so quiet and peaceful here.” 

I had to smile. Maybe Grandpa is lucky that he’s hard-of-hearing, I thought. 

Grandpa headed out the door, and Clark and I brushed ourselves off. Then 
we took our seats at the table. 

In the middle of the table sat another plate of blueberry pancakes. This plate 
was even bigger than the one Grandma had been holding. And it was stacked 
high with blueberry pancakes. 

“Grandma must think we eat like pigs,” Clark leaned over and whispered. 
“There’s enough here for fifty people.” 

“I know,” I groaned. “And we’ll have to eat them all. Otherwise, she’ll be 
insulted.” 

“We do?” Clark gulped. 

That’s one of the things I really like about my stepbrother. He believes 
almost everything I tell him. 

“Help yourself,” Grandma chirped, carrying two more plates of pancakes to 
the table. “Don’t be shy.” 

Why did Grandma make all these pancakes? I wondered. There’s no way we 
could eat all of them. No way. 

I placed a few pancakes on my plate. Grandma heaped about ten onto 
Clark’s plate. His face turned green. 

Grandma sat down with us. But her plate remained empty. She didn’t take a 
single pancake. 

All those pancakes and she didn’t even take one. I don’t get it, I thought. / 
just don’t get it. 

“What’s that you’re reading, dear?” She pointed to Clark’s rolled-up comic, 
sticking out of the back pocket of his jeans. 



“Creatures from the Muck, ” he answered between bites. 

“Oh, how interesting,” Grandma replied. “I love to read. So does Grandpa 
Eddie. We read all the time. We love mysteries. ‘There’s nothing like a good 
mystery,’ Grandpa Eddie always says.” 

I jumped up from the table. I just remembered—Grandma and Grandpa’s 
presents were still packed in my suitcase. 

Books! Mysteries! Dad told us they loved them. 

“Be right back!” I excused myself and dashed upstairs. 

I started down the long, winding hall to my room. Then stopped when I 
heard footsteps. 

Who could it be? 

I gazed down the dark hall. I gasped when I spotted a shadow moving 
against the wall. Someone else was up here. Someone was creeping toward me. 



8 


I pressed my back against the wall. Held my breath and listened. 

The shadow slid out of view. 

The footsteps grew softer. 

Still holding my breath, I inched down the dark twisting hallway. I peeked 
around a corner. And saw it. 

The shadow. Nearly shapeless in the dim light. 

It moved slowly along the dark green walls, growing smaller as the 
footsteps faded in the distance. 

I crept swiftly but silently, chasing the shadow through the corridor. 

Whose shadow is it? I wondered. Who else is up here? 

I crept closer. 

The shadow on the wall loomed large again. 

My heartbeat quickened as I chased the mysterious shape. 

The shadow turned another corner. I hurried to the turn as quietly as I could. 
And stopped. 

Whoever it was—stood right there. Just beyond the turn. 

I took a deep breath—and peeked around the corner. 

And saw Grandpa Eddie. 

Grandpa Eddie—carrying a huge platter stacked high with blueberry 
pancakes. 

How did Grandpa get up here? I wondered. I thought I saw him go outside. 

Grandpa came in through another door, I decided. That has to be it. This 
house is huge. It probably has lots of doors and halls and stairways I haven’t 
discovered yet. 

But what was he doing up here carrying an enormous tray of pancakes? 
Where was he taking them? 

What a mystery! 

Grandpa Eddie carefully balanced the big silver tray between his hands as 
he made his way down the hall. 

I have to follow him, I thought. I have to see where he’s going. 

I padded down the hallway. I wasn’t too worried about being quiet now. 



After all, Grandpa didn’t hear too well. 

I walked only a few yards behind him. 

When I heard the sounds, I froze. 

Sniffing. Behind me. Furious sniffing. 

Oh, no! Charley! 

Charley bounded down the hall toward me. Sniffing. Sniffing furiously. 
Then the dog spotted me—and stopped. 

“Good dog,” I whispered, trying to shoo him away. “Go back. Go back.” 

But he broke into a run. Barking his head off. 

I grabbed for his collar as he tried to dodge me—to race down the hall to 
Grandpa. 

I grasped the collar tightly. He barked even louder. 

“Rose?” Grandpa Eddie called out. “Is that you, Rose?” 

“Come on, Charley,” I whispered. “Let’s get out of here.” 

I dragged Charley around the corner—before Grandpa could catch me 
spying on him. Tugging the dog, I ducked into my room. 

I sat down on the scratchy blanket for a second to catch my breath. Then I 
quickly rummaged through my suitcase for Grandma and Grandpa’s mystery 
books. 

Where was Grandpa going with those pancakes? I wondered as I hurried 
down the stairs with the presents. 

Why was he creeping along so silently? 

It was a mystery I had to solve. 

If only I had minded my own business.... 



9 


“Why don’t you two go out and play while I clean up these dishes?” Grandma 
suggested after breakfast. “Then you can help me make my sweet-as-sugar 
rhubarb pie!” 

“Play?” Clark grumbled. “Does she think we’re two years old?” 

“Let’s go out, Clark.” I pulled him through the back door. Hanging out in a 
swamp wasn’t exactly my idea of fun. But anything was better than sitting 
around that creepy old house. 

We stepped into the bright sunlight—and I gasped. The hot, steamy air felt 
like a heavy weight against my skin. I tried to breathe deeply—to shake the 
smothered feeling I had. 

“So what are we going to do?” Clark grumbled, also drawing in a deep 
breath. 

I glanced around and spotted a path. It started at the back of the house and 
trailed into the swamp. 

“Let’s explore a little,” I suggested. 

“I am not walking through a swamp,” Clark declared. “No way.” 

“What are you afraid of? Comic-book monsters?” I teased him. “Creatures 
from the muck?” I laughed. 

“You’re a riot,” Clark muttered, scowling. 

We walked a few steps. The sun filtered through the treetops, casting leafy 
shadows along the trail. 

“Snakes,” Clark admitted. “I’m afraid of snakes.” 

“Don’t worry,” I told him. “I’ll watch out for snakes. You watch out for 
gators.” 

“Gators?” Clark’s eyes opened wide. 

“Yeah, sure,” I replied. “Swamps are filled with man-eating alligators.” 

A voice interrupted us. “Gretchen. Clark. Don’t stray too far.” 

I turned and saw Grandpa. He stood a few yards behind us. 

What was that in his hand? 

A huge saw. Its sharp teeth glinted in the sunlight. 

Grandpa headed toward a small, unfinished shed. It stood a few feet off the 
side of the path, tucked between two tall cypress trees. 



“Okay!” I shouted to Grandpa. “We won’t go far.” 

“Want to help finish the shed?” he yelled, waving the saw. “Building things 
builds confidence, I always say!” 

“Um, maybe later,” I answered. 

“Want to help?” Grandpa shouted again. 

Clark cupped his hands around his mouth and yelled, “LA-TER!” Then he 
turned back toward the path. 

And tripped. 

Over a dark form that rose up quickly, silently from the muddy grass. 



10 


“Gator! Gator!” Clark shrieked. 

Grandpa waved his saw wildly. “Later? Later? Okay!” 

“Help me! Help me! It’s got me!” Clark wailed. 

I peered down. 

Down at the dark shape in the grass. 

And laughed. 

“Cypress knee,” I said calmly. 

Clark turned, his mouth still open in fright. He stared at the knobby form in 
the grass. 

“It’s a cypress limb, poking up from the grass,” I explained. “It’s called a 
cypress knee. I showed you one yesterday. Remember?” 

“I remembered!” he lied. “I just wanted to scare you.” 

I started to crack a joke, but I saw Clark’s whole body trembling as he 
picked himself up. I felt kind of sorry for him. “Let’s go back to the house,” I 
suggested. “Grandma is probably waiting for us. To make her sweet-as-sugar 
rhubarb pie.” 

On the way back, I told Clark about seeing Grandpa upstairs, and the huge 
tray of pancakes he carried. But Clark didn’t think it was all that strange. 

“He probably likes to eat in bed,” he said. “Mom and Dad always like 
breakfast in bed.” 

“Yeah, maybe,” I agreed. But I wasn’t convinced. I wasn’t convinced at all. 

“Well, you two look as if you’ve had fun!” Grandma chirped when we 
walked through the door. 

Clark and I glanced at each other and shrugged. 

“Are you ready to bake?” Grandma smiled. “Everything is ready.” She 
waved at the counter, at the pie ingredients all lined up. 

“Who wants to roll out the dough,” she asked, staring straight at me, “while 
I slice the rhubarb?” 

“I guess I will,” I replied. 

Clark sighed. “Uh, maybe I’ll go into the living room and read my comic,” 
he told Grandma, trying to escape. “Mom says I just get in the way when she 
cooks.” 



“Nonsense!” Grandma replied. “You measure out the sugar. Lots and lots of 
sugar.” 

I rolled out the pie dough. It seemed like an awful lot of dough. But then— 
what did I know? I’m never around when Mom bakes. She says I get in the way 
too. 

When the dough was rolled flat, Grandma took over. “Okay, children. You 
sit down at the table and have a nice glass of milk. I’ll finish up.” 

Clark and I weren’t thirsty. But we didn’t feel like arguing. We drank our 
milk and watched Grandma finish making the pie. 

No—not one pie. Three pies. 

“Grandma, how come you’re making three pies?” I asked. 

“I always like to have a little extra,” she explained. “Just in case company 
drops in.” 

Company? I thought. Company? 

I stared at Grandma. 

Is she totally losing it? 

Who did she think was coming to visit? She lives in the middle of nowhere! 

What is going on around here? I wondered. 

Is Grandma really expecting visitors? 

Why does she make so much extra food? 



11 


“Work builds thirst!” Grandpa announced, banging open the kitchen door. He 
headed for the refrigerator. “See! I’m right!” Grandpa pointed to our empty milk 
glasses. “Are you two ready to help with the shed now?” 

“Eddie, the children didn’t come here to work!” Grandma scolded. “Why 
don’t you two have some fun exploring the house? There are endless rooms. I’m 
sure you’ll find some wonderful treasures.” 

“Great idea!” Grandpa’s face lit up with a smile. But it faded quickly. “Just 
one warning. You’ll find a locked room. At the end of the hall on the third floor. 
Now pay attention, children. Stay away from that room.” 

“Why? What’s in it?” Clark demanded. 

Grandma and Grandpa exchanged worried glances. Grandma’s face turned 
bright pink. 

“It’s a supply room,” Grandpa replied. “We’ve stored away things in there. 
Old things. Fragile things. Things that could easily break. So just stay away.” 

Clark and I took off. We were glad to get away. Grandma Rose and 
Grandpa Eddie were nice—but weird. 

The kitchen, living room, and dining room took up most of the first floor. 
And we’d seen them already. 

There was a library on the first floor too. But the books in there were old 
and dusty. They made me sneeze. Nothing very exciting in there. So Clark and I 
headed upstairs. To the second floor. 

We made our way past our bedrooms. 

Past the little hall window. 

We followed the twists and turns of the dim hallway—until we came to the 
next room. 

Grandma and Grandpa’s bedroom. 

“I don’t think we should go in there,” I told Clark. “I don’t think Grandma 
and Grandpa want us snooping through their things.” 

“Come on!” he urged. “Don’t you want to check it out? For pancake 
crumbs.” He laughed. 

I shoved Clark hard. 

“Hey!” he grumbled. His glasses slid down his nose. “It was just a joke.” 



I left my stepbrother in the hall and opened the door to the next room. The 
door was made of heavy, dark wood. It groaned when I pushed it. 

I fumbled in the dark for the light switch. The room glowed a sickly yellow 
—from a single, dirty bulb, dangling from the ceiling. 

In the dreary light, I could make out cartons. A room full of cartons. Stacks 
and stacks of them. 

“Hey! Maybe there’s some cool stuff in these boxes,” Clark said, pushing 
past me. 

Clark began to pry one open. “Whatever is in here must be pretty big,” he 
said, pointing to the carton’s bulging sides. 

I peered over Clark’s shoulder. The room smelled so musty and sour. I held 
my nose and squinted in the dim light. Waiting for Clark to reveal what was 
inside the box. 

Clark struggled with the cardboard flaps—and finally they sprang open. 

“I don’t believe this!” he exclaimed. 

“What?” I demanded, craning my neck. “What?” 

“Newspapers. Old newspapers,” Clark reported. 

We lifted the top layers of newspapers to reveal—more newspapers. Old, 
yellowed newspapers. 

We opened five more boxes. 

Newspapers. 

All the cartons were stuffed with newspapers. A room filled with cartons 
and cartons of newspapers. Dating way back to before Dad was born. More than 
fifty years of newspapers. 

Why would anyone want to save all this stuff? I wondered. 

“Whoa!” Clark leaned over a box across the room. “You’re not going to 
believe what’s in this one!” 

“What? What’s in it?” 

“Magazines.” Clark grinned. 

My brother was starting to get on my nerves. But I made my way across the 
room. I liked magazines. Old ones and new ones. 

I shoved my hand deep inside the magazine box and lifted out a stack. 

I felt something tickle the palm of my hand. Under the magazines. 

I peeked underneath. 

And screamed. 



12 


Hundreds of cockroaches skittered through my fingers. 

I flung the magazines to the floor. 

I shook my hand hard, trying to shake the ugly brown bugs off. “Help me! ” 
I wailed. “Get them off me!” 

I felt prickly legs scurrying up my arm. 

I struggled to brush them off—but there were dozens of them! 

Clark grabbed a magazine from the floor and tried to swat them off. But as 
he whacked my arm, more roaches flew out from the pages. 

Onto my T-shirt. My neck. My face! 

“Ow! Nooo!” I shrieked. “Help me! Help me!” 

I felt a cockroach skitter across my chin. 

I brushed it off—and slapped one off my cheek. 

Frantic, I grabbed Clark’s comic from his back pocket—and began batting 
at the scurrying cockroaches. Brushing and batting. Brushing and batting. 

“Gretchen! Stop!” I heard Clark scream. “Stop! They’re all off. Stop!” 

Gasping for breath, I peered down. 

He was right. They were gone. 

But my body still itched. I wondered if I would itch forever. 

I went out into the hall and sat on the floor. I had to wait for my heart to 
stop pounding before I could speak. “That was so gross,” I finally moaned. 
“Totally gross.” 

“Tell me about it.” Clark sighed. “Did you have to use my comic?” He held 
it up by a corner. Not sure if it was safe to stuff back in his pocket. 

My skin still felt as if prickly roach legs were crawling all over it. I 
shuddered—and brushed myself off one last time. 

“Okay.” I stood up and peered down the dreary hallway. “Let’s see what’s 
in the next room.” 

“Really?” Clark asked. “You really want to?” 

“Why not?” I told him. “I’m not afraid of little bugs. Are you?” 

Clark hated bugs. I knew he did. Big ones and little ones. But he wouldn’t 
admit it. So he led the way into the next room. 



We pushed open the heavy door—and peered inside. 



13 


“Wow! Look at all this junk!” My stepbrother stood in the middle of the room. 
Spinning round and round. Taking it all in. 

A room filled with toys and games. Really old toys and games. Mountains 
of them. 

In one corner stood a rusty tricycle. The big front tire was missing. 

“I bet this belonged to Dad,” I said. It was hard to imagine Dad as a little 
kid, riding this trike. 

I honked the horn. It still worked. 

Clark pulled out a dusty chess set from a banged-up wooden box. He began 
setting up the board while I hunted through the rest of the junk. 

I found a teddy bear with its head badly twisted out of shape. 

A box that held a single roller skate. 

A stuffed toy monkey with one of its arms yanked off. 

I rummaged through bags and bags of little toy soldiers, their uniforms 
faded, their faces rubbed off. 

Then I spotted an antique toy chest. It had a golden carousel painted on it, 
dulled with age. 

I lifted the dusty lid. A porcelain doll rested face down inside the chest. 

I lifted her gently. And turned her face toward me. 

Fine cracks ran across her delicate cheeks. A small chip marred the tip of 
her nose. 

Then I stared into her eyes—and gasped. 

She had no eyes. 

No eyes at all. 

Just two black holes cut out of the space below her small forehead. Two 
gaping black holes. 

“These are Grandma’s treasures?” I croaked. “It’s all junk!” 

I dropped the doll into the chest. 

And heard a squeak. 

From the other side of the room. Next to the door. 

I turned and saw a rocking horse, rocking back and forth. 



“Clark, did you push that horse?” I demanded. 

“No,” Clark replied, softly, watching the horse rock back and forth. Back 
and forth. Squeaking. 

“Let’s get out of here,” I said. “This room is starting to give me the creeps.” 
“Me, too,” Clark said. “Someone beheaded the queen in the chess set. 
Chewed her head right off.” 

Clark leaped over some boxes and jumped into the hall. 

I turned for one last look before I clicked off the light. Totally creepy. 
“Clark?” 

Where did he go? 

I glanced up and down the long hall. 

No sign of him. But he was just there. Standing in the doorway. 

“Clark? Where are you?” 

I walked down the corridor, following its twists and turns. 

A queasy feeling settled in my stomach. My heart began to race. 

“Clark? This isn’t funny.” 

No answer. 

“Clark? Where are you?” 



14 


“BOOOOOO!” 

I let out a long shrill scream. 

Clark stepped out from behind me, bent over with laughter. “Gotcha!” he 
cried. “Gotcha big-time!” 

“That wasn’t funny, Clark,” I growled at him. “It was just dumb. I wasn’t 
even scared.” 

He rolled his eyes. “Why can’t you just admit it, Gretchen? Admit it—just 
once. You were totally scared.” 

“Not!” I insisted. “You just surprised me. That’s all.” I stuffed my hands in 
my jeans pockets so Clark wouldn’t see them shaking. “You’re a real jerk,” I told 
him. 

“Well, Grandma told us to have fun. And that was fun!” he teased. “So 
where should we go now?” 

“We aren’t going anywhere,” I told him angrily. “I’m going to hide in my 
room and read.” 

“Hey! Great idea!” Clark exclaimed. “Let’s play hide-and-seek!” 

“Play? Did I hear you say play?” I asked sarcastically. “I thought you said 
that only two-year-olds play. ” 

“This is different,” Clark explained. “Hide-and-seek in this house is 
definitely not for babies.” 

“Clark, I am not—” 

He didn’t let me finish. “NOT IT!” he cried. Then he took off, running 
down the hall to hide. 

“I don’t want to be It,” I grumbled. “I don’t want to play hide-and-seek.” 

Okay, I told myself. Get this over with. Find Clark fast. Then you can go to 
your room and read. 

I started to count by fives. 

“Five, ten, fifteen, twenty...” I called out, counting to one hundred. Then I 
started down the dark hall. When I reached the end, the hall turned—revealing 
an old winding staircase that led up to the third floor. 

I started to climb the dusty, wooden stairs. They wound round and round. I 
looked up ahead, but I couldn’t see where the steps led. 



I couldn’t even see my own feet. It was totally black in there. 

The stairs creaked and groaned with every step I took. A thick layer of 
grime coated the banister—but I held onto it anyway. And I groped my way up 
—up the dark, winding staircase. 

Breathing hard, I climbed higher and higher. The dust in the air stuck in my 
throat. It smelled sour and old. 

I finally reached the top of the staircase and peered down the third-floor 
hallway. It looked like the one below—with the same twists and turns. 

The same dark green walls. The same dim shaft of light that entered from a 
single window. 

I slowly moved down the hall and opened the first door I reached. 

It was a huge room. Almost as big as the living room. But totally empty. 

The next room was just as large. Just as empty. 

I moved carefully down the dark hall. 

It was really hot up here. Beads of sweat dripped down the sides of my 
face. I blotted them with the sleeve of my T-shirt. 

The next room I entered was small. Well, not exactly small, but the smallest 
I’d seen so far. Against one wall stood an old player piano. 

If it wasn’t so gross up here, I’d come back to this room, I thought. I’d 
come back and see if the old piano worked. 

But right now all I wanted to do was find Clark in his hiding place. And 
leave. 

I walked a little farther. 

Rounded a corner. 

And choked on a scream—as I started to fall. 

No floor! 

No floor at all beneath my feet! 

My hand shot out in the dark, fumbling for something to grab onto. 

I grabbed something hard—an old banister. 

And held on. Held on. Held on. 

I gripped it tightly with both hands and swung myself back. Back up to the 
solid hallway floor. 

My heart pounding, I stared down into the gaping black hole where I had 
fallen. A hole where an old staircase once stood. Now rotted away with age. 

I let out a long sigh. “I’ll get you for this, Clark,” I cried out loud. “I told 
you I didn’t want to play.” 



I hurried down the hall, searching for my stepbrother. Searching quickly. To 
get this dumb game over with. 

And then I stopped. 

And stared—at the door at the end of the hall. 

A door with a shiny metal lock. 

I moved slowly toward the door. A tarnished silver key rested in the 
keyhole. 

What is inside there? I wondered. Why is it locked? 

I stepped closer. 

Why don’t Grandma and Grandpa want us in that room? 

They said it was a supply room. 

Practically every room in this weird old house is a storage room, I thought. 
Why don’t they want us to open that door? 

I stood in front of the door. 

I reached out my hand. 

And wrapped my fingers around the silver key. 



15 


No. 

I pulled my hand away from the doorknob. 

I have to find Clark, I decided. I’m tired of playing this stupid game. I’m 
tired of being It. 

Then I had a great idea. 

I’ll hide! I’ll trick Clark into being It! 

I’ll hide and Clark will get bored waiting for me to find him. He’ll have to 
look for me! 

Perfect! I thought. Now... where shall I hide? 

I searched the rest of the rooms on the third floor—scouting out a good 
hiding place. But the rooms up here were all empty. Nothing to slip behind. 

Nothing to crawl under. 

I returned to the little room with the player piano. Maybe I can figure out a 
way to hide behind that, I thought. 

I tried to push the piano away from the wall. 

Just enough so I could squeeze behind it. But it was way too heavy. I 
couldn’t budge it. 

I made my way back to the door with the silver key—the locked room. 

I peered up and down the dim hall. Had I searched everywhere? Did I miss 
a room? 

That’s when I spotted it. 

A small door. A door in the wall. 

A door I hadn’t noticed before. 

A door to a dumbwaiter. 

I’d seen dumbwaiters in the movies. In big, old houses like this one. They 
were little elevators that carried food and dishes from one floor to another. Pretty 
cool. 

A dumbwaiter! I thought. A perfect place to hide! I turned and started 
toward it—when I heard a crash. A crash—like the sound of a plate dropping. 

A crash coming from the other side of the door with the silver key. 

I pressed my ear against the door. I heard footsteps. 



So that’s where Clark is hiding! I realized. He is such a cheater! He hid in 
the one place he knew I wouldn’t look! 

He hid in the room Grandma and Grandpa told us to stay out of. 

Well, Clark, I thought. Too bad for you. I found you! 

I slipped my fingers around the key and turned it. The lock sprang open 
with a sharp click. I yanked open the door. 

And stared at a hideous monster. 



16 


I nearly fell into the room. 

I couldn’t move. Couldn’t back away. Couldn’t take my eyes off him. 

A living, breathing monster. At least ten feet tall. 

Standing inside the locked room. 

I gaped at his big, furry body. A body like a gorilla—with leaves and tree 
roots and sand tangled in his fur. His head was scaly, with snapping rows of 
jagged alligator teeth. 

A foul stench filled the room. The putrid smell of decay. The smell of the 
swamp. 

My stomach heaved. 

The creature raised his eyes to me—bulging eyes set into the sides of his 
enormous head. 

He held me in his stare for a moment. Then he glanced down at his hairy 
paws—where he balanced a tall stack of pancakes. 

He began stuffing the pancakes into his mouth. Devouring them. Gnashing 
them with his jagged teeth. 

Still gripping the door handle, I stared at the monster as he ate. He jammed 
another stack of pancakes down his throat. He swallowed them whole and 
gmnted with pleasure. 

His horrible alligator eyes went wide. The thick veins in his neck throbbed 
as he ate. 

I tried to call for help. To scream. But when I opened my mouth, no sound 
came out. 

With one hand the monster shoved pancakes into his mouth—stacks at a 
time. With the other, he scratched at one of his furry legs. 

Scratched and scratched. Until he found a big black beetle, nesting in his 
fur. 

He held the beetle up to the side of his head—to one of his bulging eyes. 

The beetle’s legs waved in the air. 

He glared at the beetle. At the waving legs. 

Then he popped the bug into his mouth—and chomped down on its shiny 
black shell with a sickening crunch. 



Blueberries and beetle juice oozed from his mouth. 

Run! I told myself. Run! But I was too terrified to move. 

The creature reached down for another stack of pancakes. 

I forced myself to take a small step back—into the hall. 

The monster jerked his head up. 

He glared at me. Then he let out a deep growl. 

He let the pancakes slide to the floor and lumbered toward me. 

I ran, screaming for help as I charged into the hall. 

“Gretchen! Gretchen! What’s wrong?” Clark turned the corner at the end of 
the corridor. 

“A monster! In the locked room! Hurry!” I shrieked. “Hurry! Get help!” 

I leaped down the stairs. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. “Amonster!” 

I turned to see if the beast was following me—and realized that Clark 
hadn’t moved. 

“There’s a monster in there!” I wailed. “Get away, Clark! Get away!” 

He snickered. “You must think I’m pretty stupid to fall for that one.” 

Clark headed toward the door of the monster’s room. Grinning. 

“No! Please!” I pleaded. “I’m telling the truth!” 

“You just want to scare me. To get even.” 

“I’m not kidding, Clark! Don’t go in there!” I shrieked. “DON’T!” 

Clark reached the door. “Here I am, swamp monster!” he called out as he 
stepped into the room. “Come and get me!” 



17 


A second later Clark’s terrified screams echoed from the room. 

The creature roared over Clark’s cries. 

Charley bounded up the stairs, barking wildly. 

“Run! Run!” Clark came bursting from the room, waving his arms. “A 
monster! A swamp monster!” 

We tore down the stairs, dragging Charley with us. Charley fought hard. He 
wanted to turn around and charge back up the steps. 

“Charley, come!” I pleaded. “Come!” 

But Charley sat down on a step and howled. He wouldn’t budge. 

A bellow thundered through the hall. 

Oh, no! He’s coming! He’s coming after us! 

“PLEASE, CHARLEY!” I begged, yanking on his collar. “PLEASE!” 

Clark stood on the steps, frozen in fear. 

“Help me, Clark!” I pleaded. “Don’t just stand there. Help me!” 

The swamp monster pounded down the hall. The old stairway quaked under 
our feet. 

“He’s coming to get us,” Clark whispered. He still hadn’t moved. 

I grabbed my stepbrother’s T-shirt and yanked him hard. “Help me, Clark!” 
I screamed. “Push Charley!” 

We struggled down the stairs. I tugged Charley and Clark shoved him from 
behind. 

“Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. 

No answer. 

The monster’s roar grew louder. Closer. 

“Lock Charley in the bathroom!” I ordered Clark when we reached the 
second floor. “He’ll be safe there. I’ll find Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I charged down to the kitchen. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I yelled. “Amonster!” 

No one in the kitchen. 

I flew into the living room. “Where are you? Help!” 

Not in the living room. 

I searched the library. Empty. 



I ran back up the stairs. I checked their bedroom and all the other rooms on 
the second floor. 

I couldn’t find them anywhere. 

Where are they? Where could they be? I asked myself. 

Clark stepped out of the bathroom—just in time to hear the monster’s 
footsteps rumbling above us. 

“W-where’s Grandma and Grandpa?” he stammered. 

“I—I don’t know. I can’t find them!” 

“Did you check outside?” His voice came out in a squeak. 

That’s it! I thought. Don’t panic, Gretchen. They must be outside. Probably 
in the back. Grandpa is probably working on the shed. 

We bolted down the stairs and into the kitchen. 

We stopped at the back door. Stared out across the swamp. To the shed. 

No one back there. 

“Where are—?” Clark began. 

“Listen!” I cut Clark off. “Do you hear that?” 

The sound of a car—starting up. 

“Grandpa and Grandma’s car! It’s back! It’s fixed!” I shouted. 

We followed the sound of the engine. It was coming from the front of the 
house. 

We ran to the front door and peered out the window. 

There they were! 

“Huh?” I cried out in shock. 

My grandparents were backing down the driveway. 

They were driving away! 

“No—wait! Wait!” I screamed, turning the lock. 

“They can’t hear you!” Clark shouted. “Open the door! Open it!” 

I yanked on the door. I pulled it as hard as I could. I turned the lock again. 
“Hurry!” Clark shrieked. “They’re leaving us here!” 

I tugged and tugged. And turned the knob frantically. 

Then I realized the horrible truth. 

“It’s bolted from the outside!” I told Clark. “They’ve locked us in!” 



18 


“How could they do this to us?” I wailed. “How could they leave us here? Why 
did they lock us in?” 

The ceiling shook above our heads. Shook hard. Hard enough to send the 
pictures on the living room wall crashing to the floor. 

“What was that?” Clark’s eyebrows shot up. 

“The monster! He’s coming after us!” I croaked. “We have to get out of 
here! We have to find help! ” 

Clark and I ran back to the kitchen. To the kitchen door. 

I twisted the doorknob. Pulled as hard as I could. But this door was also 
jammed shut—barred from the outside. 

We ran through the house. 

We checked all the side doors. 

All stuck. All of them—bolted shut from the other side. 

The monster’s footsteps rumbled above us. 

How could Grandma and Grandpa do this to us? How could they? How 
could they? The question screamed in my head as I charged into the library. To 
the window. 

The only window on the entire first floor. 

Our only escape now. 

I struggled to shove the window up. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

I pounded on the wooden sash with my fists. 

“Look!” Clark choked. He pointed to the grimy pane. “Look!” 

Two rusty nails. Driven into the wooden sash. Nailing the window shut— 
from the outside. 

Nailing us in. 

How could they do this to us? How could they? I chanted silently. How 
could they? 

“We have to break the glass!” I turned to Clark. “It’s the only way out!” 

“Okay!” Clark cried. He leaned forward and began beating his fists against 
the pane. 



“Are you nuts?” I screamed at him. “Find something stronger to—” 

But the rest of my sentence was lost—lost in a deafening crash from above. 
Followed by the thundering clatter of piano keys. 

“Wh-what’s he doing?” Clark stammered. 

“There’s an old piano up there. It sounds as if he’s throwing it across the 
room!” 

The floors, the walls, the library ceiling—everything quaked—as the 
monster hurled the piano across the third-floor room. Over and over again. 

A porcelain vase, a crystal dish, little glass animals flew from a nearby table 
and shattered at our feet. 

I threw my hands over my head as the library books spilled from their 
shelves. 

Clark and I huddled together. On the floor. Waiting for the avalanche of 
books to end. 

Waiting for the monster to stop. 

We huddled there until the house grew silent. 

A final book tumbled from a shelf. It landed on a small table next to me. 

“Hand me that!” I ordered Clark, pointing to a heavy brass candlestick next 
to the book. “Stand back.” 

I turned to the window. I pulled back my arm to swing the heavy 
candlestick—when I heard the whimpering. 

Charley’s whimpering. From upstairs. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “The monster—he’s got Charley!” 



19 


I ran for the stairway, clutching the candlestick in one hand, dragging Clark with 
the other. 

I had to save Charley! I had to! 

I raced up the stairs. I stopped when I reached the top. 

My heart pounded in my chest as I peered down the hall. 

The corridor was empty. 

I crept toward the bathroom. Except for Clark’s raspy breathing and the 
thudding of my heart, the house was still. 

As I neared the bathroom, the bathroom door came into view. 

Shut. 

I gripped the doorknob. It slipped in my sweat-drenched hand. 

I opened the door a crack and peeked inside. But I couldn’t see anything. 

I could feel Clark breathing down my neck as I pushed the door open a bit 
more. 

A bit more. 

“Charley!” I cried out with relief. 

Charley sat in the bathtub. Curled up in a corner. Scared—but safe. 

He gazed up at us with his big brown eyes. He wagged his tail weakly. 
Then he began to bark. 

“Shhhh!” I whispered, petting him. “Please, Charley. Don’t let the monster 
hear you. Quiet, boy.” 

Charley barked even louder. 

So loud that we almost didn’t hear the car pull up outside. 

“Shhhh!” I urged Charley. I turned to Clark. “Did you hear that?” 

His mouth dropped open. “A car door!” 

“Yes!” I cried. 

“Grandma and Grandpa are back!” Clark shouted. “I’ll bet they brought 
help!” 

“Stay,” I commanded Charley as we eased out of the bathroom. “Good boy. 
Stay.” 

Clark slammed the door behind us, and we bolted down the stairs. 



“I knew they’d be back! I knew they wouldn’t just leave us!” I flew down 
the steps, two at a time. 

And heard the engine start. 

Heard the car rumble away. 

Heard the tires crunch down the driveway. 

“Noooo!” I shouted as I reached the front door. “Don’t go! Don’t go!” 

I pounded the door with my fists. I kicked it hard. And then I saw the pink 
slip of paper on the floor, slipped under the door. 

A message. I picked it up with a trembling hand. And started to read: 

We’re not coming back. Until next week. Sorry, kids. But work is taking 
much longer than we thought. 

A phone message—from Mom and Dad. 

Grandma and Grandpa didn’t come back, I realized. Mr. Donner, from the 
general store, had driven over to deliver this phone message. 

The roar of the monster tore through my thoughts. 

I spun around. 

Clark was gone. 

“Clark!” I shouted. “Where are you?” 

The monster’s growls grew louder. Meaner. 

“Clark!” I called out again. “Clark!” 

“Gretchen—come quick!” I heard his desperate cry from the kitchen. 



20 


“Gretchen! Gretchen!” 

As I charged through the living room, he shouted my name over and over 
again. Each time his voice grew higher, more excited. 

“I’m coming!” I yelled. “Hold on, Clark. I’m coming!” 

I rounded the couch—and tripped over a footstool. My head hit the floor 

hard. 

Clark continued to cry out my name, but his voice seemed distant now. So 
far away. 

My head throbbed with pain. 

I struggled to stand, and the room spun around me. 

“Gre-tchen! Gre-tchen!” 

He sounded more frantic than ever. 

“I’m coming!” I said through a dizzy haze. 

Then I heard the monster’s bellow. It thundered through the house. 

I have to get to Clark. He’s in trouble! The monster has him! I realized. 

I stumbled through the living room. Toward the kitchen. 

The creature’s roars shook the walls. 

“Hold on, Clark!” I tried to shout, but my voice came out in a moan. “I’m 
coming!” 

I stumbled into the kitchen. 

“Gretchen!” Clark stood next to the refrigerator. 

Alone. 

“Where is he?” I cried. My eyes darted around the room, searching for the 
monster. 

“Wh-where’s who?” Clark stammered. 

“The monster!” I yelled. 

“Upstairs,” Clark replied, puzzled. “What took you so long to get here?” 

Clark didn’t wait for an answer. “Look at this.” He pointed to the 
refrigerator. I turned and saw two letters stuck there with magnets. 

“You were screaming like a maniac to show me that?” I shrieked. “I nearly 
killed myself! I thought the monster had grabbed you!” 



Clark’s hand trembled as he lifted the envelopes from the refrigerator. “It’s 
two letters addressed to us. From Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I stared at the envelopes in Clark’s hand. They were addressed to us, just as 
he said. And they were numbered, one and two. 

“They left us letters?” I couldn’t believe it. 

Clark ripped open the first envelope. The paper shook in his hands as he 
began to read it to himself. 

His eyes scanned the paper. He mumbled as he read. I couldn’t understand 
what he was saying. 

“Let me have that!” I reached out for the letter, but Clark jerked back. He 
held the paper tightly and continued to read. 

“Clark, what does it say?” I demanded. 

He ignored me. He pushed his glasses up on his nose and kept on reading. 
Mumbling. 

I watched Clark as he read. 

I watched his eyes move down the page. 

I watched his eyes grow wide with horror. 



21 


“Clark!” I shouted impatiently. “What does it say?” 

Clark began to read the letter out loud. “'Dear Gretchen and Clark,’” he 
started. The paper fluttered between his trembling fingers. 

“'We’re sorry to do this to you, but we had to leave. A few weeks ago, a 
swamp monster invaded our house. We captured it in the room upstairs. Then we 
didn’t know what to do with it. We didn’t have a car, so we couldn’t get to a 
phone to call for help. 

'“We’ve lived in terror for the past few weeks. We were afraid to let the 
monster out. It’s so loud and angry all the time. We know it would have killed 
us.’” 

My knees started to wobble as Clark continued. 

'“We didn’t want to tell your parents about the creature. If we did, they 
wouldn’t have let you come. We don’t get many visitors here. We wanted so 
much to see you. But I guess we were wrong. You should have gone to Atlanta 
with your mother and father. I guess we were wrong to let you stay.’” 

“They guess they were wrong! They guess!” I shrieked. “Can you believe 
them?” 

Clark peered up from the letter. His face was white. Even his freckles 
seemed to disappear. He shook his head, stunned. 

Then he continued to read our grandparents’ letter. '“We’ve been feeding 
the creature, slipping food through an opening Grandpa sawed in the bottom of 
the door. The monster eats a lot. But we had to feed him. We were afraid not to. 

'“We know it’s unfair to mn off now. But we’re just going for help. We’ll 
be back—as soon as we can find someone. Someone who knows what to do with 
this horrible beast. 

'“Sorry, kids. We really are—but we had to bolt you inside the house. To 
make sure you didn’t wander into the swamp by yourselves. It’s not safe out 
there.’” 

Were they for real?” 

“Not safe out there'.” I cried. “They left us in this house with a killer 
monster—and they say it’s not safe out there! They’re both crazy, Clark. Totally 
crazy!” 



Clark nodded and continued reading. “‘Sorry, kids. We really, really are 
sorry. But just remember one thing: You are perfectly safe as long as...’” 

The monster upstairs let out a loud bellow. And Clark dropped the letter. 

I watched in horror as it sailed through the air. 

Floated down to the floor. 

And slid under the refrigerator. 

“Get it, Clark!” I yelled. “Quick!” 

Clark stretched out on the floor and shoved his fingers under the 
refrigerator. But his fingers only managed to brush the tip of the paper, shoving it 
back. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re pushing it away!” 

But Clark didn’t listen. 

He shoved his hand in deeper. Groping for the paper. 

Pushing it back. Farther and farther. 

Until we couldn’t see it anymore. 

“What did it say?” I hollered. “You read the letter! We’re perfectly safe as 
long as... what?” 

“I—I didn’t get to that part,” Clark stammered. 

I wanted to strangle him. 

I spun around. And frantically searched for something to slip under the 
refrigerator—to ease out the letter. 

But I couldn’t find anything slim enough or long enough. Everything was 
way too big to fit underneath. 

Clark tore open the kitchen cabinets and drawers looking for something we 
could use. 

The monster stomped on the floor above us. 

The ceiling quaked. 

A dish fell off the counter and shattered on the cold gray tiles. Shattered 
into a thousand tiny pieces. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned, staring up at the ceiling, watching the paint crack and 
crumble. “He’s down to the second floor. He’s coming closer.” 

“We’re doomed,” Clark groaned. “He’s going to catch us and—” 

“Clark. We have to move the refrigerator. We have to find out what it says 
in the rest of that letter!” 

Clark and I tugged on the refrigerator. We pushed and tugged with all our 
strength. 



Upstairs, the monster roared an angry roar. 

We tugged harder. 

The refrigerator began to move. 

Clark knelt down and peered underneath it. “Push!” he told me. “Push! I 
can see a corner of the letter! Push—just a little more!” 

I gave the refrigerator one more hard shove—and Clark had it! He grasped 
the corner of the letter between his thumb and index finger. And pulled it out. 

He shook the paper, to free a clump of dust that clung to it. 

“Just read it!” I shouted at him. “Read it!” 

Clark started to read again. ‘“You are perfectly safe as long as...’” 



22 


I held my breath, waiting for Clark to finish the sentence. Waiting to find out 
how we could keep ourselves safe. 

“‘You are perfectly safe,’” Clark read, “‘as long as you do not open the door 
and let the monster out.’” 

“That’s it?” My jaw dropped. “It’s too late for that! It’s too late! Did they 
say anything else? They must have said something else!” 

“There’s a little more.” Clark read on: 

“‘Please. Please stay away from that room. Do not open that door.’” 

“Too late!” I wailed. “It’s too late!” 

‘“If the monster escapes, you will have no choice. You will have to find a 
way to kill it.’” Clark looked up from the letter. “That’s it, Gretchen. That’s all it 
says. You will have to find a way to kill it. ” 

“Quick!” I ordered Clark. “Open the other letter. It’ll probably tell us more. 
It has to!” 

Clark started to tear open the second envelope when we heard the heavy 
footsteps. 

Footsteps downstairs. 

In the next room—the living room. 

“Hurry, Clark! Open it!” 

Clark’s fingers fumbled as he tried to rip through the sealed envelope. But 
he stopped when we heard the creature’s breathing. 

Deep, wheezing breaths. 

Coming nearer. 

My heart thumped wildly as the monster’s wheezing grew louder. 

“He-he’s coming for us!” Clark cried, stuffing the unopened envelope in his 
pocket. 

“The dining room!” I shouted. “Head for the dining room!” 

“What are we going to do? How can we kill it?” Clark cried as we bolted 
from the kitchen. 

“We— owwww!” A sharp pain shot up my leg as I ran smack into the 
dining-room table. 



I clutched my knee. I tried to bend it. But the pain tore through it. 
I spun around. 

And there he stood. 

The swamp monster. 

In the kitchen—lumbering toward us hungrily. 



23 


The monster glared at me with his horrible bulging eyes. I watched the veins in 
his head throb as he let out a long, low growl. 

I stared at those huge, pulsing veins. Stared as they beat against his coarse 
alligator skin. 

“Run, Gretchen!” Clark pulled me from behind. He yanked me out of the 
dining room. We dove toward the stairs. 

“We need a place to hide.” Clark panted as we fled to the second floor. “We 
have to hide until Grandma and Grandpa come back with help.” 

“They’re not coming back!” I screamed at him. “They’re not coming back 
with help!” 

“They said they would,” Clark insisted. “They said so in the letter.” 

“Clark, you are such a jerk.” We reached the top of the stairs. I stopped to 
catch my breath. “Who is going to believe them?” I said, gulping air. “Who’s 
going to believe they have a swamp monster trapped in their house?” 

Clark didn’t reply. 

I answered for him. “No one! That’s who. Everyone they tell the story to 
will think they’re nuts.” 

“Someone might believe them.” Clark’s voice cracked. “Someone might 
want to help.” 

“Yeah, right. ‘Will you help us kill a swamp monster?’ they’ll ask. I’ll bet 
they get loads of volunteers!” I rolled my eyes. 

I stopped yelling at Clark when I heard the monster’s heavy breathing. I 
spun around—and saw the creature. 

He stood at the bottom of the stairs. Eyeing us. Drooling hungrily. 

Clark and I backed slowly away from the top of the stairs. 

The monster followed us with his eyes. 

“We have to kill it,” Clark whispered. “That’s what the letter said. We have 
to kill it. But how?” 

“I have an idea!” I told Clark. “Follow me!” 

We turned and ran. As we charged past the bathroom, we heard Charley 
whimpering. 

“Let’s get Charley!” Clark stopped running. “It’s too dangerous to leave 



him closed up in there. We have to take him with us.” 

“We can’t, Clark,” I replied. “He’ll be okay. Don’t worry.” 

I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But there was no time to stop for 
Charley now—because the monster had reached the second floor. 

There he stood. Looming at the end of the hall. 

He raised his hands up over his head. I saw that he held the wooden 
footstool I had tripped over in the living room. 

His eyes burned with anger. 

He glared at me, then growled a loud, savage growl. A stream of thick 
white drool dribbled down his chin. 

He licked the drool away with a reptile tongue—and smashed the stool 
down across his leg. It splintered into two jagged pieces. 

He raised the pieces and hurled them at us. 

“Let’s go!” Clark shrieked as the footstool bounced off the wall. 

We ran up the stairs. Up to the third floor. 

The monster lumbered after us. The whole house shook with each heavy 
step he took. 

“He’s coming!” Clark cried. “What are we going to do? You said you had 
an idea. What?” 

“There’s a collapsed stairway up here,” I told Clark, running as fast as I 
could through the dark, twisting hall. “It’s totally fallen down. Just a big hole. 
When we turn the corner, grab onto the railing. The monster will chase us around 
the corner—and he’ll fall down the open stairway.” 

The roar of the monster thundered in my ears. I saw him plodding down the 
hall after us. 

“Come on, Clark! Hurry!” 

“What if it doesn’t work?” Clark demanded, very frightened. “What if the 
fall only hurts him? Won’t it make him even more angry?” 

“Don’t ask questions, Clark,” I replied impatiently. “It’s got to work! It’s 
got to!” 

We started to run again. 

The monster howled. Howled with rage. 

“There’s the turn, Clark. Up ahead.” 

The creature roared. Only steps behind us. 

My heart pounded hard. My chest felt as if it were about to explode. “Grab 
the railing, Clark. Or else you’ll drop to the bottom. Here goes!” 



We turned the corner. 

We both threw our hands up. And grabbed the railing. 

Our bodies slammed hard against the wall—then dangled over the black, 
empty hole. 

The creature turned the corner. 

Would my plan work? Would he fall to his death? 

Was this the way to kill a monster? 



24 


The beast whirled around the comer. 

Staggered on the edge of the hole. 

His head jerked to face us. His eyes glowed red. 

He opened his mouth in an ugly growl. He swayed, trying to keep his 
balance. Then he plunged down the open staircase. 

I heard him land with a heavy thud. 

Clark and I hung on to the rotted banister. It creaked under the strain of our 
weight. 

My hands ached. My fingers were numb. I knew I couldn’t hold on much 
longer. 

We listened. 

Silence. 

The creature didn’t move. 

I looked down, but it was too dark to see. 

“My fingers are slipping,” Clark groaned. Then he swung out his foot, 
searching with his sneaker for the hallway floor. 

Hand over hand, he inched his way along the banister to the safety of the 
hall. I followed. 

We peered down into the black hole once more. But it was so black down 
there—we couldn’t make out a thing. Dark and silent. Totally silent. 

“We did it! We’re safe!” I cheered. “We killed the monster!” 

Clark and I jumped up and down in celebration. “We did it! We did it!” 

We ran downstairs. We let Charley out of the bathroom. 

“Everything is okay, Charley.” I hugged my dog. “We did it, boy,” I told 
him. “We killed the swamp monster.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” Clark urged. “We can walk to town. Call Mom and 
Dad from the general store. Tell them to pick us up—now!” 

We were so happy, we practically danced down the steps. The three of us 
headed into the library. “Stand back,” I told Clark. “And hold Charley. I’ll break 
the window, and we’ll get out of here.” 

I glanced around the room, searching for the heavy brass candlestick to 



break the glass. It wasn’t there. 

“Wait here,” I told Clark. “I left the candlestick up in the bathroom. I’ll be 
right back.” 

I sprinted out of the library. 

I couldn’t wait to break out of this creepy place. To leave this horrible 
swamp. And tell Mom and Dad how stupid they were to dump us here in a house 
with a real, live monster inside. 

I ran through the living room—to the stairs. 

I jogged up three steps—and stopped. 

Stopped when I heard the low groan. 

It can’t be, I thought. Maybe it’s Charley. Maybe Charley is growling. 

I listened. 

And heard it again. 

Not a dog growl. Definitely not a dog growl. 

Then I heard the rumbling footsteps, the footsteps of the swamp monster, 
coming from somewhere nearby. 

Closer. 

Closer. 



25 


“Clark!” I staggered back into the library. My legs were shaking. My whole body 
trembled. “He’s not dead!” I cried. “The monster isn’t dead!” 

The library was empty. 

“Clark? Where are you?” I shouted. 

“In the kitchen,” he called. “Feeding Charley.” 

I raced into the kitchen. Clark and Charley sat on the floor. Charley was 
lapping up a bowl of water. 

“The fall didn’t kill him! The monster isn’t dead!” I shrieked. 

Clark gasped in horror. “He must be really angry now. He must be furious. 
What are we going to do?” 

My eyes darted around the kitchen. “Put Charley in there,” I ordered. “In 
that closet. I have another idea.” 

“I hope it’s better than your last idea,” Clark moaned. 

“Do you have an idea?” I yelled at him. “Do you?” 

He didn’t. 

Clark dragged Charley across the kitchen. “Gretchen, this isn’t a closet. It’s 
some kind of room.” 

“I don’t care what it is,” I hollered. “Just put Charley in there.” 

On the counter sat one of Grandma’s rhubarb pies. “The monster hasn’t 
eaten since this morning,” I told Clark. “We’ll put this pie out on the counter 
where he’ll see it.” 

“But that will only slow him down for a second,” Clark whined. He shut 
Charley in the room. “He’ll gobble the pie in one bite. Then he’ll come after us 
again.” 

“No, he won’t,” I insisted. “We’re going to poison the pie. We’ll put stuff in 
it. Enough stuff to kill him!” 

“I don’t know, Gretchen,” Clark argued. “I don’t think that’s going to 
work.” 

Charley whimpered behind the closed door—as if he agreed. 

“We have no choice!” I snapped. “We have to try something!” 

I found a fork and carefully lifted up the pie crust with it. 



Then I searched the cabinet under the kitchen sink. It was filthy under there. 
Damp, with green mold growing on the pipes. 

I found a jar of turpentine sitting on a shelf right in front. The lid was 
screwed on tight. I had to twist it hard to open it. 

I slowly poured the entire jar of turpentine into the pie. 

“Yuck! That stuff stinks,” Clark said, holding his nose. 

I studied the pie. It was wet and runny now. “I think we need something to 
soak up the turpentine,” I told Clark. “This should do it!” I held up a can of drain 
cleaner. 

I sprinkled the blue drain-cleaner crystals over the pie. They made the 
rhubarb bubble and fizz. 

Clark leaped back. “I think that’s enough,” he said. 

I ignored him. 

I stuck my head under the sink and came up with two jars. “Rat poison!” I 
exclaimed, reading the dirty label on one of them. “Excellent.” The other jar was 
filled with ammonia. 

“Hurry!” Clark urged. “I hear the monster. He’s coming.” 

I sprinkled the pie with the rat poison and poured in the ammonia too. 

The monster’s groans came closer. Each time he groaned or growled, I 
jumped. 

I found an old can of orange paint and dumped it into the pie. 

“That’s enough! We have enough!” Clark insisted in a panic. 

“Okay. Okay. I just want to make sure this works.” 

I shoved in a handful of mothballs. 

“Hurry!” Clark urged. “Close it up. He’s coming!” 

The monster’s footsteps pounded the living-room floor. 

“Hurry!” Clark begged. 

I sprayed the top of the pie with bug spray. 

“Gretchen!” Clark pleaded with me. 

I placed the poisoned pie on the counter. 

It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after one bite. Grandma’s words came 
back to me. 

It better do more than that! I told myself. It better kill a monster! 

“Here he comes!” Clark cried. 

We ducked under the kitchen table. 

The monster stomped into the kitchen. Peering out from under the table, I 



could see him swing his arms wildly. He knocked over dishes, pots, glasses. 
Everything in sight. 

Then my heart stopped when I saw the big creature turn. 

He hesitated. Then he took a step toward the kitchen table. Another step. 
Another. 

Clark and I huddled together under the table. We were both trembling so 
hard, the table shook. 

The swamp monster sees us under here! I realized. 

We’re trapped. 

What is he going to do? 



26 


Clark and I held on to each other. The monster stepped up to the table—so close 
I could smell the sour odor of his thick fur. 

Clark started to let out soft, whimpering sounds. 

I clapped my hands over his mouth. I shut my eyes. 

Please go away, I prayed. Please, monster, don’t see us. 

I heard the creature sniffing. Like a dog trying to sniff out a bone. 

When I opened my eyes, he had moved away from the table. 

“Whew!” I breathed a long, silent sigh of relief. 

The monster rumbled around the room. 

Sniffing loudly, urgently. 

He sniffed the refrigerator. 

He lumbered over to the stove and sniffed some more. He plodded around 
the room. Sniffing. 

He smells us. He smells Clark and me, I thought. Please, see the pie. See 
the pie. 

The creature stomped back to the stove. 

Sniffing. 

He bent down and peered into the oven. Then he ripped the oven door off 
its hinges and hurled it across the room. 

The door hit the wall with a loud crash. Clark jumped in fright and banged 
his head on the table. He let out a low moan. 

I moaned too. “Look,” I whispered. 

The creature was eating—but he wasn’t eating our pie. There were two pies 
still in the oven. And the creature was stuffing himself with them. 

Oh, no, I thought. He’ll eat those pies. Then he’ll be full. He won’t eat our 
pie! We’re as good as dead. 

The monster hungrily jammed the two pies into his mouth. He practically 
swallowed them whole. Then he lumbered to the center of the room. 

Sniffing. 

Yes! He’s still hungry! I thought. Eat our pie. Eat our pie, I chanted to 
myself. 



I peered out from under the table—and saw the creature, heading toward 
the counter. Yes! 

He stopped. 

And sniffed. 

He saw the pie. 

He eyed it for a moment. Then he lifted it to his mouth and shoved it in. 

Yes! I cheered silently. He’s eating it! He’s eating our pie! 

He chomped away at the pie. Chomped and shoved more into his huge 
mouth. Chomped and shoved. Chomped and shoved. 

He licked his big lips as he ate. 

He licked his paws. 

He rubbed his stomach. 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “He likes it!” 



27 


I watched the monster shove the last bit of pie into his mouth. 

Then he flicked his reptile tongue in and out, licking up every last crumb 
from the pie tin. 

“It isn’t working,” I moaned to Clark. “He loves it.” 

“Now what are we going to do?” he whispered back. He hugged his knees 
tightly to his chest to keep them from shaking. 

The monster let out a long groan. 

I peered out from under the table. I saw the creature’s eyes bug out. They 
practically popped out of his head! 

A gurgling, choking sound escaped his throat. 

He grasped his neck with his two hairy paws. 

He groaned again. 

His stomach rumbled—a deep rumble. He clutched his stomach and 
doubled over. 

He uttered a weak cry of pain—and surprise. 

Then he dropped dead on the kitchen floor. 

“We did it! We did it!” I cheered. “We killed the swamp monster!” 

I pulled Clark out from under the table. 

I studied the creature from across the room. I was sure he was dead—but I 
still didn’t want to get too close. 

The monster’s scaly eyelids were closed. 

I stared at his chest—to see if it moved. To see if he was breathing. 

His chest remained still. 

I stared at him a few moments longer. 

He didn’t stir. 

Clark peered over my shoulder. “Is—is he really dead?” he stammered. 

“Yes!” I was sure of it now. Totally sure. “We did it!” I cried. I jumped up 
and down joyfully. “We killed the monster! We killed him!” 

Clark reached into his back pocket—for his comic book, Creatures from the 
Muck. He hurled it across the room. It hit the monster in the head and fell to the 
floor. 



“I never want to read about swamp monsters again. Never!” Clark cried. 
“Let’s get out of here!” 

Charley scratched at the door. When we opened it, he leaped out and 
jumped all over us. “It’s okay, boy,” I told him, trying to calm him down. “It’s 
okay.” 

I peered into the room where we had locked Charley. “Hey, Clark, I think 
there’s a door in here,” I said. “A door that leads out!” 

I stepped into the small, dark space—and stumbled over a broom lying on 
the floor. 

I squinted in the darkness. 

Two rusty shovels leaned against the wall to my right. On the left sat a coil 
of old hose. 

In front of me I saw the door. A door with a large glass window. 

I looked out the window—out to the backyard. To the path that ran through 
the swamp. 

Does that path lead through the swamp to town? I wondered. I decided it 
was worth a try. 

“We’re almost out of here!” I declared. “We’re almost free!” 

I turned the doorknob, but the door was locked. Bolted from the other side, 
like all the doors in the house. 

“It’s jammed shut,” I told Clark. “But I’ll break the window and we’ll climb 
out. No problem.” 

The shovels against the wall were big and heavy. I gripped the handle of 
one with both hands and took aim. 

I swung it back—and felt the floor quake. 

I spun around—and heard the roar. 

The roar of the swamp monster. 

He wasn’t dead. 



28 


The creature rumbled into the doorway. 

Clark and I both shrieked as he took a giant step into the room. His hideous 
head made a scraping sound as it brushed against the frame of the door. But he 
didn’t even seem to notice. 

Clark and I pressed against the wall. 

Charley backed into a corner, whimpering. Frightened. 

We were trapped. 

No way out. 

Nowhere to run. 

The monster’s eyes shifted from Charley, to me, to Clark. They rested on 
Clark for a moment. Then the creature lifted his head and wailed. 

“He-he’s going to get me first,” Clark cried. “I—I shouldn’t have thrown 
the comic at him. I shouldn’t have hit him in the head.” 

“He’s going to get us, you jerk!” I shouted at him. “Because we tried to kill 
him!” 

That shut Clark up. 

I have to do something, I thought. I have to do something. But what? What? 

The swamp monster staggered forward. 

He opened his snout with a snap—and bared jagged yellow teeth. 

Sharp yellow teeth, dripping with saliva. 

His eyes glowed red as he moved forward. Clomping closer and closer. 

I glanced down and realized that I still held the shovel. I lifted it with two 
hands—and thrust it forward. Jabbing—jabbing at the air between the creature 
and me. 

“Back!” I screamed. “Get back! Leave us alone!” 

The monster grunted. 

“Get back! Get back!” I swung the shovel wildly. “Go away!” 

I swung at the creature. 

I swung—and hit his stomach with a sickening thwack. 

The room went silent. 

Then the monster tossed back his head and let out a piercing howl. 



He stumbled forward. Swiped the shovel from my hand. And tossed it out 
the door. Tossed it as if it were a toothpick. 

I gasped as it crashed to the kitchen floor. 

I eyed the other shovel leaning against the wall. The monster followed my 

gaze. 

He snatched it up and broke it in half with his bare hands. Then he pitched 
the pieces into the kitchen. 

What can I do? I have to do something! 

And then it came to me! 

The letter. 

The second letter from Grandma and Grandpa—the one we hadn’t opened 

yet! 

“Clark! Quick! The second letter,” I cried. “Maybe it will tell us what to do! 
Read it!” 

Clark stared at me. Frozen. His eyes on the raging monster. 

“Clark!” I said, through clenched teeth. “Open... the... letter. NOW!” 

He reached into his jeans pocket with a trembling hand. He fumbled with 
the flap. 

“Hurry, Clark!” I pleaded. 

He finally managed to tear a hole in the corner of the envelope. 

And then I screamed. 

The monster dove forward. 

He grabbed my arm. He yanked it hard. 

And pulled me toward him. 



29 


The monster pulled me close. 

I stared up into his hideous face—and gasped. 

His eyes were deep, dark pools—with tiny worms swimming in them! 

I twisted my head away—so I wouldn’t have to stare into those horrible, 
wormy eyes. 

The creature gripped me tighter. 

His hot, sour breath swept over my cheeks. 

He opened his jaws wide. 

His mouth was filled with bugs! I saw them crawling up and down his 
tongue. 

I screamed. And struggled against the monster’s hold. But he clutched me 
too tightly. 

“Let me go!” I shrieked. “Please—!” 

The monster bellowed in reply, hitting me with a blast of his hot breath. 

He smells like a swamp, I realized as I fought against his grasp. He is a 
swamp. He’s like a living swamp. 

With my free hand, I pounded on the creature’s arm. I nearly gagged when I 
felt the moss. His whole body was covered with a layer of wet moss! 

“Let me go!” I pleaded. “Please—let me go!” 

Clark leaped forward. He grabbed my arm and tried to tug me away. “Leave 
her alone! ” he shrieked. 

Charley charged out of his corner. His lip curled back and he let out a low 
snarl. Then he sank his teeth into the monster’s hairy leg. 

Startled, the monster jerked away, dragging me along with him. 

But Charley wouldn’t give up. I glanced down to see him dig his teeth deep 
into the monster’s foot. 

With a growl, the beast raised his foot. And with one fierce shake, he hurled 
Charley across the room. 

“Charley!” I cried out. “Charley!” 

I heard Charley whimper on the other side of the room. 

“He’s okay,” Clark said, breathlessly. He tugged harder on my arm, trying 



to wrestle me free. 

With another angry growl, the beast swung at Clark. Shoved him hard 
against the wall. Then the monster leaned down—and pulled me up to his face. 
He opened his mouth. 

His disgusting, bug-infested tongue rolled out. 

And he LICKED me. 

He ran his hot, bumpy tongue up and down my arm. 

Then he lowered his enormous teeth—as he prepared to chew off my hand. 



30 


“Nooooo!” A horrified shriek tore from my throat. 

The monster’s jaw swung down. His mouth gaped open. The bugs swarmed 
over his yellow teeth. He lowered his mouth to my hand. 

Then he stopped. 

And let me go. 

He backed away, staring at me. Staring at my arm, eyes bulging. 

I stared at my arm too. It was covered with disgusting, monster saliva. 

The monster raised his hands and clutched at his throat now. Choking. 
Choking on something. 

He raised his wet eyes to me. 

“You—you human?” he choked out. 

“He can talk\” Clark gasped. 

“You human? You human?” he demanded. 

“Y-yes, I’m a human,” I stammered. 

The monster threw back his head and groaned. “Oh, no. I’m allergic to 
humans.” 

His eyes rolled up. 

He staggered forward and collapsed against the door to the outside. It 
crashed open under his heavy weight. Moonlight streamed in. 

He lay there on his stomach. He didn’t move. 

I rubbed my wet arm and stared down at the swamp monster. 

Was he really dead this time? 



31 


“Gretchen! Let’s go!” Clark yanked me toward the open door. 

We stepped over the monster. I glanced down at the creature one last time. 

His eyes were shut. He didn’t breathe. He didn’t move. 

“Come on, Gretchen!” Clark pleaded. 

Is he really dead? I stared at the swamp monster. I wasn’t totally sure. But I 
did know one thing—I wasn’t going to hang around to find out. 

Clark and I ran out through the broken door. We found Charley already 
there, waiting for us. We bolted down the path—away from the house. Into the 
swamp. 

I was so surprised to find it was dark out. Had we really fought the swamp 
monster all day? 

A pale moon hung over the cypress trees, casting an eerie glow over them. 

The mud rose up over my ankles as we made our way through the marshy 
ground. Through the tall weeds. Through a blanket of heavy mist. 

My shoes plunged into deep pools of water. 

Tripped over upraised roots. 

I swiped at the long beards of gray that hung from the trees. Swiped them 
from my face as we headed deeper and deeper into the swamp. 

When the house was no longer in view, we stopped running. Stopped to 
catch our breath. 

I listened in the darkness for footsteps. 

The swamp monster’s footsteps. 

There weren’t any. 

“We did it! We killed the monster!” My voice rang out in the night. 

“And we escaped!” Clark cheered. “We’re free! We’re okay!” 

“Yes!” I shouted. “We really did it!” 

Now that we had stopped running for our lives, we stepped through the 
swamp carefully. Leaping over the inky puddles and gnarled tree roots. 

The night air echoed with strange sounds. 

Low gurgling. Scampering footsteps. Piercing cries. 

But I didn’t care. 



I had already battled my worst nightmare—the swamp monster. Battled him 
and won. 

“Hey! Clark!” I suddenly remembered the other letter! “We never read 
Grandma and Grandpa’s letter. The second letter!” 

“So what?” Clark replied. “We don’t have to read it. The monster is dead. 
We killed it. Just as they told us to do in the first letter.” 

“Where is it? Where’s the letter?” I demanded. “Take it out, Clark.” I 
stopped walking. “I want to know what it says.” 

Clark pulled the crumpled envelope from his jeans pocket. As he smoothed 
out the wrinkles, a fierce animal cry cut through the swamp. 

“I—I don’t think we should stop now,” Clark said. “We can read it later. 
After we reach town. After we call Mom and Dad.” 

“Read it now,” I insisted. “Come on. Don’t you want to know what it says?” 

“No,” Clark declared. 

“Well, I do,” I told him. 

“Okay. Okay.” Clark ripped open the envelope and slipped out the letter. 

Alight wind began to blow, carrying the sharp animal cries to us. 

The dark trees mstled over our heads. 

Clark began to read slowly, struggling to see in the dim moonlight. “‘Dear 
Gretchen and Clark. We hope you children are safe and well. We forgot one 
word of warning in the first letter. 

“‘If the monster gets out... and you do kill it... and escape from the house 
—stay on the road. Do NOT go into the swamp.’” 

Clark rolled his eyes. He let out a loud groan. 

“Keep reading!” I shouted. “Read!” 

He squinted in the dark and went on. “‘The monster’s brothers and sisters 
live in the swamp—dozens of them. We think they are out there. Waiting for 
him.’” 

My heart started to race as Clark continued. 

“‘We’ve seen the monsters in the swamp. We’ve heard them whistling to 
each other every night. They’re unhappy their brother was captured. They’re 
waiting for him to return. So whatever you do, stay out of the swamp. It’s not 
safe out there. Stay out of the swamp! Good luck! We love you.’” 

Clark’s hands dropped to his sides. The letter fell to the marshy ground. 

I turned slowly, staring out at the shifting shadows. 

“Gretchen.” Clark choked out my name. “Do you hear that? What is that 



sound? What is it?” 


“Uh... it sounds like a whistle.” 

“Th-that’s what I thought,” he whispered. “What do we do now? Any 
ideas?” 

“No, Clark,” I replied softly. “I don’t have any more ideas. How about 
you?” 







Search

 UPLOADbrett_devan_wieler BRETT_DEVAN_WIELER
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
Upload files
My uploads
My loans
My favorites
My web archives
Account settings
Get help
Log out
 Search metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived web sites
Advanced Search
ABOUT BLOG PROJECTS HELP DONATE  CONTACT JOBS VOLUNTEER PEOPLE
Full text of "Goosebumps [All Books]"
See other formats
R.L. STINE 


JOIN THE ALL NEW 
GOOSEBUMPS 
EAN (UJB! 

. OITA I IS INSIDE!" - 







I"" ' ■- ■ 


1 r n 







LEGEND OF THE 
LOST LEGEND 


Goosebumps - 47 
R.L. Stine 





1 


Justin Clarke tugged his gloves under the sleeves of his heavy blue parka. 
Then he shielded his eyes with one hand and searched all around. “I don’t 
see Dad,” he told his sister, Marissa. “Do you?” 

“I can’t see anything !” Marissa cried, shouting over the wind. “All I 
can see is zee!” 

The sled dogs barked and shook themselves, eager to start moving 
again. 

Justin narrowed his eyes, squinting to the right, then the left. The ice 
stretched smooth and shiny, silvery under the bright sunlight. 

In the distance, it darkened to blue. Darker. Darker. Until the blue ice 
appeared to melt into the sky. Justin couldn’t see where the ice ended and 
the sky began. 

“It’s cold,” Marissa murmured. A sharp gust of wind blew the parka 
hood off her red hair. She instantly reached up with both gloved hands and 
pulled it back in place. 

Justin rubbed his stub of a nose. He pressed his furry gloves against his 
frozen cheeks, trying to warm them. 

The dogs tugged. Justin grabbed the handle of the dogsled to keep it 
from sliding away. 

“What do we do now?” Marissa asked. Justin could hear a slight 
tremble in her voice. He knew his sister was as frightened as he was. 

He stepped onto the sled runner. “Keep going, I guess. Keep going 
until we find Dad.” 

Marissa shook her head. She held her hood in place with both hands. 
“Maybe we should stay right here,” she suggested. “If we stay here, it will 
be easier for Dad to find us.” 

Justin stared hard at her. Why does Marissa look so different? he 
wondered. Then he realized—the cold had made her freckles disappear! 

“It’s too cold to stay in one place,” he said. “It will be warmer if we 
keep moving.” 

He helped her onto the back of the sled. At twelve, he was only a year 
older than Marissa. But he was big and athletic, and she was tiny and 



skinny. 

The dogs grunted and impatiently pawed the silvery ice. 

“I hate Antarctica!” Marissa wailed, grabbing the sled handle with 
both hands. “I hate everything about it. I can’t even spell it!” 

Uh-oh, thought Justin. Here she goes. Once Marissa started 
complaining, she never stopped. 

“We’ll be okay,” he said quickly. “As soon as we find Dad, everything 
will be okay. And we’ll have some amazing adventures.” 

“I hate amazing adventures!” Marissa declared. “Almost as much as I 
hate Antarctica! I can’t believe he brought us to this awful place—and then 
lost us!” 

Justin gazed up at the sky. The sun had started to set. Wide streaks of 
golden light sparkled over the ice. 

“We’ll find Dad really soon,” he told Marissa. “I know we will.” He 
lowered the hood over his forehead. “Let’s get going, okay? Before we 
freeze.” He snapped the line and, in a deep voice, called out to the six dogs, 
“Mush! Mush!” 

The dogs lowered their heads and moved forward with a burst of 
speed. The sled jerked hard as it started to slide. 

“Whoooooaaa!” 

Justin let out a startled shriek as he felt himself start to fall. 

His gloved hands flew off the sled handle. He frantically groped for it. 

Missed. 

And fell off the sled. He fell hard onto his back on the ice. 

“Ooooof!” He felt the breath whoosh from his lungs. 

His arms and legs kicked the air, like a bug on its back. 

He struggled to a sitting position. Blinking. The ice shimmering all 
around him. Shimmering so brightly, he could barely see the sled as it sped 
away. 

“Justin—I can’t stop it!” Marissa’s shrill shriek sounded tiny against 
the steady rush of cold wind. 

“Marissa—!” He tried to call to her. 

“I can’t stop it! Help me! Help!” Her cry already so far away. 



2 


Justin leaped to his feet and started to run after the sled. 

He fell again. Face first this time. 

How can I mn in snowshoes? he wondered. They’re like wearing 
tennis rackets on my feet! 

He had no choice. He jumped back up and started to run. 

He had to catch the sled. He couldn’t let Marissa face the cold and the 
endless ice on her own. 

“I’m coming!” he shouted. “Marissa—I’m coming!” 

He lowered his head against the onrushing wind. He dug the 
snowshoes into the snowy surface of the ice. One step. Then another. Then 
another. 

Running hard, he raised his head and squinted into the distance. The 
sled was a dark blur against the glowing ice. A tiny blur. 

“Marissa—!” he gasped. “Stop the sled! Pull the line! Pull it!” 

But he knew she couldn’t hear him. 

His heart thudded in his chest. He felt a sharp stab of pain in his side. 
His legs ached from lifting the heavy snowshoes. 

But he kept moving. He didn’t slow down. 

When he gazed up again, the sled appeared larger. Closer. 

“Huh?” His cry sent a puff of white steam floating above his head. 

Am I catching up? he asked himself. 

Yes! 

The sled appeared clearer now. Closer. 

He could see Marissa, holding on with one hand, waving frantically to 
him with the other. 

“How—how did you stop the sled?” he choked out as he staggered up 
to her. 

Her blue eyes were wide with fear. Her chin trembled. “I didn’t stop 
it,” she told him. 

“But—” 

“It stopped itself,” Marissa explained. “The dogs—they all stopped. 



I’m frightened, Justin. They stopped all by themselves.” She pointed. “Look 
at them.” 

Justin turned to the dogs at the front of the sled. All six of them had 
their heads lowered, their backs arched. They all whimpered and shook, 
huddled together. 

“Something is frightening them,” Justin murmured. He felt a sudden 
chill of fear. 

“They won’t move,” Marissa said. “They just hunch together, 
whimpering. What are we going to do?” 

Justin didn’t reply. He stared past the sled. Past the frightened dogs. 

He stared at an amazing sight. 

A blue lake. Almost perfectly round, as if someone had carved it out of 
the ice. A pool of water reflecting the clear blue of the sky. 

“Oh, wow!” Marissa gasped. She saw it too. 

In the center of the small lake, they both saw a creature sitting on a 
large chunk of ice. It had its head lowered, staring back at them. 

A sea lion. 

A blue sea lion! 

“It’s the one Dad is looking for!” Justin cried. He stepped up beside his 
sister. They both stared in amazement at the magical creature. 

“The only blue sea lion in the world,” Marissa murmured. “A creature 
from a myth. No one even believes it is real.” 

Where is Dad? Justin wondered, not taking his eyes from the 
enormous blue animal. How can Dad be missing this? 

He brought us all the way to Antarctica to search for this creature. And 
now he’s lost—lost!—and Marissa and I are the only ones to see it. 

“Do you think we can get closer to it?” Marissa asked. “Can we walk 
up to the edge of the water and see it better?” 

Justin hesitated. “Dad said it has strange powers,” he told his sister. 
“Maybe we should stay back here.” 

“But I want to see it better,” she protested. 

She started to step off the sled—then stopped. 

They both heard the rumbling sound at the same time. 

A deep rumble, low at first and then louder. 

“Where is it coming from?” Marissa asked in a whisper, her eyes 
suddenly wide with fear. 



“The sea lion?” Justin guessed. “Did it roar?” 

No. 

They heard it again. Louder this time. Like thunder. 

Thunder... beneath them. 

And this time the ground shook. 

Justin heard a cracking sound. He looked down in time to see the ice 
start to break. 

“Ohh!” A frightened cry escaped his throat. He grabbed for the back of 
the sled and pulled himself onto it. 

“What is happening?” Marissa cried. She grasped the sled handle with 
both hands. 

Another rumble of thunder beneath them. 

The sled tilted and started to rock. 

The sound of cracking ice drowned out the low rumble. 

Ice cracked all around. The ground appeared to split open. 

The blue sea lion, perched in the center of the small, round lake, stared 
back calmly at them. 

A loud crack made the dogs howl. 

The sled bobbed and tilted. Justin grasped the handle as tightly as he 
could. 

He peered down. And saw that the ground holding them had broken 
away, broken free. 

As the ice cracked, the lake opened up. Water rushed all around. 

It’s not a lake, Justin realized. It’s a hidden ocean —under the ice! 

“We-we’re floating away!” Marissa shrieked. 

The dogs howled, drowning out the sound of the cracking ice. Water 
mshed up over the sides of the sled. A strong current carried the sled away. 

Justin and Marissa held on tightly, struggling to stay on the rocking, 
tilting sled. 

The blue sea lion faded into the distance. 

And they floated away, bobbing and swaying. Floating out to sea. 



3 


“What happens next, Dad?” I asked. 

“Yeah. Don’t stop there,” Marissa begged. “You can’t leave Justin and 
me on a chunk of ice, floating out into the ocean. Go on with the story.” 

I pulled the top of the sleeping bag up to my chin. Outside our tent, the 
fire flickered low. I could hear the cluttering of insects all around us in the 
forest. 

I peered out through the open tent flap. Too dark to see the trees. I 
could see a narrow patch of purple sky. No moon. No stars at all. 

Is anything darker than a forest? I wondered. 

We had a kerosene lantern inside the tent. It sent warm yellow light 
around us. But no heat. 

Dad buttoned the top button of his sweater. It had been hot in the tent 
when we came in after dinner. But now a damp chill had fallen over us. 

“That’s all for tonight,” Dad said, scratching his brown beard. 

“But what happens next?” Marissa demanded. “Go on with the story, 
Dad. Please!” 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “Do we float out to sea? How do we get back? Do 
you show up and rescue Marissa and me?” 

Dad shrugged his big shoulders. Under the woolly sweater, he looked 
like a big, brown bear. “I don’t know,” he replied. “I don’t know what 
happens next.” 

He sighed and bent over his sleeping bag. He has a big stomach, and 
it’s hard for him to bend over. He started to unfold the sleeping bag. 

“I haven’t thought of an ending to the story yet,” Dad said softly. 
“Maybe I’ll dream a good ending tonight.” 

Marissa and I both groaned. We hate it when Dad stops a story in the 
middle. He always leaves us in terrible danger. And sometimes we have to 
wait for days to find out if we survive. 

Dad sat down on the tent floor. He groaned as he pulled off his boots. 
Then he struggled to squeeze into the sleeping bag. 

“Good night,” Marissa said, yawning. “I’m so tired.” 

I felt tired too. We’d trudged through the forest since early morning, 



cutting our own path through the trees, and rocks, and tangled weeds. 

“Justin, do me a favor,” Dad said. He pointed to the kerosene lantern. 
“Turn that off, okay?” 

“No problem,” I said. I leaned forward. Reached for the lantern. My 
hand bumped it. Knocked it on its side. And in seconds, the tent was ablaze 
with orange and yellow flames. 



4 


I let out a sick cry and struggled to pull myself out of the sleeping bag. 

Dad climbed to his feet first. I never saw him move so fast. 

He picked up a section of the canvas tent floor and smothered the 
flames on the tent wall. 

“Dad—sorry!” I managed to choke out. I finally struggled out of the 
sleeping bag. 

Luckily, the flames had only caught on one wall. I have too good an 
imagination. I instantly pictured us surrounded by fire. 

I guess I get my imagination from Dad. Sometimes it comes in handy. 
Sometimes it doesn’t. 

Now I was breathing hard, my whole body trembling. “Sorry,” I 
repeated. 

“That was close!” Marissa cried, shivering. “Justin is such a klutz!” 
She had scrambled to the tent flap, ready to run outside. 

Dad shook his head. “It just burned a small hole,” he reported. “Here. I 
can cover it with this.” He spread the section of canvas floor over the hole. 

“This thing burns pretty fast,” I murmured. 

Dad grunted but didn’t reply. 

“I’d hate to be in the middle of the forest without a tent,” Marissa 
declared. “Especially in this weird country.” 

“Everything is fine,” Dad said softly, still fiddling with the tent wall. 
“But no thanks to either of you,” he added sourly. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” I demanded, straightening a leg of my 
pajama pants. 

“You haven’t been much help,” Dad complained. 

“What did I do?” Marissa asked shrilly. “I didn’t try to burn the tent 
down.” 

“You wandered off and got lost this morning,” Dad reminded her. 

“I thought I saw a weird animal,” Marissa replied. 

“It was probably a squirrel,” I chimed in. “Or her shadow.” 

“Give me a break, Justin,” Marissa muttered. 



“Then tonight you both refused to get firewood,” Dad accused. 

“We were tired,” I explained. 

“And we didn’t know where to look,” Marissa added. 

“In a forest?” Dad cried. “You don’t know where to look for firewood 
in a forest ? How about on the ground ?” 

Dad was getting steamed. 

Maybe he’s right, I thought. Maybe Marissa and I should try to be a 
little more helpful. 

After all, this was a very important trip for Dad. And it was really 
great of him to bring us along. 

My dad is Richard Clarke. Maybe you’ve heard of him. He’s a very 
famous writer, storyteller, and story collector. 

Dad travels all over the world, searching for stories. All kinds of 
stories. Then he puts them in books. He has published ten books of stories. 
And he goes all over the country, telling some of the stories he has hunted 
down. 

He has been on a lot of exciting trips. But this one was special. He 
brought Marissa and me to Europe—to this forest in the tiny country of 
Brovania—because of a very special search. 

Dad had kept the whole thing as a surprise. But he told us about it as 
we made our way through the forest that morning. 

“We’ve come to Brovania to search for the Lost Legend,” he 
explained. He pulled a large black beetle from his beard and tossed it away. 

“The Lost Legend is a very old manuscript. It is said to be hidden 
away in a silver chest,” Dad continued as we walked. “It hasn’t been seen 
for five hundred years.” 

“Wow,” Marissa murmured from far behind us. 

She kept stopping to look at bugs and wildflowers. Dad and I had to 
keep waiting for her to catch up. 

“What is the legend about?” I asked. 

Dad shifted the heavy equipment pack on his back. “No one knows 
what the legend is about,” he replied. “Because it has been lost for so long.” 

He used his machete to hack away a tall clump of weeds. Then we 
followed him through a narrow opening in the trees. 

The trees were so thick and leafy overhead, little sunlight could get 
through. Even though it was still morning, the forest stretched as dark as 



night. 

“If we find the Lost Legend, we’ll be very lucky,” Dad said. “It will 
change our lives.” 

“What do you mean?” I asked. 

His expression turned solemn. “The ancient manuscript of the Lost 
Legend is worth a fortune,” he replied. “The whole world is curious about 
it. The whole world wants to read it. Because no one knows who wrote it— 
or what it’s about.” 

I thought about it all day as we twisted our way through the forest. What if 
I’m the one to find it? I asked myself. 

What if I look down and see the silver chest? Hidden between two 
rocks, maybe. Or half-buried in the dirt with only part of its silver lid 
poking up. 

Wouldn’t that be cool? Wouldn’t that be awesome ? 

I pictured how happy Dad would be. And I thought about how rich and 
famous I would be too. I’d be a hero. A real hero. 

That’s what I thought about all day. 

But so far, I knew I hadn’t been much of a hero. In fact, I nearly 
burned down the tent. 

And Dad was already grumbling that Marissa and I hadn’t been much 

help. 

I’ll be more helpful, I promised silently that night. I snuggled lower 
into the sleeping bag, trying to get warm. 

On the other side of the tent, I could hear Dad snoring lightly. Dad can 
fall asleep in seconds. And he’s such a sound sleeper, you practically have 
to hit him in the head to wake him up! 

Marissa and I are not like Dad. It takes us hours to fall asleep. And the 
tiniest, tiniest sound wakes us up instantly. 

So now I lay on my back in the sleeping bag, staring up at the dark 
ceiling of the tent. Trying to clear my mind. Trying not to think about 
anything. 

Trying to fall asleep... asleep... asleep. 

I had almost drifted off—when an animal howl cut through the silence. 

An angry howl. A menacing howl. So close! 

Right outside the tent. 



I jerked straight up. Wide awake. Breathing hard. I knew this wasn’t a 
storybook creature. This creature was real. 



5 


The air in the tent felt cold against my hot skin. I realized that I was 
sweating. 

I listened hard. 

And heard a shuffling sound. A low growl. The crackle of heavy paws 
over the leafy forest ground. 

My heart pounding, I slid the sleeping bag down. Started to crawl out 

of it. 

“Oh!” I let out a whispered cry as someone pushed past me. 

“Dad—?” 

No. I could still hear Dad’s steady snores from across the tent. 

I knew it would take more than a terrifying animal howl to wake Dad 
up! 

“Marissa—” I whispered. 

“Sssshh.” She held a finger up to her mouth as she crawled toward the 
tent flap. “I heard it too.” 

I moved quickly beside her. We stopped in front of the closed flap. 

“It’s some kind of animal,” Marissa whispered. 

“Maybe it’s a werewolf .” I whispered back. 

There goes my wild imagination again. 

But aren’t werewolves supposed to live deep in the forests of Europe? 
I think that’s where all the old werewolf movies took place. In a forest just 
like this one. 

I heard another low growl. 

I grabbed the tent flap and pulled it up. Cold air rushed in. A gust of 
wind ruffled my pajama shirt. 

I peered out into the night. A mist had fallen over the small clearing 
where we had set up the tent. Pale moonlight shining through the mist 
turned everything a shade of blue. 

“What is it?” Marissa whispered from close behind me. “Do you see 

it?” 

I couldn’t see any animal. Only swirls of blue mist. 



“Get back inside,” Marissa ordered. 

I heard more shuffling sounds. A loud sniff. 

“Hurry. Get back in,” Marissa urged. 

“Just wait,” I whispered. I had to see what was out there. I had to see 
what was making those noises. 

I shivered. The air felt heavy and damp. 

Wisps of the blue fog seemed to cling to me. I took a step out of the 
tent. The ground sent a shock of cold up from my bare feet. 

I held my breath and took another step. 

And saw the creature. 

A dog. A big dog, tall. Like a shepherd, only with long, white fur. The 
white fur shimmered like silver under the misty moonlight. The dog had his 
head lowered. He sniffed the ground. 

As I stared at the animal, he raised his head and turned to me. And 
started to wag his tail. 

I love dogs. 

I’ve always loved dogs. 

Without thinking, I reached out my arms. And I ran to pet him. 

“No! Don’t]” Marissa screamed. 



6 


Too late. 

I knelt down and petted the fur on the big dog’s back. It felt soft and 
thick. My hand touched leaves and small twigs tangled in the fur. 

The dog’s tail wagged furiously. I petted his head. He raised his eyes 
to me. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. The dog had one brown eye, one blue. 

“He might be a wolf!” Marissa called. I turned to see that she had 
taken only one step from the tent. She clung to the flap, ready to duck 
inside at any instant. 

“He’s not a wolf. He’s a dog,” I told her. I studied him again. “At least, 
I think he’s not a wolf,” I added. “I mean, he’s too friendly to be a wolf.” 

I rubbed the top of his head. Then I scratched the thick, white fur on 
his chest. I pulled blades of dried grass and weeds from his fur. 

The dog wagged his tail happily. 

“What is he doing out here?” Marissa demanded in a loud whisper. “Is 
he a wild dog? Justin—he might be dangerous.” 

The dog licked my hand. 

“I don’t think he’s too dangerous,” I told her. 

“But maybe he’s part of a pack,” Marissa warned. She let go of the tent 
flap and took another step across the ground toward me. “Maybe the other 
wild dogs sent him out as a scout. Maybe there are a hundred of them!” 

I climbed to my feet and glanced around. Squinting through the blue 
mist, I could see the tall, dark trees that circled the clearing. A half-moon 
floated low over the trees, shimmery through the fog. 

I listened hard. 

Silence. 

“I think this guy is alone,” I told my sister. 

Marissa gazed down at the dog. “Remember that story Dad used to tell 
about the ghost dog?” she asked. “Remember? The dog used to appear 
outside someone’s house. It was such a cute little dog. Very sweet and 
cuddly. It would tilt its head up toward the moon and let out an ‘eeeh eeeh ’ 
sound, as if it were laughing. 



“The dog was so cute, people had to come out and pet it. And when 
they did, the dog would start to bark. It would call its ghost dog friends. 

“The friends were mean and ugly. And they would circle the person, 
circle faster and faster. And then gobble the poor victim up. And the last 
thing the victim would see was the cute, cuddly dog tilting back its head, 
laughing ‘eeeh eeeh ’, laughing at the moon. 

“Remember that story?” Marissa demanded. 

“No, I don’t,” I told her. “I don’t think that’s one of Dad’s stories. It 
isn’t good enough. I think it’s one of yours.” 

Marissa thinks she’s a great storyteller like Dad. But her stories are 
pretty dumb. 

Whoever heard of a laughing dog? 

She took another step toward the dog and me. I shivered. The forest air 
was cold and damp, too cold to be out in pajamas and bare feet. 

“If he’s a wild dog, he could be dangerous,” Marissa repeated. 

“He seems gentle enough,” I said. I petted his head again. And as my 
hand slid down the fur on the back of the dog’s neck, I felt something hard. 

At first I thought it was another dead leaf matted in his thick, white fur. 
I wrapped my hand around it. 

Not a leaf. A collar. A leather dog collar. 

“It’s not a wild dog,” I told my sister. “He has a collar. He must belong 
to someone.” 

“Maybe he ran away and got lost,” Marissa said, kneeling beside the 
dog. “Maybe his owner is searching the forest for him.” 

“Maybe,” I agreed. I tugged the collar up over the thick fur. The dog 
turned his head and licked my hand. 

“Does it have an ID tag or a license?” Marissa asked. 

“That’s what I’m looking for,” I replied. “Whoa. Hold on. There is 
something tucked under the collar.” 

I pulled out a folded-up wad of paper. Squinting in the dim light, I 
started to unfold it. “It’s a note,” I told Marissa. 

“Maybe it has the owner’s address or a phone number on it,” she said. 

I finished unfolding it and held the sheet of paper up close to my face 
to read it. 

“Well? What does it say?” Marissa demanded. 

I read the handwritten words silently to myself—and gasped in 



surprise. 

“Justin—what does it say?” Marissa repeated. 



7 


Marissa tried to grab the note from my hand. But I swung it away from her. 

“It’s a very short note,” I told her. I held it up again and read it out 

loud: 

“‘I KNOW WHY YOU’RE HERE. FOLLOW SILVERDOG.’” 

“Silverdog?” Marissa lowered her gaze to the dog. “Silverdog?” 

His ears perked up. 

“He knows his name,” I said. I ran my eyes over the paper, trying to 
see if I had missed anything. But that’s all there was. No name at the 
bottom. Nothing else. 

Marissa took the note from me and read it for herself. “ 'I KNOW 
WHY YOU’RE HERE’,” she repeated. 

I shivered. The blue fog lowered around us. “We’d better show this to 
Dad,” I said. 

Marissa agreed. We turned and hurried to the tent. I glanced back to 
make sure the dog wasn’t leaving. Silverdog had walked over to a clump of 
tall weeds and was sniffing around them. 

“Hurry,” I whispered to Marissa. 

We both made our way to Dad’s sleeping bag. He was sound asleep on 
his back, making soft blowing sounds through his lips. 

I dropped to my knees and leaned over him. “Dad? Dad?” 

He didn’t stir. 

“Dad? Wake up! It’s important! Dad?” 

Marissa and I both shouted at him. But he’s such a sound sleeper, he 
didn’t hear us. 

“Tickle his beard,” Marissa suggested. “Sometimes that works.” 

I tickled his beard. 

Nothing. He snored away. 

I brought my face down to his ear. “Dad? Dad?” 

I tried shaking him by the shoulders. But it was hard to get a good grip 
under the sleeping bag. 

“Dad? Please! Wake up!” Marissa pleaded. 



He let out a groan. 

“Yes!” I cried. “Dad?” 

He rolled onto his side. Sound asleep. 

I turned and saw that Marissa had crawled back to the tent opening. 
She stared out. “The dog is heading toward the trees,” she reported. “What 
should we do?” 

“Get dressed,” I urged. “Hurry.” 

We both pulled on the jeans and sweatshirts we’d been wearing. I got 
one hiking boot on, then discovered I had a knot in the other shoelace. 

By the time I pulled the second boot on, Marissa was already back 
outside. “Where is Silverdog?” I asked, hurrying up beside her. 

She pointed through the thickening fog. Clouds had rolled over the 
moon. The heavy darkness made it almost impossible to see. 

But I spotted the big dog loping slowly toward the trees. 

“He’s leaving!” I gasped. “We have to follow him.” I started jogging 
across the dirt. 

Marissa hung back. “Not without Dad,” she insisted. “We can’t.” 

“But someone is trying to help us!” I cried. “Someone knows where 
the Lost Legend is. They sent the dog to bring us.” 

“It may be a trap,” Marissa insisted. “Some kind of evil trick.” 

“But, Marissa—” 

I searched through the fog. Where was the dog? I could barely see 
him. He had reached the trees on the far side of the clearing. 

“Remember the story Dad tells about the forest imp?” Marissa asked. 
“The imp puts out a trail of flowers and candy in the forest. And when 
children follow the trail, it leads them into The Pit With No Bottom. And 
the kids fall and fall for the rest of their lives. Remember?” 

“Marissa—please!” I begged. “No more stories. Silverdog is getting 
away.” 

“But—but—” she sputtered. “Dad wouldn’t want us to go wandering 
off on our own in the forest. You know he wouldn’t. We’ll be in real 
trouble.” 

“What if we found the Lost Legend?” I replied. “Then what? Then we 
wouldn’t be in trouble —would we!” 

“No! No way!” Marissa protested, folding her arms over her chest. 
“We can’t go. No way, Justin.” 



I sighed and shook my head. “I guess you’re right,” I said softly. “Let 
the dog go on its way. Let’s get some sleep.” 

I put my hand on her shoulder and led her back to the tent. 



8 


“Are you crazy?” Marissa cried. She spun away from me. “We can’t let the 
dog get away! It may lead us right to the Lost Legend!” 

She grabbed my hand, gave me a hard tug, and started to run, pulling 
me across the clearing. 

As I ran after her, I tried hard not to let her see the big smile on my 
face. I knew my little trick would work with Marissa. It always does. 

If I ever really want to do something, all I have to say is, “Let’s not do 
it.” 

Marissa always disagrees with me. Always. 

That makes it very easy to get her to do what I want. 

“Dad said we weren’t being helpful,” she murmured. “He was giving 
us a hard time because we wouldn’t find firewood. What if we find the Lost 
Legend? Then we’ll be helping him—big-time!” 

“Big-time,” I repeated. 

I pictured Marissa and me handing Dad the silver chest containing the 
Lost Legend. I pictured the shock on Dad’s face. Then I pictured his smile. 

Then I pictured the three of us on the TV news shows. I imagined 
myself telling everyone how Marissa and I found the valuable old 
manuscript—without any help from Dad. 

My boots clumped over the soft ground. I stopped when we reached 
the trees. 

“There’s just one problem,” I told Marissa. 

She spun around. “What’s that?” 

“Where’s the dog?” 

“Huh?” She turned back to the trees. 

We both searched the darkness. 

The dog had disappeared. 



9 


The fog dung to the dark trees. Clouds still covered the moon. 

Marissa and I peered into the darkness, listening hard. 

I sighed. I felt so disappointed. “I think our adventure is over before it 
even started,” I murmured. 

Wrong. 

Aloud bark made us both jump. “Hey—!” I cried out. 

Silverdog barked again. He was calling us! 

We stepped between the trees, following the sound. 

My boots sank into the soft dirt. Under the tall trees, the sky grew even 
darker. 

“Stick close together,” Marissa pleaded. “It’s so hard to see.” 

“We should have brought a flashlight,” I replied. “We left in such a 
hurry, I didn’t think—” 

A loud crackling sound made me stop. The crisp thud of paws over 
dead leaves. 

“This way,” I urged Marissa. I turned toward the sound. “Silverdog is 
right up ahead.” 

I still couldn’t see the dog. But I could hear his footsteps over the dry 
twigs and leaves of the forest floor. 

The dog had turned to the left, following a narrow path through the 
trees. The ground beneath my boots became hard. We both raised our arms 
in front of our faces as we stepped through a thicket of brambles. 

“Ouch!” I cried out as prickly thorns pierced through the sleeve of my 
sweatshirt. 

“Where is that dog taking us?” Marissa asked shrilly. I knew she was 
trying to sound calm. But I could hear the fear creep into her voice. 

“He’s taking us to someone who wants to help us,” I reminded her. 
“He’s taking us to someone who is going to make us rich and famous. 

“Ow!” I pulled a burr from my wrist. 

I hoped I was right. I hoped that the note didn’t lie. I hoped that the 
dog was taking us someplace nice. 

The footsteps turned sharply up ahead. I couldn’t see a path now. 



Actually, I couldn’t see three feet in front of me! 

We kept our arms in front of us, using them as shields. And we pushed 
our way through a thicket of tall weeds. 

“He’s speeding up,” Marissa whispered. 

She was right. I could hear the dog’s footsteps moving more rapidly 
over the ground. 

Marissa and I began jogging, eager to keep up. Over our own 
crunching footsteps, I could hear the dog breathing hard. 

The flutter of wings —many wings, low overhead—made me duck. 

“Were those birds?” Marissa cried. She swallowed hard. And then she 
added, “Or bats?” 

I could still hear the fluttering, in the distance now. The sound sent a 
chill down my back. 

So many flapping wings! 

“They were birds,” I told Marissa. “They had to be birds.” 

“Since when do birds fly like that at night?” she demanded. 

I didn’t answer. Instead, I listened for the dog’s footsteps up ahead. 
They seemed to be slowing down. 

We followed the sound through an opening between tall bushes. And 
stepped into a broad, grassy clearing. 

As we made our way into the grass, the clouds floated away from the 
moon. Under the moonlight, dew-covered grass shimmered like diamonds. 

I gazed up from the grass—and gasped in horror. 

Marissa grabbed my arm. Her mouth dropped open in shock. 

“I don’t believe it!” I cried. 

I stared at the creature standing a few yards up ahead of us. 

Not the dog. 

Not Silverdog. 

A brown-and-black-spotted deer. A stag with antlers that curled up 
from his head and gleamed in the moonlight. 

We had followed the wrong animal. 

And now we were hopelessly lost. 



10 


The big deer stared at us. Then he turned and trotted across the grass, into 
the trees on the other side. 

Frozen in shock, I watched him disappear. Then I turned to my sister. 
“We—we made a bad mistake,” I managed to choke out. “I thought it was 
the dog. I really did.” 

“Let’s not panic,” Marissa said. She huddled close to me. 

A gust of wind made the tall grass whisper and bend. I heard a low 
moaning sound from the trees behind us. I tried to ignore it. 

“You’re right. We won’t panic,” I agreed. But my legs were shaking, 
and my mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. 

“We’ll go back the way we came,” Marissa said. “We didn’t walk that 
far. It shouldn’t be too hard to retrace our steps.” She glanced around. 
“Which way did we come?” 

I spun around. “That way?” I pointed. “No. That way? No...” 

I wasn’t sure. 

“Maybe we should panic,” I said. 

“Why did we do this?” Marissa wailed. “Why were we so stupid?” 

“We thought we were helping Dad,” I reminded her. 

“Now we may never see him again!” she cried. 

I wanted to say something to calm her down. But the words caught in 
my throat. 

“This forest goes on for miles and miles!” Marissa continued. “The 
whole country is probably forest. We’ll never find anyone who can help us. 
We-we’ll probably be eaten by bears or something before we ever get out.” 

“Don’t say bears,” I begged. “There aren’t any bears in this forest—are 
there?” 

I shuddered. Dad had told us too many stories that ended with children 
being eaten by bears. That seemed to be one of Dad’s favorite endings. 

It was never one of mine. 

The wind bent the grass back the other way. In the far distance, I heard 
the flutter of wings once again. 

And over the whisper of the wings, I heard another sound. 



A dog bark? 

Was I imagining it? 

I listened hard. And heard it again. Yes! 

I turned and saw the happy expression on Marissa’s face. She heard it 
too. “It’s Silverdog!” she cried. “He’s calling us!” 

“Let’s go!” I exclaimed. 

I heard another long series of barks. The dog was definitely calling us. 
We spun around and ran toward the sound. 

Ran back into the trees. Ran through the tall bushes. Leaped over 
fallen logs. Ran to the barking. 

Ran. 

Ran full speed. 

Until the ground suddenly gave way. 

A hole opened up beneath us. 

And we started to fall. 

“Nooooooo!” I let out a long, terrified wail. “It’s The Pit With No 
Bottom!” 



11 


I landed hard on my elbows and knees. 

“Ooof!” I let out a groan as my face hit wet dirt. 

A bottom. 

A very hard bottom. 

I glanced over at Marissa. She was already climbing to her feet. She 
brushed dirt and dead leaves off the knees of her jeans. 

“What did you yell?” she asked. “I couldn’t hear you.” 

“Uh... nothing,” I mumbled. “Just yelled.” 

I glanced up. Marissa and I had tumbled down a short, steep hill. We’d 
fallen maybe three or four feet. 

Not exactly a bottomless pit. 

I brushed myself off, hoping Marissa couldn’t see how embarrassed I 

felt. 

When we climbed back to the top, Silverdog was waiting for us. The 
dog raised his head and stared at us with his brown and blue eyes—as if to 
say, “What is your problem? Why can’t you two jerks keep up with me?” 

As soon as we joined him at the top of the hill, the big dog turned and 
loped off, wagging his furry white tail. Every few steps, he glanced back to 
make sure we were following. 

I still felt kind of shaky from the fall. Even though it was such a short 
drop, I had banged my knees pretty hard. They still ached. My heart still 
raced. 

Dad and his crazy stories, I thought, shaking my head. The Pit With 
No Bottom... why would I even think such a crazy thought? 

Well... what could be crazier than following a big white dog through a 
Brovanian forest in the middle of the night? 

Maybe Marissa and I will have a legend to tell our friends when we’re 
finished, I thought. “The Legend of the Two Incredibly Stupid Kids.” 

Or, maybe we’ll find the silver chest containing the Lost Legend—and 
be rich and famous and make Dad proud. 

These were my thoughts as my sister and I followed Silverdog along a 
curving path through the forest. The dog loped easily between the trees and 



weeds. And we trotted behind him, eager not to lose him again. 

After a few minutes, we stepped into a large patch of tall grass. 
Marissa and I stopped and watched Silverdog run across the grass, 
prancing, raising his legs high. He ran to a small cabin on the other side of 
the grass. 

The cabin stood silvery gray under the moonlight. It had one narrow 
door and one square window under a slanted red roof. 

A stone fireplace stood beside the cabin. Some kind of barbecue grill, I 
guessed. Beside the fireplace, I saw a low pile of firewood, neatly stacked. 

I could see no lights on inside the cabin. No sign that anyone lived 
there. 

Silverdog pranced up to the tiny building, pushed in the door with his 
snout, and disappeared inside. 

Marissa and I hesitated at the edge of the clearing. We watched the 
cabin, waiting for someone to come out. The door remained half-open. 

We took a few steps closer. “This is where he wanted to bring us,” 
Marissa murmured, her eyes on the cabin door. “Silverdog sure seemed 
happy to get home. Did you see the way he strutted? Do you think the 
person who wants to help us is inside?” 

“Only one way to find out,” I replied. 

“The cabin looks almost like a fairy-tale cabin,” Marissa said. “Like a 
cabin in one of Dad’s old stories.” She laughed, a quiet dry laugh. “Maybe 
it’s made out of cookies and candy.” 

“Yeah. Right.” I rolled my eyes. 

“Do you remember the story—?” she started. 

“Please—no stories!” I begged. “Come on. Let’s check out the place.” 

We stepped up to the cabin. The whole building was only a few feet 
taller than we were! 

“Hello?” I called. 

No answer. 

“Anyone home?” I called, a little louder. 

No answer. 

I tried one more time. “Hello? Anyone in there?” I shouted, cupping 
my hands around my mouth. 

I pushed open the door. Marissa followed me inside. 

We found ourselves in a warm kitchen. Light from a candle on a small 



table flickered over the wall. I saw a crusty loaf of bread on the sink 
counter. A carving knife beside it. 

I saw a big black pot simmering on a wood-burning stove. It sent a 
sweet, tangy aroma floating through the room. 

I didn’t have time to see anything else. 

As I took one step into the small kitchen, a figure burst in from a back 
room. 

Avery large woman wearing a long, flowing, gray dress. 

She had flashing, bright green eyes. Blond bangs fell across her 
forehead, and long braids hung down the sides of her round-cheeked face. 

She wore a helmet over her head. A cone-shaped helmet with two 
horns poking up from the sides. Like a Viking from long ago. Or someone 
in an opera. 

Her arms were big, with powerful muscles. She had sparkling rings on 
every finger. A round, jeweled medallion swung heavily over her chest. 

She dove quickly past Marissa and me, her green eyes wild, her mouth 
twisted in an evil grin. 

She slammed the cabin door shut. 

Pressed her back against the door. 

“I’ve caught you!” she shrieked. And tossed back her head in an ugly 
cackle of triumph. 



12 


Her cruel laugh ended in a cough. Her green eyes sparkled at us, reflecting 
the candlelight. She stared at us hungrily. 

“Let us go!” 

Those were the words I wanted to shout. 

But when I opened my mouth, only a tiny squeak slipped out. 

Marissa moved first. She dove for the door. I forced my rubbery legs 
into action, and followed close behind. 

“Let us out!” I finally managed to scream. “You can’t keep us here!” 

The big woman’s smile faded. “Take it easy, kids,” she boomed. She 
had a loud, deep voice. “I was just kidding.” 

Marissa and I both gaped at her. “Excuse me?” I cried. 

“Sorry. I have a bad sense of humor,” the woman said. “I guess it 
comes from living out here in the middle of the forest. I can’t resist a really 
mean joke.” 

I still didn’t understand. “You mean you didn’t lock us in?” I 
demanded in a trembling voice. “You haven’t captured us?” 

She shook her head. The horns on the helmet moved with her head. 
She suddenly reminded me of a large, gray bull. 

“I haven’t captured you. I sent Silverdog so that I could help you.” She 
pointed toward the stove. 

I saw that the big white dog had dropped down beside it. He lowered 
his head, licking a big front paw. But he kept his eyes on Marissa and me. 

My sister and I stayed near the door. This woman was strange. And 
kind of terrifying. 

She was so big and loud. And powerful-looking. And those green eyes 
flashed and danced wildly beneath the horned helmet. 

Is she totally crazy? I wondered. 

Did she really bring us here to help us? 

“I know everything that happens in this forest,” she said mysteriously. 
She raised the jeweled medallion close to her face and stared into it. “I have 
ways of seeing things. Nothing escapes me.” 

I glanced at Marissa. Her eyes were wide with fright. Her hand 



reached for the cabin door. 

Back by the stove, Silverdog yawned. He lowered his head between 
his paws. 

“What are your names?” the woman boomed. She let the heavy 
medallion drop back onto her chest. “My name is Ivanna.” She narrowed 
her eyes at me. “Do you know what Ivanna means?” 

I cleared my throat. “Uh... no,” I replied. 

“I don’t, either!” the woman exclaimed. She tossed back her head in 
another cackling laugh. The medallion bounced on her chest. Her helmet 
nearly toppled off her blond hair. 

Despite the warmth of the small kitchen, I shivered. We had walked so 
far through the cold forest. I couldn’t shake off the chill. 

“You two look half-frozen,” Ivanna said, studying our faces. “I think I 
know what you need. Hot soup. Sit down.” She motioned to a small 
wooden table with two chairs in the corner of the room. 

Marissa and I hesitated. I didn’t want to leave the door. I knew we both 
were still thinking of making a run for it. 

“Our dad...” Marissa murmured. “He’ll be looking for us. He might be 
here—any minute.” 

Ivanna stepped over to the stove. “Why didn’t you bring him along?” 
she asked. She pulled down two bowls from a cabinet. 

“We couldn’t wake him up,” I blurted out. 

Marissa glared at me. 

“A heavy sleeper, huh?” Ivanna had her back to us. She was ladling 
soup from the black pot into the two bowls. 

I leaned close to Marissa. “If we want to escape, now is our chance,” I 
whispered. 

She turned to the door, then swung back. “I’m so cold,” she whispered. 
“And the soup smells so good.” 

“Sit down,” Ivanna ordered in her deep, booming voice. 

I led the way to the small wooden table. Marissa and I sat down on the 
hard chairs. 

Ivanna set the steaming bowls in front of us. Her green eyes lit up as 
she smiled. “Hot chicken noodle soup. It will warm you and get you ready 
for your test.” 

“Huh? Test?” I cried. “What test?” 



“Eat. Eat,” Ivanna ordered. “Warm yourselves.” She stepped back to 
the stove. 

I watched her bend to pet Silverdog’s head. Then I raised the soup 
spoon to my mouth. Blew on it. And swallowed a mouthful. 

Delicious. 

And it felt so warm and soothing on my dry throat. 

I took a few more spoonfuls. Then I glanced across the table. Marissa 
seemed to be enjoying it too. 

I had raised a spoonful of noodles nearly to my mouth—when Ivanna 
spun toward us from the sink. Her eyes went wide. Her mouth dropped 
open. 

She pointed at us with a trembling finger. “You—you haven’t eaten 
any of it —have you?” she demanded. 

“Huh?” Marissa and I both gasped. 

“Whatever you do, don’t eat it!” Ivanna cried. “I—I just remembered. 
It’s poison !” 



13 


The spoon dropped from my hand and splashed into the bowl. I grabbed my 
stomach, waiting for the pain to begin. 

I glanced over at Marissa—and saw her roll her eyes. “Another joke?” 
Marissa asked Ivanna. 

“Another joke!” Ivanna confessed gleefully. Once again, she roared 
with laughter. 

I swallowed hard. Why didn’t I guess it was another one of the 
woman’s mean jokes? I hate it when Marissa catches on to things before I 
do! 

“I knew it all along,” I muttered. 

Ivanna stepped up to the table, the medallion bouncing as she walked. 
“The soup isn’t poison. But don’t eat it yet,” she instructed. “I want to read 
the noodles.” 

“Excuse me?” I replied. 

She leaned over my bowl, bringing her face so close that the steam 
misted her cheeks. “Chicken soup noodles foretell your fate,” she 
whispered mysteriously. 

She studied the noodles in my bowl. Then she studied Marissa’s. 
“Hmmmm. Hmmmm,” she kept repeating. “Yes. Hmmmm hmmmm.” 

Finally, she stood up and crossed her powerful arms over her chest. 
Her cheeks were red from the hot steam off the soup. 

“Eat. Eat your soup now,” she instructed. “Before it gets cold.” 

“What did you see?” I asked. “In the noodles. What did they tell you?” 

Her expression turned solemn. “You must take the test in the 
morning,” she replied. “I was right. I know why you have come to the 
forest. I know what you seek.” 

She straightened the helmet on her head. “I can help you. I can help 
you find it. But first you must take the test.” 

“Uh... what kind of test?” I asked. 

Her eyes flashed. “A survival test,” she replied. 

I swallowed hard. “I was afraid of that,” I muttered. 

“What if we don’t want to take your survival test?” Marissa demanded. 



“Then you will never find the silver chest!” Ivanna declared heatedly. 

I gasped. “Wow! You do know what we’re looking for!” I exclaimed. 

She nodded. “I know everything in this forest.” 

“But—but we need our dad!” Marissa stammered. 

Ivanna shook her head. “There is no time. You will take the test in his 
place. Do not worry. It is not a difficult test. If you stay alive.” 

“Huh? If we stay alive ? Is that one of your jokes?” I asked weakly. 

“No,” Ivanna replied, shaking her head. “No joke. I never joke about 
the test in the Fantasy Forest.” 

I was holding the soup spoon. But I let it fall to the table. “Fantasy 
Forest? Where’s that? What is it?” 

Ivanna opened her mouth to answer. But before she could say a word, 
the cabin door burst open. 

I felt a blast of cold air. 

And then a wild creature, covered in black fur, scrabbled into the room 
on all fours. Snarling, it cast its bulging black eyes around the room. 

Then it snapped its jagged teeth—and, with a hoarse growl, leaped to 
attack me. 



14 


I uttered a scream—and tried to dodge out of the way. 

My chair fell, and I fell with it. 

The chair clattered noisily onto the floorboards. I landed on my side. 

I tried to roll away. But the snarling creature sank its teeth into my leg. 
“Owwww!” I shrieked. 

Over my cry, I heard Ivanna’s booming shouts: “Down, Luka! Get 
down! Off, Luka! Get off!” 

The wild creature gurgled. It let go of my leg. And backed away, 
breathing hard. 

As I scrambled to my feet, I stared at the panting creature. It had a 
man’s face. Hunched on its hind legs, it looked almost human. Except that it 
was covered with thick, black fur. 

“Get back, Luka!” Ivanna screamed. “Back!” 

The creature obediently inched back. 

“Don’t be scared of Luka,” Ivanna said, turning to me. “He’s a good 
boy.” 

“What—what is he?” I cried, rubbing my leg. 

“I’m not sure,” Ivanna replied, grinning at the furry thing. 

Luka hopped up and down, grinning, making grunting sounds. 

“He was brought up by wolves,” Ivanna said. “But he’s a good boy. 
Aren’t you, Luka?” 

Luka nodded. His tongue hung out of his open mouth. He panted like a 

dog. 

Ivanna petted his long, shaggy hair. 

He broke away from her and charged at me again. He sniffed my 
sweatshirt and jeans. Then he crawled under the table and sniffed Marissa’s 
hiking boots. 

“Get away, Luka!” Ivanna ordered. “Off! Off!” She turned to me. 
“He’s a good boy. He’s just nosy. He’ll calm down—once he gets to know 
you.” 

“Gets to know us?” Marissa demanded, watching Luka scurry over to 
Silverdog by the stove. 



“Luka will be a big help to you when you enter the Fantasy Forest,” 
Ivanna said with a smile. 

“He’s coming with us?” I cried. 

Ivanna nodded. “He will be your guide. And he will protect you.” Her 
expression turned solemn. Then she added softly, “You need all the help 
you can get.” 

We finished our soup quickly. Silverdog and Luka watched us from 
beside the stove. 

When we finished, Ivanna led us to a small back room. The room was 
bare except for two cots. 

“You will sleep here,” she said sternly. 

“But our dad—” Marissa started. 

Ivanna raised a hand to silence her. “You want to find the silver chest 
—don’t you? You want to surprise your father and make him proud—don’t 
you?” 

Marissa and I nodded. 

“Then you will take the test. If you pass it, I will tell you how to find 
the chest.” 

She dropped a coarse wool blanket onto each cot. “Sleep quickly,” she 
instructed. “The test begins first thing in the morning.” 

I awoke slowly. Stretched. Turned and reached to push the blanket off me. 

No blanket. 

Had I kicked it onto the floor? 

I blinked several times, trying to clear the sleep from my eyes. 

How long had I slept? 

Sunlight streamed all around. 

Yawning, I sat up. Started to climb off the cot. 

But the cot had disappeared, too. 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I realized the cabin had also disappeared. 

“Where am I?” 

I was sitting on the grass, fully dressed. I blinked, waiting for my eyes 
to adjust to the bright morning sunlight. The grass still shimmered wetly 
from the morning dew. 

I stood up. My mouth dry. Feeling stunned. 

Nothing but forest all around. 



My mind whirled. Ivanna had said the test would begin first thing in 
the morning. 

Had it already begun? Was I in the Fantasy Forest? 

Had the test begun before I awoke? 

Rubbing my eyes, I turned to Marissa. “Where are we?” I asked, my 
voice still hoarse from sleep. I cleared my throat. “Do you think—” 

I stopped with a gasp when I realized Marissa wasn’t there. 

I was alone. 

Alone in the middle of the forest. 

“Marissa—?” I called, feeling the panic tighten my chest. Where was 

she? 

Where was /? 

“Marissa—? Marissa—?” 



15 


“Marissa—?” 

My voice cracked. My throat tightened. 

I heard a low growl from the trees. The thud and crackle of heavy 
animal footsteps. 

I turned to the sound. And watched Luka come hopping out of the 
forest. He stood on his two feet like a man. But he hopped like a rabbit. 
Scratching the thick fur on one leg, he grinned at me as he came near. 

I didn’t grin back. “Where is Marissa?” I demanded. “Where is my 
sister?” 

He tilted his head and stared at me, confused. 

“Marissa!” I screamed at him. “Where is Marissa?” 

“Over here!” 

I jumped when her voice leaped out at me. “Where are you?” I called. 

I saw a flash of her red hair. Then she poked her head out from behind 
a wide, leafy bush. 

“Over here,” she repeated. “You were still asleep. So I thought I’d 
explore.” 

“You scared me to death!” I admitted. I began trotting through the tall 
grass and weeds, eager to join her. “Where are we?” I demanded. “What 
happened to Ivanna’s cabin?” 

Marissa shrugged. “Beats me. I woke up—and here we were.” 

Behind us, Luka growled. 

I turned and saw him pawing the dirt, like a dog. “Do you think he’s 
part human?” I whispered to Marissa. 

She didn’t seem to hear me. She pointed to a spot between two trees. 
“I found a path over there. Do you think we’re supposed to follow it?” 

“I don’t know what we’re supposed to do,” I replied shrilly. “Did 
Ivanna ever explain the test? No. Did she ever tell us the rules? No. Did she 
ever tell us what we’re supposed to do to pass the test? No.” 

Marissa’s eyes narrowed in fear. “I think we’re supposed to stay 
alive,” she said softly. “I think that’s how we pass the test.” 

“But where do we go? What do we do?” I cried. I could feel myself 



start to lose control. I felt angry and frightened and confused—all at the 
same time. 

Luka uttered another growl. He stopped digging up the dirt and came 
staggering over to us, standing up like a human. 

If he shaved off all the fur, put on some clothes, and got a haircut, he’d 
look like a young man, I thought. As I stared at him, he started to wave and 
point. 

“What is he doing?” I asked Marissa. 

She stepped up beside me and stared at him too. 

Luka grunted excitedly. He waved a furry hand at us and jabbed his 
other hand toward the trees. 

“I think he wants us to follow him,” I said. 

“Yes,” Marissa agreed. “Remember—Ivanna said he would be our 
guide.” 

Grunting and waving, Luka headed for the trees. 

I held back. “Can we trust him?” I asked. 

Marissa shrugged. “Do we have a choice?” 

Luka stepped onto a path that led through the forest. The path curved 
behind a clump of tall, yellow-leafed bushes. I saw his head bobbing above 
the bushes. Then he disappeared. 

“Hurry!” I tugged my sister’s arm. “We’d better not let him get out of 
sight.” 

I glanced down and saw two black backpacks on the grass. I bent 
down, grabbed one, and unzipped it. Empty. 

I handed the other backpack to Marissa. “Ivanna must have left these 
for us,” I told her. “They’re empty. But I guess we should take them.” 

We pulled the backpacks onto our backs. Then we jogged to the path 
and hurried to catch up with the bouncing, hopping Luka. 

He stopped to sniff a weed. Then he continued shuffling along the 

path. 

We followed close behind. Two or three times, he turned back to make 
sure we were following. 

The path curved between prickly weeds and tall reeds. We passed a 
small, round pond that reflected the blue sky. The air became warmer and 
wet. The back of my neck felt hot and prickly. 

We entered a cluster of trees with smooth, white trunks. The trees grew 



close together. The smooth bark of the trunks felt cool against my hot 
hands. 

“Where is he taking us?” Marissa whispered. 

I didn’t answer her. I didn’t know. I only knew that Luka was leading 
us deeper and deeper into this forest. 

We squeezed our way through the white-trunked trees. And came out 
in a large, grassy clearing. Small gray rocks poked up from the grass. The 
slender white trees formed a circle around the clearing. 

My boots crunched over the ground as I followed Luka across the 
grass. I looked down to see what made the crunching sound. 

And discovered that the ground was covered with large brown nuts. 

I picked one up. “Check this out,” I called to Marissa. I turned and saw 
that she had picked up two of them. “They must have fallen off the white 
trees,” I said. 

“They look like walnuts. But they’re bigger than eggs!” she declared. 
“I never saw walnuts this big!” 

“They feel so hot!” I exclaimed. I glanced up at the sky. “I guess it’s 
from the sun beating down on them.” 

“Hey—! Whoa!” 

Marissa’s cry made me look up. 

I saw a gray creature scamper across the clearing. 

At first I thought it was a dog or a very large cat. Then I realized it was 
a squirrel. It carried one of the large nuts in its front paws. And it hopped 
quickly toward the trees, its bushy gray tail floating behind it like a 
pennant. 

I turned as Luka let out a hoarse cry. 

I saw him stand straight up. I saw his eyes go wide with excitement. 

He let out another cry. Leaned forward. Reached out both hands. 

And started to chase after the squirrel. 

The squirrel saw Luka coming. It dropped the nut and took off at full 
speed into the white trees. 

Luka dropped to all fours and galloped after it. 

“No, Luka—come back!” Marissa shouted. 

“Come back! Come back!” we both called. “Luka—come back!” 



16 


Marissa and I both let out worried cries. Then we took off after Luka, into 
the clump of trees. 

“Luka—! Hey, Luka!” I called. My voice bounced off the trees. It 
echoed all around me. 

“Luka—! Hey, Luka!” 

The cry repeated and repeated, echoing loudly. 

I could hear his growl up ahead. And I could hear him thrashing his 
way through the trees as he chased the fat squirrel. 

“Luka—come back!” Marissa’s cry echoed all around the forest, too. 

As we called after him, it sounded as if there were dozens of us in the 
forest, all chasing after him, all frantically calling for him to stop chasing 
that squirrel and come back to us. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as I tried to slip through the narrow space between 
two white tree trunks—and my backpack caught between the trees. 

“Ow!” 

It snapped me back. I staggered and nearly fell. 

Mister Klutz. For a change. 

“Luka! Hey—Luka!” I could hear Marissa’s cry up ahead of me now. 

I tried to slip through the trees again, and the backpack caught again. I 
pulled it free and found another, wider opening. 

A few seconds later, I caught up with my sister. She had stopped 
running. She leaned against a tree trunk, breathing hard. 

“Where is he?” I cried. “Do you see him? Where did he go?” 

“I—I lost him,” Marissa replied breathlessly. “I don’t even hear him 
anymore.” 

I listened hard. The forest was silent now. No footsteps. No growls. 
The leaves above us brushed together, making a soft, whispering sound. 

“But how could he run away?” I cried. “He’s supposed to be our 
guide!” 

“I think he really wanted to catch that squirrel,” Marissa said quietly. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “He can’t just run away and leave us all by 
ourselves here.” 



Marissa sighed. “I think he just did.” 

“We have to find him!” I cried. “Come on. We have to keep going. We 
can’t let him—” 

Marissa shook her head. “How can we find him, Justin? Which way 
should we go?” 

“We’ll follow his footprints,” I replied. I lowered my gaze to the 
ground. A thick carpet of brown leaves spread over the dirt. 

No footprints. 

“I think he was heading that way,” I said, pointing to the trees. 

Marissa shook her head. “I don’t think so.” She pushed herself away 
from the tree trunk. “He’s gone, Justin.” 

I spun around, frantically searching for him. For any sign of him. 

“Hey—what’s that?” Marissa called. 

“Huh?” I turned back to her. 

“In your back pocket,” she said, pointing. “What is it?” 

Confused, I reached into the back pocket of my jeans—and pulled out 
a folded-up sheet of paper. My hands were sweaty and stuck to the paper. 
But I unfolded it quickly. 

“It’s some kind of a note,” I told Marissa. “In a tiny handwriting.” 

“Well, read it!” she cried. 

My eyes slid to the bottom of the page. “It-it’s from Ivanna,” I 
stammered excitedly. 

“What does it say?” Marissa demanded impatiently. 

I steadied the page between both my hands and read the note out loud 
to both of us: 

“DEAR KIDS, 

KEEP LUKA WITH YOU, AND YOU WILL PASS THE TEST. DO 
NOT LET HIM OUT OF YOUR SIGHT. BE CAREFUL NOT TO LOSE 
HIM—OR YOU ARE DOOMED.” 



17 


Marissa and I made our way slowly back to the clearing. The grass swayed 
under a soft breeze. Our boots crunched over the large nuts in the grass. 

I still held Ivanna’s note in my hand. I glanced over it one more time, 
hoping it didn’t say what it said. Then I angrily balled it up and tossed it 
away. 

Marissa trudged along beside me. The sun beat down on us. We were 
both sweating. 

“Maybe if we wait here, Luka will come back,” Marissa said. 

“He isn’t coming back,” I groaned. “He is probably miles away, still 
chasing after that squirrel.” 

“Then what do we do next?” Marissa demanded. “How do we pass the 
test?” 

I let out an unhappy sigh. “We can’t pass the test. You heard what the 
note said. We’re doomed.” 

“Well, we can try,” she insisted. She started across the clearing. I 
followed her. 

We had taken six or seven steps when I heard a startling sound. A loud 
snap, like a pencil being broken in two. 

Then a crack —soft at first, and then louder. 

I stopped and whirled around. I expected to see Luka come bounding 
out of the forest. 

But I saw only the tall, white trees. No one there. 

I heard another sharp snap. Then another. And another. 

And then I heard cracking all around. 

The earth is cracking open! 

That was my first thought. I pictured the ground splitting apart. A dark 
hole opening up. And Marissa and me falling, falling down into it. 

The Pit With No Bottom! 

I wished Dad had never told us that story! 

Now Marissa grabbed my shoulder and pointed down. “Justin—look!” 

I gazed down. The ground hadn’t split open. But the snapping and 
cracking echoed all around. 



Louder. Louder. 

“Ohh!” I let out a frightened moan as I realized to my horror that the 
grass was moving. 

I could feel it move under my feet. 

“What’s happening ?” Marissa cried, still holding on to me. “That 
sound—!” 

The cracking grew louder, rising up from the ground. Now it sounded 
as if all the trees were cracking apart. 

The grass swayed and bent. 

“It’s—the nuts!” I cried to Marissa. “Look! They’re all cracking 
open!” 

I covered my ears against the sound. 

And stared at the nuts, bouncing and trembling all around our feet. 

Cracking open. Splitting apart. 

Hundreds and hundreds of them. The whole clearing. The ground 
shaking as they all cracked apart. 

Cracked into pieces. Crumbled around us. 

We stared in amazement at the cracking nuts. And then, Marissa and I 
both screamed in shock when we saw what came climbing out. 



18 


Staring down as a nut split open, I saw gnashing teeth. Tiny black eyes. A 
twitching black nose. 

The creature pushed itself up. I saw spindly front legs. 

A slender body of gray fur. 

And those teeth. Snapping. Gnashing. 

“Amouse!” I choked out. 

“Hundreds of them!” Marissa cried. 

The nuts were splitting apart. All across the clearing. So many of 
them, it made the grass quiver and the ground appear to shake. 

I stood frozen in place, watching mice hatch around my feet. They 
pushed out slowly, poking their heads out first. Sniffing the air. Trying out 
their pointy teeth. 

The nuts rocked onto their sides. Cracked apart. Gray bodies slithered 
out. Sticklike back legs kicked their way out from the empty shells. 

“They’re not nuts—they’re eggs!” Marissa wailed. 

“But mice don’t come from eggs!” I protested. 

Marissa raised her eyes to me, her face twisted in shock. “I guess no 
one told these mice!” 

A mouse scampered over my boots. Mice were scurrying through the 
tall grass, making the grass whisper. 

Another gray body slithered over my boots. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I cried to Marissa. I grabbed her arm and 
started to pull. 

But so many mice scampered over the grass, so many gray bodies 
slithered at our feet—we couldn’t move. 

Shrill squeaks rose up from the grass as the creatures found their 
voices. “Eee eee eee eee!” The sound surrounded us. Grew louder, louder. 
Until it drowned out the whisper of the grass. Until it forced Marissa and 
me to cover our ears. 

“Eee eee eee eee! ” 

“We have to run!” I shouted. 

“But the ground is covered!” Marissa shrieked. “If we run—” 



“YOWWWWW!” I let out a cry as I felt a mouse drop inside my 
hiking boot. Its tiny feet scratched through my wool socks. 

I bent down to pull it out—and saw two more mice clinging by their 
teeth to my pants cuff. 

“Hey—” I tried to bat them away. 

Lost my balance. 

Fell to my knees. 

Justin the Super Klutz strikes again. 

Mice scurried over my hands. I felt one climb up my sweatshirt sleeve, 
onto my back. 

“Hellllp!” Marissa and I both cried out at the same time. 

I turned and saw her bent over, hands raised, struggling to pull two 
mice from her hair. 

Another mouse chewed the bottom of her sweatshirt. Two more mice 
climbed a leg of her jeans. Mice clung to her backpack. 

“Helllp me! Ohhhh—helllp!” 

Still on my knees, I struggled to push myself up. But a mouse slithered 
under my sweatshirt. I felt its prickly feet move across my chest. Then I felt 
a sharp stab of pain in the middle of my back. 

Did it bite me? 

Mice jumped onto my shoulders. Crawled over the back of my neck. 
Swarmed over my backpack. 

Swinging both hands wildly, I tried to brush them off me. 

But there were too many of them. 

Squeaking. Snapping. Clinging to my clothes. My wrists. My hair. 

“Helllllp! Hellllp!” 

I pulled a mouse from my ear. And tossed it across the grass. 

I could feel a bunch of them crawling over my bare skin under my 
sweatshirt. Another sharp bite made me cry out—and I dropped facedown 
onto the grass—onto more mice! 

I tried to swat the mice away. Tried to swat them and push them and 
grab them and tug them off me. 

But there were too many. Way too many. 

I turned and saw them swarming over Marissa. She cried out as she 
spun around, swinging her arms. Trying to shake the mice off. 

I wanted to help her. But I couldn’t get up. 



My whole body tingled and itched. 

The squeaking, chattering mice swarmed over me, holding me down. 
Prickling me, scratching me, biting me—until I couldn’t move, couldn’t 
breathe. 



19 


“Off! Get off!” I managed to cry. 

I swiped at my face, slapping two mice off my cheeks. I pulled one, 
squeaking and squirming, from my hair. Pulled another one off my 
forehead. 

I kicked my legs and swung my arms, frantically trying to free myself. 

“Oww!” I let out a wild shriek as a fat, gray mouse scratched at my 
ear. 

I reached up. Grabbed it. And squeezed. 

The mouse gave a soft groan—and collapsed. 

“Huh?” I felt something hard above its furry gray belly. Like a bump. 

I slapped away two other mice and examined the one in my hand. I 
pushed the tiny, hard bump. The mouse started to squirm and struggle. 

I pushed the bump again. The mouse slumped in my hand, silent and 

still. 

“It’s an on-off switch!” I screamed. 

I turned to Marissa. She had fallen to her knees. Dozens of mice 
swarmed over her. They covered her sweatshirt. They crawled through her 
hair. 

“It’s an on-off switch!” I shouted to her. “Marissa—squeeze the button 
on their front. You can turn them off!” 

I grabbed a mouse off my neck. Squeezed the button. Shut it off. 

I swiped up two more and turned them off. 

“They’re not real!” I cried happily. “The mice—they’re fakes! They’re 
little machines! ” 

Marissa climbed to her feet. She was brushing mice off her clothes. 
Clicking them off. “Weird!” she exclaimed. “Justin—this is so weird!” 

“We’ve got to get out of here,” I told her. “We’ve got to find Luka.” 

Marissa tugged a mouse off the back of her neck and clicked it off. 
“Do you think this was the test?” she asked. “Do you think we passed it?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied. My eyes searched the trees. “I don’t care 
about the test right now. I just want to get away from these dumb 
mechanical mice.” 



I brushed two more off the front of my jeans. Then I reached for 
Marissa. I pulled a mouse off her shoulder, clicked it off, and tossed it 
away. 

Then we both started to run for the trees. 

Mice scurried under our feet. Their shrill squeaks echoed all around 
us. 

We stepped on them as we ran. But we didn’t care. We knew they 
weren’t real. We knew they were mechanical. 

We were nearly out of the clearing when I stopped suddenly. I had an 

idea. 

I bent down and started scooping up mice. “Wait up!” I called to 
Marissa. 

She didn’t hear me. She kept running toward the trees. 

“Wait up! I’ll be right there!” I called. I picked up a few handfuls of 
mice and clicked them off. Then I shoved them into my backpack. 

These will be awesome for playing jokes on people back home! I told 
myself. They’re so lifelike. Can you imagine the fun I’ll have with these in 
Miss Olsen’s class? 

I shoved eight or nine more of them into the pack and closed it up. 
Then I climbed to my feet and ran after my sister. 

I glanced back once—and saw the mice, thousands of them, crawling 
over each other, crawling in wild circles through the grass. 

Then I turned and ran, following Marissa into the safety of the white¬ 
trunked trees. Ran full-speed. Ran blindly. 

So eager to get away from that clearing and the squeaking, scurrying 
mice. 

“Marissa—wait up!” I called. 

She was far ahead, running fast. 

“Wait up!” I called. 

And then I uttered a sharp cry as I ran—full-force—into a tree. 

“Oooof!” 

I felt the air burst from my lungs. I saw stars. Red and yellow stars, 
dancing in a pure white sky. 

Gasping for breath, I reached for the tree trunk. 

I heard a cracking sound. 

So loud. And close. 



The tree! 

The tree I had run into—it started to fall! 

“Look out—!” I called to my sister. 

Too late. 

As I stared helplessly, the tall, white tree collapsed. 
Marissa’s hands shot up as the tree fell on her. 

And crushed her beneath its heavy trunk. 



20 


“Nooooo!” I let out a howl of horror. And stared down at my sister. 

Marissa lay sprawled facedown in the dirt. The tree trunk had crushed 
her back and shoulders. 

Was she breathing? 

I couldn’t tell. 

“Marissa—!” I choked out her name and dropped down beside her. “I 
—I—” 

I saw her body give a hard shake. 

She raised her head and squinted up at me. “What happened?” Her 
words came out in a whisper. 

“Does it hurt?” I cried. “Are you in pain?” 

She squinted harder, as if thinking about it. “No. No pain.” Marissa 
rolled onto her back. Then she reached up with both hands—and shoved the 
tree trunk off her. 

“Huh?” I let out a startled cry. 

I saw the bewildered expression on my sister’s face. “It’s fake too,” 
she murmured. 

She reached out and tugged off a chunk of the tree trunk. “It’s plaster 
or something,” she announced. “Check it out, Justin.” 

My hand was trembling as I tore off a piece of the trunk. I was still 
shaking all over from the sight of Marissa falling under the tree. 

I squeezed the chunk of tree, and it turned to powder in my hand. I 
pulled off another hunk. Soft plaster. 

Marissa climbed to her feet. She brushed the plaster dust off her 
clothes. “It’s a total fake,” she murmured again. 

“Do you think the trees are all fake?” I cried. “The whole forest?” 

I got up. Then I took a running start. Stuck both hands straight out in 
front of me... 

.. .And ran as hard as I could, shoving my hands against a tree. 

The trunk cracked easily. I stood shaking my head in amazement as the 
tree toppled over. It hit another tree and knocked that one down too. The 
plaster trunks cracked and shattered as they hit the ground. 



“Fake. It’s all a fake!” Marissa declared. A smile spread over her face. 
“That looks like fun.” 

She took a running start, aiming at a tree across from the others. 

“No! Not that one!” I screamed. 

I guess Marissa couldn’t stop in time. She slammed her shoulder into 
the tree. “Yaaaay!” 

She raised both fists over her head in triumph as the tree toppled over. 

But she didn’t have much time to cheer. 

As the white trunk fell, I heard the hard flutter of wings. 

And I watched in horror as dark forms fluttered up from the fallen 
limbs. 

I had seen the bats. Dozens of black bats. Clinging upside down on the 
tree limbs. 

I had seen them. But I hadn’t warned Marissa in time. 

And now the bats all came flapping up, cluttering angrily, their sleep 
interrupted. 

Hissing and shrieking at us, they surrounded us—and began to circle. I 
could feel the warm breeze from their flapping wings. 

Faster. Faster, they circled. 

“Are they fake too?” Marissa asked in a tiny voice. 

“I—I don’t think so,” I stammered as they swooped in for the kill. 



21 


Marissa and I both ducked as the circle of bats swooped low. 

I shut my eyes and covered my head with my hands. 

And waited. 

The sound of a deep boom rose over the shrill chittering of the bats. 

The ground shook. 

Thunder? 

Another boom, low at first, then loud as an explosion. 

I raised my head in time to see the white trees tremble. 

The bats stopped their shrieking. Their wings shot up, stretched out. 

Another boom of thunder sent them racing back up to the sky. I 
watched them flutter up, rising, rising above the trees, rising against the 
bright sky until they seemed to disappear into the sun. 

Marissa let out a long sigh of relief. “We’re safe.” She climbed to her 
feet slowly. 

“But what is that sound?” I demanded, listening hard. 

Another thunderous boom. Closer this time. 

I felt the ground shake. A tree tottered, then came toppling to the 
ground. 

“It can’t be thunder,” Marissa said softly. She pointed to the sky. “No 
clouds or anything.” 

Another boom. 

Closer. 

“I—I know what it is,” I stammered. 

Marissa turned to me. Another boom shook the trees. 

“Footsteps,” I murmured. “Coming toward us. I know it’s footsteps.” 

Marissa’s mouth dropped open. “Justin—you’re letting your crazy 
imagination run away with you. Again!” 

“No. I’m right,” I insisted. “Footsteps.” 

My sister squinted at me. “Are you losing it? What could make 
footsteps that loud? It would have to be...” Her voice trailed off. 

Another boom. 



I let my crazy imagination run away with me. I couldn’t help it. I 
pictured a dinosaur. A Tyrannosaurus rex. Lumbering through the trees. Or 
maybe one of those fat ones with the long, skinny necks. 

Boooooom. Booooom. 

Or maybe two of them! 

“Whatever it is, it’s coming closer,” Marissa whispered. She shook her 
head. “Ivanna said this was a test of survival. But—” 

So far, it had been a test of our running skills ! 

But I didn’t care. No way I wanted to stick around to see what this 
giant creature was. 

As Marissa and I turned and started to run in the opposite direction, a 
shadow fell over us. 

I gazed up to see if clouds had blocked the sun. 

But I saw no clouds overhead. 

The shadow was cast by the creature, thundering closer and closer 
behind us. 

I heard trees cmnching underfoot. The ground shook. The heavy 
footsteps boomed close behind us. 

How tall was it? 

I glanced back—but could see only quivering trees. 

Booooom. Booooom. 

My knees buckled as the ground shook under my feet. 

Marissa and I ran side by side. We hurtled through the trees as fast as 
we could, gasping for breath as we ran. 

But we couldn’t run out of the shadow. No matter how hard we ran, it 
floated over us, cold and dark. 

Booooom. Booooom. 

So close now. So close that every footstep made me leap into the air. 

My heart thudded. My temples throbbed. 

Marissa and I forced ourselves to keep running, desperate to escape, 
desperate to run out from under the wide shadow that seemed to hold us 
prisoner. 

We ran until we reached a wide stream. 

We both stopped inches from the muddy shore. And stared down into 
the fast-flowing, blue water. 

“Now what?” I cried breathlessly. “Now what?” 



The shadow darkened as the creature moved over us. 

Marissa tugged my sleeve. “Look. You can see the bottom. It looks 
really shallow. Maybe we can walk across it. Or swim if we have to.” 
Boooom. Boooom. 

The shadow darkened. 

“Let’s go,” I said. 

We stepped into the cold, clear stream. 



22 


The water flowed faster than I thought. I stepped onto the stream’s soft 
bottom—and nearly lost my balance as the current swept around me. 

I grabbed Marissa’s shoulder to steady myself. We clung together for a 
moment, getting used to the water. 

“Brrrr.” I shivered. The water felt ice cold, even through my jeans legs. 

But it was shallow, as Marissa had said. It came up only a few inches 
above my boots. 

I took another step, leaning forward, trying to balance against the 
stream’s fast current. 

One more step. We were both halfway across the stream. 

“Oh—!” I cried out when I realized I couldn’t take the next step. 

“Hey—!” Marissa exclaimed. I saw her struggling, too. “I’m stuck!” 

“The bottom is so soft!” I cried. I worked to pull my foot up from the 

mud. 

Stuck. My hiking boots had sunk below the surface of the muddy 
bottom. 

I leaned down. And pulled. Pulled my leg up. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

I grabbed my leg with both hands and tried to tug my foot out from the 
muddy stream bottom. 

No. 

“We-we’re sinking!” Marissa wailed. “Justin—look! We’re sinking 
fast!” 

I swallowed hard. She was right. I could feel myself being pulled 
down. Down into the cold water, into the soft, sticky mud. 

The water came up to my knees now. It seemed to be rising quickly. 

But I knew the water wasn’t going up. I was heading down. 

“Pull off your boots and swim for it!” I instmcted Marissa. 

We both bent over and struggled to reach our hiking boots. 

But they were buried too deeply in the mud. 

The water rose up over my waist. If I kept sinking, it would be over 



my head in a few minutes. 

Booom. Booom. 

The thundering footsteps made the water ripple. 

The dark shadow spread over the stream. 

“Justin—look!” Marissa cried. She pointed to the other shore. 

I turned to the shore—so close. But so far away. 

I squinted into the shadows to see what she was gawking at. “What is 
it?” I cried. 

“A big plug,” Marissa reported. “In the stream bottom. Like a bathtub 
drain plug. This stream isn’t real, either. It’s a fake.” 

“The water feels plenty real!” I exclaimed, feeling myself sink even 
deeper into the mud. “Can you reach the plug, Marissa? Maybe if you pull 
it up, the water will drain.” 

She leaned toward it, bending at the waist. She stretched out both 
hands for the ring on top of the plug. “I-I’m trying,” she groaned. “If 
only...” 

Boooom. Booooom. 

Marissa uttered a sigh. “I can’t! I can’t reach it! It’s too far away.” 

The cold stream water flowed against my chest. I felt myself drop 
farther into the muddy bottom. 

“I think we failed Ivanna’s test,” I murmured. 

“Noooo!” Marissa wailed. She began thrashing at the water with both 
hands, twisting her body one way, then the other. 

The deepening shadow moved over us. 

I turned back and raised my eyes to the shore. 

I saw the creatures lurching toward us. 

And opened my mouth in an ear-shattering scream of horror. 



23 


At first I thought I was seeing black clouds, floating low over the trees. 

But then I realized the bobbing shapes were too dark to be clouds. Too 
dark and too solid. 

And then I saw the twin pairs of yellow eyes. 

And I recognized the shapes of the heads. And I knew I was staring at 

cats. 

Cats! 

Black cats. Huge heads rising over the trees. Tails curling up like 
smoke from chimneys. 

Two giant black cats, their paws thundering over the forest, shaking 
the ground and the trees. Their yellow eyes locked on Marissa and me. 

“They’re... not real!” Marissa murmured. “Not real... not real.” She 
had stopped thrashing the water and stood now perfectly still, staring back 
at the enormous cats, repeating the words like a chant. 

Trees crunched and fell. The two cats thundered their way to the shore. 

“Noooo...” Alow wail escaped Marissa’s throat. 

I struggled to breathe. My chest ached. My head started to spin. 

The cats pulled back their lips in a terrifying hiss. 

I saw rows of sharp teeth. I saw their yellow eyes narrow menacingly. 

Tossing back their heads in another hiss, the creatures arched their 
backs. The black fur on their backs stood straight up. 

“Wh-what are they going to do?” Marissa stammered. 

I opened my mouth to answer her, but only a tiny squeak escaped. 

The water flowed past my shoulders. I raised my hands out of the 
water, trying to keep from sinking under. 

“Justin—what are they going to do?” she repeated in a shriek. 

We didn’t have to wait long to find out. 

Before we could even cry out, the cat heads came swooping down at 
us. The jaws opened wide. The curled and jagged teeth slid apart. 

I turned and tried to squirm and wriggle away. But I couldn’t move. 
Water splashed over my face. Then I felt teeth clamp shut on the back of 



my sweatshirt. 

Sputtering, gasping for breath, I felt myself lifted up. My boots made a 
popping sound as they were pulled from the mud. 

I felt the cat’s hot breath on my neck and the back of my head. The 
teeth held me firmly, plucking me up, up out of the stream. 

“Whoooooa!” I finally found my voice. 

The cat dangled me high in the air. 

My arms and legs thrashed wildly. The cat tossed its head, swinging 
me from side to side. 

“Helllp! Ohhh, help!” I heard my sister’s cry from nearby. I turned and 
saw her hoisted up by the other cat, hoisted high in the air, the cat’s jaws 
clamped tightly on the back of Marissa’s sweatshirt. 

I tried to call out to Marissa. But a burst of hot cat breath nearly 
suffocated me. 

I felt myself being lifted even higher as the cat rose up on its hind legs. 
A paw swung up and batted my side. The other paw batted me the other 
way. 

Does it think I’m a cat toy? I wondered. 

I didn’t have time to think about it. 

I twisted dizzily as the cat played with me, batting me from side to 
side. Then, suddenly, I found myself being lowered. 

The jaws opened. 

I was falling now. 

Into the water? 

No. I landed hard on my back on the shore. So hard, I bounced. Pain 
shot through my body. 

I ignored it and scrambled to my feet. My heart pounding, my whole 
body shaking, I tried to run. 

But the cat grabbed me up again, its jaws closing around my right 
shoulder. 

As I sailed back up into the air, I saw Marissa falling through the air. I 
heard her cry out as she hit the ground. And then I saw the other black cat 
bend its head, open its jaws, and drag Marissa up in the air again. 

Up—and then down. My body slammed hard on the shore. I gasped 
and struggled to my hands and knees. In time to be picked up again and 
dangled over the water. 



Marissa and I both hung over the stream. 

Then once more, we were dropped to the shore. 

“Oww!” I bounced hard. Stared up as the cat lowered its massive head 
to pick me up again. 

“What are they doing?” Marissa screeched. “Why are they doing 
this?” 

“I know what they’re doing. They’re doing what cats always do!” I 
cried, feeling cold horror run down my body. “They’re playing with their 
food.” 



24 


“Whooooaaa!” 

My stomach lurched as I felt myself being swooped up into the air 
again. A black cat’s paw swiped at me and sent me swinging. 

“They-they’re going to eat us?” Marissa called. 

“We must look like mice to them!” I shouted back. 

And then I had an idea. 

The cat tossed its head and sent me flying. It caught me between its 
enormous paws. The paws squeezed my middle so hard, I thought my head 
might pop off! 

But as I struggled to breathe, my idea gave me hope. 

Do I have time? I wondered. Can I do it—before this cat swallows me 
whole? 

The cat tossed me up again, then caught me between its teeth. Pain 
shot down my back. My whole body tingled and ached. 

With a groan, I twisted my body. I reached behind me and struggled to 
grab the backpack. 

If I can unzip it, I thought, maybe I can reach the mechanical mice I 
stuffed inside. And maybe I can switch one or two of them on. And maybe 
the mice will distract the two cats. And maybe Marissa and I can escape. 

Maybe, maybe, maybe. 

But I had to try something. Or else, in a few seconds, Marissa and I 
would be cat chow. 

The cat’s tongue swept over the back of my neck. I cried out in pain. 
The tongue felt as rough as sandpaper! Hot cat breath stung my neck. 

I grabbed the backpack with one hand and started to tug it around to 
my chest. 

But the cat opened its jaws. The rough tongue bumped me from 
behind. And I went flying back to the ground. 

I landed hard on my hands and knees. Pain shot through me once 
again. I felt like collapsing in the dirt. 

But I knew I couldn’t give up. 

The cat leaned over me, hissing each breath. Yellow eyes gleamed 



down at me hungrily. 

Ignoring the pain, I grabbed the backpack. I pulled the straps off my 
shoulder. Then I swung the pack around to my chest and gripped it tightly 
with both hands. 

“Got to get the mice,” I murmured out loud. “Got to get the kitty cat 
some mice to play with.” 

My hands were trembling so hard, I couldn’t work the zipper. 

“Aaaaagh!” I let out a frustrated cry—just as the cat swooped me up in 
its jaws again. 

I tried to call out to Marissa. I wanted to tell her to hold on. That I had 
a plan. 

High in the air, I gripped the backpack with my right hand. Reached 
for the zipper with my left. 

Please. Please! I prayed silently. Let me get the mice out. Let me click 
them on. 

“My only chance,” I muttered, struggling with the backpack zipper. 
“My only chance...” 

A burst of hot cat breath made me shudder. Once again I felt the dry, 
scratchy tongue scrape the back of my neck. 

“Yessss!” I shouted as I finally pulled the zipper and opened the 
backpack. 

“Yessss!” 

I shot my hand excitedly into the backpack. I felt the furry mechanical 
creatures inside. 

I started to wrap my fingers around one... 

But the cat swung me hard. Tossed back its head and flung me into the 
air. 

“Noooooo!” I let out a long wail—and felt the backpack fly out of my 
hands. 

“Noooooo!” I frantically grabbed at it. Grabbed with both hands. 
Missed. Then I tried to snare it on my foot. 

“Noooooo!” I watched the backpack sail to the ground. 

It bounced once. Twice. Then lay in the dirt near the shore. 

The cat caught me in its teeth. I felt the sharp points dig into my skin. 

Then the jaws opened. And I started to slide. Down the scratchy 
tongue. Down, down into the cat’s cavern of a mouth. 



“Sorry, Marissa,” I murmured in my panic. “We are doomed.” 



25 


The ground disappeared from view as I slid further down the cat’s rough 
tongue. On my stomach, I reached out with both hands. 

And grabbed the two curved eyeteeth. They felt warm and sticky in 
my hands. 

With a hard tug, I pulled myself part of the way up. I crawled a little 
way on the tongue. Then I gave another tug, and my head poked out from 
the cat’s open mouth. 

I searched for Marissa, but I couldn’t see her. 

Had she already been swallowed? 

Beneath me, the tongue bucked and curled. The cat was trying to force 
me down. 

But I held tightly onto the eyeteeth. And glimpsed the ground far 
below. 

And saw three or four gray mice scampering out of the backpack, onto 
the dirt. 

They must have clicked on when the backpack hit the ground! 

Would the cats see them? Would they care? 

The cat chomped its teeth together. I cried out in pain, and my hands 
slid off the eyeteeth. 

The tongue rolled beneath me. I started to slide again. 

The mouth closed over me, shutting me in darkness. “Ohhhh.” So hot 
and wet inside. So hard to breathe. 

I heard low gurgling and growling below me in the cat’s stomach. 

“No!” I cried. “No no no no!” My voice sounded tiny and muffled 
inside the cat’s mouth. 

And then, to my shock, the sunlight poured back in as the jaws popped 
open. 

The tongue pushed me forward. Past the teeth. Past the lips. 

I sucked in a deep breath of cool, fresh air. 

And then I went flying from the cat’s mouth. 

I landed on my back on the ground next to Marissa. She gaped at me in 
surprise, her eyes wild, her red hair tangled and matted wetly to her head. 



We both scrambled to our feet—in time to see both giant black cats 
pounce. 

They both leaped at the same mechanical mouse. 

Hissing and clawing at each other, they began to fight over it. 

“Marissa—let’s go!” I choked out. 

She stared in amazement as the giant cats wrestled, hissing and 
scratching, rolling into the stream, then out again. 

“Hurry! Let’s go!” I shouted. I grabbed Marissa with both hands and 
tugged. “If they figure out the mice aren’t real, they’ll come back after us!” 

“But are the cats real?” Marissa demanded, still gazing at them in 
amazement. “Are the cats real? Or fake?” 

“Who cares?” I shrieked. “Let’s get out of here!” 

Once again, we started running through the forest. Which way were 
we headed? We didn’t pay any attention. We just wanted to get as far away 
from those cats as we could. 

My clothes felt wet and sticky from the inside of the cat’s mouth. But 
the cool, fresh air felt good against my skin and helped to dry me off. 

Our shadows leaned ahead of us, as if leading the way. I heard strange 
animal calls that sounded like shrill laughter. And I heard the flapping of 
wings above the trees. 

But Marissa and I ignored all the sounds. We kept running, pushing 
tall weeds and shrubs out of our way, making our own path. 

We didn’t speak. We didn’t even look at each other. We ran side by 
side, keeping each other in sight, helping each other through the tangled 
forest. 

We were both breathless when we reached a round, grassy clearing. 
White and yellow moths floated silently over the swaying grass. 

“Marissa—look!” I gasped, pointing to the other side of the clearing. 

A small cabin stood under the trees where the grass ended. A very 
familiar cabin. 

“It’s Ivanna’s!” Marissa exclaimed happily. “Justin—we made it! 
We’re back!” 

I sucked in a deep breath and scrambled across the grass. Marissa ran 
right behind me. 

“Ivanna! Ivanna!” We both called her name as we hurried to the cabin. 

She didn’t come out. So I grabbed the door and pushed it open. 



“Ivanna—we’re back!” I cried happily. I glanced quickly around the room, 
waiting for my eyes to adjust to the dim light. 

Marissa pushed me aside as she burst into the small kitchen. “We 
survived!” she exclaimed. “Ivanna—is the test over? Did we pass it? Justin 
and I—” 

We both saw Ivanna seated at the small wooden table. She sat stooped 
over, her head on the table. 

Her horned helmet had fallen off. It lay on its side on the table. Her 
long blond braids had come undone and fallen over her face. 

“Ivanna? Ivanna?” I called. I turned to my sister. “She must be asleep.” 

“Ivanna?” Marissa called. “We’re back!” 

The woman didn’t stir. 

I heard a whimper from the back of the room. Squinting into the 
shadows, I saw Silverdog. He was huddled sadly against the wall, his head 
on the floor between his paws. He let out another whimper. 

“Justin—something is wrong here,” Marissa whispered. 

“Ivanna! Ivanna!” I shouted her name. But she still didn’t move. 

The big white dog whimpered sadly. 

“Is she asleep?” Marissa demanded. “What’s wrong with her?” 

“Let’s see,” I murmured. 

I took a deep breath and made my way across the kitchen to the table. 
Marissa raised her hands to her cheeks and stared at me. She didn’t budge. 

I was nearly to the table when I stopped with a gasp. 

“Wh-what’s wrong?” Marissa stammered. 

“Look what’s sticking out of her back!” I choked out. 



26 


“Huh?” Marissa’s mouth dropped open in horror. “Justin—what?” 

I swallowed hard. My legs started to tremble. I grabbed the back of a 
chair to steady myself. 

“Marissa—look,” I instructed, still pointing. 

She came a couple of steps closer, her eyes bulging wide with fear. 

We both stared at the metal object poking out from the back of 
Ivanna’s dress. 

A large metal key. 

I worked up my courage and crept up behind Ivanna. My heart 
pounding, I leaned down and examined the big key. 

“It-it’s a windup key!” I stammered. 

Marissa opened her mouth, but no sound came out. 

I took the key in both hands and turned it one click. 

Ivanna’s head bobbed up, then fell back to the table. 

“Yes. It’s a windup key,” I told my sister. 

Ivanna’s hands had drooped to the floor at her sides. I reached down 
and grabbed one of them. 

It felt soft and spongy. Stuffed with cotton or something. 

I let the hand drop to the floor and turned back to Marissa. “Ivanna 
isn’t real,” I told her, swallowing again. “She’s some kind of dummy or 
puppet or something. Ivanna isn’t real, either!” 

“Then what is real?” Marissa demanded in a tiny voice. “This is so 
scary, Justin. Is it all part of a test, or what? How do we get out of here 
now? How do we find Dad? If Ivanna isn’t real, then who is?” 

I just shook my head. I didn’t know how to answer her questions. I felt 
as frightened as she did. 

My eyes fell on Silverdog back in the corner. The dog had his head 
buried in his paws. He whimpered softly. 

Then, suddenly, the dog’s ears perked up. He raised his head, his eyes 
flashing excitedly. 

I heard a sharp growl behind me. From the door. 



“Hey—!” I spun around as the door swung open. 

And a growling, snarling creature burst in. 

Luka! 

His eyes moved hungrily from me to Marissa. A pleased grin spread 
over his wild face. 

“No!” Marissa shrieked, backing away from him. 

Luka tossed back his long hair with a shake of his head. He opened his 
mouth in a long howl. 

He leaped into the center of the room. Tossed back his head in a roar. 
And hurtled toward us. 

“Luka—stop!” I begged. “Don’t hurt us!” 



27 


Luka’s grin faded. He lowered his arms. He narrowed his dark eyes at me. 

“I’m not going to hurt you,” he said softly. 

Marissa and I stared back at him in shock. “You—you can talk?” I 
stammered. 

He nodded. “Yes. I can talk. And the first thing I want to say is, 
congratulations!” His smile returned. 

He stepped across the room, walking upright like a human. He shook 
hands with Marissa, then with me. “Congratulations to both of you,” Luka 
said warmly. “You passed the test.” 

“But—but—” I could only sputter. 

Luka peeled a long strip of fur off his arm. Then he pulled the fur from 
around his neck. “I’m happy to get this stuff off,” he said, peeling more fur 
from his arm. “It’s so hot and itchy—especially when you’re running 
around like a wild man in the forest.” 

“I’m very confused,” I confessed. 

Marissa nodded agreement. “Ivanna isn’t real,” she murmured. She 
motioned to Ivanna, slumped over the table behind us. 

Luka shook his head. “No, she isn’t. I built her myself. Just as I built 
all the creatures you found in my Fantasy Forest.” 

“But—why?” I choked out. “Why did you build all that?” 

“As a test,” Luka replied simply. He stepped up behind Ivanna and 
pulled her up into a sitting position. He brushed the dummy’s hair behind 
her head with his hand. Then he propped the helmet back on her head. 

“So many people come to the forest,” Luka continued, turning back to 
Marissa and me. “They come searching for all kinds of treasures. Just as 
you two have. 

“My family has lived in this forest for hundreds of years,” Luka 
explained. “It became our job to protect many of the treasures. And so we 
built a test forest, to keep out those who were unworthy. To stop the people 
who don’t deserve the wonderful treasures.” 

“You built the entire forest?” Marissa asked him. 

He shook his head. “Just the part that isn’t real.” 



“And how did we pass the test?” I demanded. 

“By discovering what was real and what wasn’t,” Luka replied. “By 
surviving and triumphing over the unreal.” 

Marissa stared hard at Ivanna. The dummy’s green eyes gazed dully 
back. “Why did you build Ivanna?” Marissa asked. 

Luka grinned proudly. “She is my best creation. She keeps everyone 
from guessing that I am in charge here. No one believes that a wild wolf 
man runs the Fantasy Forest. It makes it so easy for me to watch everyone 
and see how they do on my test.” 

It all seemed very mysterious to me. But I was too happy it was all 
over to argue with him. 

“And now I shall give you the treasure you came for,” Luka 
announced. He turned quickly and disappeared into the back. 

Marissa and I exchanged glances. “I can’t believe it!” I whispered. 
“He’s giving us the silver chest containing the Lost Legend! Dad is going to 
be so amazed!” 

“We’re going to be rich and famous!” Marissa exclaimed. “And Dad 
won’t be able to tell us we’re not helpful—ever again!” 

A few seconds later, Luka returned carrying a small silver chest. 
“Congratulations again,” he said solemnly. “I am happy to award you the 
ancient treasure that you came here to seek. And I wish you good fortune 
with it.” 

He placed the silver chest in my hands. It felt lighter than I expected. 
The silver gleamed in the light from the candle on the table. 

My heart pounded. My hands trembled. 

I suddenly felt so excited, I nearly dropped the silver chest! To think 
that I held the Lost Legend in my hands! 

“Thank you,” I managed to choke out. 

“Yes, thank you,” Marissa said. “Now how do we get back to our 
dad?” 

Luka snapped his fingers. Back at the wall, Silverdog leaped to his 

feet. 

“Silverdog will lead you back to your camp,” Luka announced. “Stay 
close behind him, and he will protect you.” 

“Uh... protect us?” I asked, gripping the chest tightly. 

Luka nodded. “There are many thieves in the forest. Some of them are 



real, and some of them are not real. But they all would steal your treasure 
and make it their own.” 

“We’ll stay close to Silverdog,” I promised. 

We thanked Luka again. Then we followed the big white dog out of 
the cabin and back into the forest. 

The afternoon sun had started to lower itself behind the trees. It cast an 
orange glow over the forest floor. The air had already begun to carry an 
evening chill. 

Trotting steadily, the big dog kept his furry tail up high as he led the 
way, like a flag for us to follow. I carried the chest carefully between my 
hands and kept my eyes on the dog. Marissa followed close behind. 

We walked along a curving path through a patch of tall yellow weeds. 
Then we made our way around a high clump of evergreen bushes. 

On the other side of the bushes, Silverdog led us onto a leaf-covered 
path. Our boots crunched over the path as we hurried to keep up with the 
trotting dog. 

I gripped the silver chest tightly. I couldn’t wait to pull open the lid 
and gaze at the Lost Legend. To take it out and start to read it. 

What was the legend about? 

Who wrote it? And when was it written? 

So many questions. And I knew they would all be answered as soon as 
we opened the chest and removed the legend from its hiding place of five 
hundred years. 

The sun lowered itself behind the trees. Our shadows grew longer. The 
leaves crunched underfoot. 

“Oh—wait!” I cried out when I heard leaves crunching behind us. 
“Wait—!” 

Silverdog trotted on ahead of us. 

But Marissa and I stopped. 

And listened. 

Listened to the crunching footsteps creeping up fast from the trees 
behind us. 

I felt a chill of fear sweep down my back. “Marissa—we’re being 
followed,” I whispered. 



28 


“Luka warned us about thieves,” Marissa whispered. 

The crunching footsteps came closer. I tucked the silver chest under 
one arm as if protecting a football. My throat tightened. I could barely 
breathe. 

I turned and saw Silverdog trotting on up ahead, his tail still raised 
behind him. The dog disappeared behind a clump of tall weeds. 

“We can’t just stand here,” Marissa whispered. 

The footsteps were approaching faster now. Any moment, I knew, 
some thief—or several thieves—would burst out of the trees and grab the 
chest away from us. 

I turned to the tall weeds. I couldn’t see the dog at all now. 

“We have to run,” Marissa whispered. 

I listened to the crunching footsteps. 

“We can’t outrun him,” I told her. “I can’t run very fast. I have to be 
careful with this chest.” 

Marissa’s blue eyes grew wide with panic. Then her expression 
changed. “I have an idea, Justin. Let’s duck into those trees.” She pointed. 
“The thief will run right past us. Then we’ll hide there till he’s out of sight.” 

Was it a good idea? 

A terrible idea? 

We had no time to think about it. We had to move. 

We both spun around and started to run to the trees. Toward the 
approaching footsteps. 

Would we make it to safety? Could we hide in the trees before he came 
mshing out at us? 

I never found out. 

About halfway across the grass, I tripped over a fallen tree limb. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out. 

And stumbled forward. 

The silver chest flew from my hands. 

“Noooooo!” 



I desperately grabbed for it. 

Missed. 

Fell hard to my knees. 

I watched the chest sail into the air. 

And I stared in shock as a big man lumbered out of the dark shadows 
of the trees, raised his arms, and caught the chest easily. 



29 


I stared at the silver chest. Watched the man’s hands pull it in, then hold it 
tightly. 

Our chest. 

Our Lost Legend. 

We had gone through so many horrors to get it. And now someone else 
had taken it away. 

I stared at the chest gripped so tightly in the man’s hands. Then I 
raised my eyes to the man’s bearded face. 

“Dad!” I cried. 

“Dad!” Marissa echoed. “I don’t believe it!” 

Beneath the beard, a grin spread quickly over Dad’s face. “I don’t 
believe it, either!” he cried. “Where have you been? Why did you run 
away? I’ve been searching the forest for you! Where were you?” 

“It’s kind of a long story,” Marissa told him, rushing forward. 

“Yes. Marissa and I have a legend of our own,” I said. 

Dad set the chest on the ground, and we both hugged him. Dad was so 
glad to see us, he had tears in his eyes. When we finished hugging, he 
hugged us both again. 

“I can’t believe I finally found you!” he exclaimed happily. 

“And look what we found!” I declared, pointing to the chest. 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. When he jumped out and caught the chest, 
I don’t think he realized what he had caught. 

“It’s—a silver chest!” he exclaimed. 

“It’s the silver chest!” I told him. “The silver chest we came to 
Brovania to find!” 

“But—but—how?” 

I never saw Dad so confused. Or so excited. 

“The Legend of the Lost Legend,” he murmured. He carefully lifted 
the chest off the ground. “This is the most thrilling moment of my life,” he 
said. “How did you do this? How did you find this ancient chest? How did 
you—?” 

His voice cracked. I think he was too excited to speak. 



“I told you, Dad. It’s a very long story,” I said. 

“At least you can’t say we weren’t helpful!” Marissa chimed in. 

All three of us laughed. 

“Do you realize what this will mean to us?” Dad asked, lowering his 
voice to a whisper. “Do you realize what a thrilling discovery this is?” 

He dropped down to his knees to admire the chest. He tenderly ran his 
hands over the smooth silver of the lid. 

“Beautiful. Beautiful,” he repeated, grinning. 

“Can we open it?” Marissa asked, dropping down on the ground beside 
him. “Please, Dad? Can we open it and see the Lost Legend?” 

“We have to see it!” I exclaimed eagerly. “We have to!” 

Dad nodded. “Yes. We have to!” He laughed. “Believe me, I’m even 
more impatient to see it than you two are!” 

He bent over the chest. I saw his hands tremble as he lowered them to 
the silver clasp. 

“Beautiful. Beautiful,” he murmured again. 

His hands closed around the clasp. He turned it, then gave a sharp tug. 

Slowly, slowly, he pulled open the lid. 

And all three of us leaned close and gazed into the chest. 



30 


We leaned so dose over the chest, our heads touched. 

“I—I don’t believe it!” I gasped. 

“What is it?” Marissa shrieked. 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. He narrowed his eyes and gazed into the 
chest. He didn’t say a word. 

“It-it’s an egg\” I finally stammered. 

The three of us were staring down at a large yellow egg with brown 
speckles. 

“But—where is the Lost Legend?” Marissa demanded. “This can’t be 
it!” 

Dad sighed and shook his head. “This isn’t the right silver chest,” he 
said softly. 

He reached inside and carefully lifted the egg. Then he felt around on 
the bottom of the chest with his free hand. “Nothing else in here. Just an 
egg.” He examined the egg, rolling it slowly between his hands. Then he 
carefully lowered it back into the chest. “Just an egg,” he repeated sadly. 

I let out a hoarse cry. “But Marissa and I passed the test!” I wailed. 
“Luka said he would give us what we came here for!” 

“Who is Luka?” Dad asked. He carefully closed the clasp on the chest. 
Then, with a groan, he climbed to his feet. “Where can we find him?” 

Before I could answer, I heard a rustling sound across the clearing. I 
turned to see Silverdog come trotting out of the weeds. 

“Silverdog!” I cried. I rushed forward and petted the dog’s big head 
and the fur around his neck. “Take us back to Luka!” I ordered him. “Luka! 
Take us to Luka!” 

Silverdog wagged his tail. Did that mean he understood? 

“Luka!” I repeated. “Take us to Luka!” 

Still wagging his bushy tail, the big dog headed past us to the trees. 
Dad picked up the silver chest. And the three of us followed the dog back 
through the forest. 


Marissa and I hadn’t traveled far from the little cabin. A few minutes later, 



it came into view. Luka hurried out, his face twisted in surprise. 

“I didn’t expect to see you back here,” he said, shaking out his long, 
dark hair. “Did you get lost?” 

“No. Not exactly,” Marissa replied. 

“This is our dad,” I told Luka. “We finally found him.” 

Dad and Luka shook hands. 

“Well, why did you come back here?” Luka demanded. He lowered his 
gaze to the silver chest in Dad’s hands. “I gave you what you came here 
for.” 

“Not exactly,” Dad replied. “It’s an egg.” 

“Yes, I know,” Luka said, scratching his jaw. 

“But we didn’t come here for an egg!” I protested. 

Luka narrowed his eyes at us. “You didn’t come to the forest in search 
of the Eternal Egg of Truth?” 

“No way,” I replied. “Dad brought us here to find the Legend of the 
Lost Legend.” 

“Oops!” Luka blushed. “I made a little goof.” He looked very upset. 

“That’s okay,” Dad said softly. “Everyone makes mistakes.” 

Luka shook his head. “I’m so sorry. I usually get it right. I really 
thought you were searching for the Eternal Egg of Truth.” 

Still shaking his head, he took the silver chest from Dad’s hands. He 
carried it into the cabin. A few seconds later, he returned. “A thousand 
apologies,” he said. 

“But can you help us find the Lost Legend?” I demanded. “Do you 
have it?” 

“Do I have it?” The question seemed to surprise Luka. “No. I don’t 
have it. I think it will be very hard to get it.” 

“Why?” Dad asked eagerly. “Do you know where it is?” 

Luka nodded. “Yes. I can direct you to the people who have the Lost 
Legend. But I do not think they will part with it. They have been wandering 
the forest with it for five hundred years. I do not think they will want to 
give it to you—for any price.” 

“I—I just want to talk with them!” Dad cried excitedly. “I just want to 
see it with my own eyes!” 

“Go in this direction,” Luka instructed us, pointing. “Cross two 
streams, and you will probably find them on a wide, stone clearing. They 



wander the forest. They never stay in the same place for long. But I think 
you will find them in the stone clearing if you hurry.” 

“Thank you!” Dad cried, shaking Luka’s hand. 

We all thanked Luka. Then we hurried off in the direction he had 
pointed. We were so excited, all three of us talked at the same time. 

“Do you think they’ll be friendly?” 

“Do you think they’ll let us see the Lost Legend?” 

“Do you think they’ll let me borrow it?” Dad asked. “If I could only 
borrow it for a few weeks....” 

“Luka said they might not be friendly.” 

“He said they might not part with it—for any price.” 

The journey across the two streams was not difficult. We walked for 
only an hour. 

We were still talking excitedly as we drew near their camp. We 
stopped on a low hill overlooking a wide patch of stony ground. 

The stone clearing. 

We could see rows of small tents made of animal hides. Several 
people, dressed in brown robes, worked to build a fire in the center of the 
clearing. A bunch of scrawny gray dogs wrestled and snapped at each other 
at the edge of the clearing. 

“I can’t believe it,” Dad exclaimed, his eyes searching the small tent 
village. “I can’t believe these wanderers actually have the Lost Legend.” 

“But will they let us see it?” I asked. 

“Only one way to find out,” Dad replied. He led the way down the hill. 
“Hello, there!” he called out to the wanderers. “Hello!” 



31 


“Hello, there! Hello!” 

As we stepped onto the stone ground, the scrawny gray dogs stopped 
wrestling. Barking furiously, they came scurrying up to greet us. They 
lowered their heads, bared their jagged teeth, and growled. 

Marissa, Dad, and I stopped. I saw three men in brown robes come 
running out of tents. They quickly shooed the dogs away. The men, I saw, 
were as scrawny as the dogs. 

“Hello,” Dad greeted them warmly. “I am Professor Richard Clarke, 
and this is Justin and Marissa.” 

The three men nodded solemnly. But they did not speak. 

Two of them were bald. One had long, wavy white hair and a bushy 
white mustache. 

Marissa and I exchanged glances. 

I could see that she was as frightened as I was. 

These brown-robed wanderers did not look friendly. 

The white-haired man spoke first. “How did you find us?” he 
demanded coldly. 

“Someone directed us to you,” Dad replied. 

“Why have you come here, Professor Clarke?” the wanderer asked. 

“We’re searching for the Legend of the Lost Legend,” Dad told him. 

The three men all gasped in shock. They leaned close and whispered 
furiously to each other. 

When they finished their excited conversation, they turned back to us. 
But they didn’t speak. 

“Do you have it?” Dad asked eagerly. “Do you have the Lost Legend?” 

“Yes,” the white-haired man replied. “Yes, we have it.” 

He whispered something to the two bald men. They spun around, their 
long robes twirling with them, and hurried away. 

A few seconds later, they returned. One of them carried a small silver 
chest. 

“Oh, my goodness!” Dad declared, his eyes bulging. “Is that it? Is that 
really it? Is that the Lost Legend?” 



“Yes,” the white-haired man replied. “Do you want it?” 

“Huh?” all three of us cried. 

The wanderer shoved the chest into my hands. I was so shocked, I 
nearly dropped it! 

“It is yours,” the white-haired man said. He stepped back. 

Dad swallowed hard. “Are you sure?” he cried. “Are you sure you 
want to give it to us?” 

“Yes. Take it,” the man replied quickly. “Goodbye.” 

He and the other two turned and walked quickly back to their tents. To 
our surprise, they instantly began to pack up. 

Dozens of wanderers began pulling up tents, packing up supplies, 
putting out the campfire. In minutes, they had scurried away. 

The stone clearing stood bare. No sign they had ever been there. 

“How strange,” Dad said. “How totally strange.” 

We began to walk away from the clearing. I think all three of us were 
in shock or something. I know I was completely stunned. 

“They handed the treasure over to us without a word,” Dad said, 
mbbing his beard. “Why did they do that? Why did they give this treasure 
to us without asking for anything in return? I just can’t believe it.” 

I still had the chest in my arms. After we had walked for a short while, 
I stopped. “Where are we going?” I demanded. “Let’s open the chest. Let’s 
take a look at it!” 

“Yes!” Dad agreed. “I am so surprised—so stunned—I guess I don’t 
know what I’m doing!” 

He took the chest from me and carefully set it down on the ground. 
“Let’s see it. Let’s finally see it!” 

Carefully, he unlatched the lid and opened the chest. Then he reached 
inside—and pulled out a manuscript. A thick stack of yellowed paper with 
tiny black writing all over it. 

“Yes!” Dad whispered happily. “Yes!” 

He gripped the ancient legend tightly in both hands and held it down 
so that Maris sa and I could see it. 

“Wow!” Marissa cried. “It really looks five hundred years old— 
doesn’t it?” 

“Dad, what does it say on the top page?” I asked, struggling to make 
out the words. 



“Uh... let’s see,” Dad replied. He raised the manuscript close to his 
face, squinted hard at the tiny words, and then read them out loud: 

“WHOEVER OWNS THE LOST LEGEND WILL BE LOST 
FOREVER.” 

“Huh? What does that mean?” I cried. 

Dad shrugged. “It doesn’t really mean anything. It’s just part of the 
legend.” 

“Are you sure?” Marissa demanded in a trembling voice. 

Dad stared down at the manuscript. “‘Lost forever...’” he murmured. 
‘“Whoever owns the Lost Legend will be lost forever.’” 

Then he raised his eyes to the trees that surrounded us. “Hey—where 
are we?” 

All three of us gazed around at the strange, dark trees. 

We had wandered away from the stone clearing. Now nothing looked 
familiar. 

“Where are we?” Dad repeated. 

“We-we’re lost,” I whispered. 

